On trade terms, the stock exchange of Prague fell
After the fall of Tuesday morning, the stock exchange of Prague regained its losses.
Transactions with the CˇEZ shares rose almost half the usual daily exchanges.
Tuesday, with the start of trade, the stock exchange of Prague continued with its downfall of the day before, when it lost almost six percent.
This time, the decline is due to the fall of shares on the Wall Street.
The reaction of the market following the vote in the US House of Representatives, who refused to adopt the plan for the stabilization of the US financial sector, is also noticeable back home.
Fall of shares in Asia
Asian stock exchanges a dramatic fall on Tuesday, even if the figures did, during the day, manage to erase some of the losses.
The Hang Seng index in Hong Kong stock exchange lost four percent during the exchange, but later, it made up for part of losses and reduced the drop to approximately 2.5 percent.
The index of Hang Seng China Enterprises, following the movement of Chinese shares of the Hong Kong stock exchange, lost 3.8 percent, the markets being closed in Shanghai.
The shares on the stock exchange of Sydney lost more than five percent, but ultimately managed to reduce losses to 4.3 percent.
According to its index, the Taiwan stock exchange lost 3.6 percent.
"The hesitation over action to rescue the US financial markets around will have repurcussions around the world," observed Joseph Yam, the head of the Hong Kong Monetary Institute.
While Hong Kong is part of China, it establishes its monetary policy itself, that is, independantly of the Chinese central bank.
Interest rates at Hong Kong are at the same level as in the US.
According to Australian Prime Minister Kevin Rudd, the American legislators should quickly resume negotiations and adopt the proposed supports for the financial system.
Otherwise, we risk that other countries will suffer the effects.
The bloodshed of the US stocks
Monday, the US House of Representatives rejected the draft for support of the financial system, for which it would have had to spend up to $700 billion (nearly 12 bilions of Kcˇ).
The legislators thus refused to support President George Bush's call to the project.
According to Bush, the project should solve the main causes of the financial crisis and to help stabilize the economy as a whole.
American shares suffered a bloodbath on Monday and the main indices of stocks experienced their largest fall in the last 20 years.
The Dow Jones index lost nearly seven percent, following a fall unseen since 1987.
The index was already falling during the vote, but when it became apparent that the proposal was not adopted, it was in free fall.
The Congress agreed that the government of the United States could inject $700 billion into banks
The leaders of the US Congress and the government of President George W. Bush agreed on a greater accordance of the financial assistance to the US financial system.
It will be put to the vote early next week.
American legislators made a turning point in the talks on the adoption of a rescue plan in the form of financial aid of  700 billion dollars (about 12 billion kroner), given to the US financial system.
Success is not so sure.
Indeed, to publish the final version of the law and submit it to the vote, the Congressmen must concur on a number of details of the agreement.
Terms of the support of the financial system will be examined on Monday in the House of Representatives.
Said the chairman of the committee of the banking and financial regulation of the House on Sunday to Reuters Barney Frank.
According to sources, on Wednesday at the earliest, the plan should supposedly be put to the vote in the Senate.
According to economists, the announcement of the fact that the rescue plan will be adopted is going to be a first major psychological factor to revive the financial markets.
However, given the complexity of the mechanism by which the aid to the markets can be put into effect, a "disappointment" will follow .
Paulson: The plan must be effective
"We have made great progress.
We have resolved our differences of opinion on the form that the scheme of action to stabilise the market must take," the democrat Nancy Pelosi confided to the Agency Bloomberg.
According to her the final vote could be made by Sunday.
On Saturday evening, representatives of legislators met the US Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, in order to give a final form to the government fund.
Property which cannot be sold is a great liability to financial firms and threates the entire system. These should be bought by it from financial companies.
"We are about to agree on a plan that will work and be equally effective on the market.
We need to continue with the recovery plan for the markets, but we're there," said Paulson
A signal to the Asian trade
The global financial crisis has a significant impact on the falling stock markets.
According to Democrat Senator Harry Reid, legislators are working so that Congress will arrive at a final agreement by Sunday.
They thus want to calm investors before the start of trade on the Asian financial markets, which are located in the first time zone, where the decision of Congress could affect trade on Monday.
For now, however, it is impossible to say with certainty when the two chambers of the US Congress will come to a vote, or if the negotiations will not be blocked, at the last moment by some unforseen problem.
Lawmakers hope that it will be adopted during the coming days.
However, the law will still undergo many changes.
The total amount of aid to the system should be divided into two parts.
The first $350 billion, as was the wish of President George Bush, must be available as soon as possible.
But, if Congress feels that the programme is not successful, it has the right to block the remaining grant, following two stages: first with the additional $100 billion, then, finally, 350 billion dollars.
Mr Bush was happy with the progress in the negotiations
Although the President can veto this decision, Congress has the right to put it in a minority.
Despite these changes, the main idea of the programme, which was to obtain finance to buy bad mortgage securities, whose value had fallen because hundreds of thousands of Americans were unable to pay their mortgages, was maintained.
"All the work is done.
The House of Representatives should be able to proceed with the vote of the law on Sunday, and the Senate on Monday," the Republican Senator Judd Gregg hinted.
The US President George Bush himself is glad of progress in the negotiations.
His spokesman Tony Fratto said that Mr Bush was pleased with the progress made on Saturday and appreciated "the joint effort to stabilize our financial markets and protect our economy".
Limitation of golden parachutes
Christopher Dodd chief negotiator and the president of the banking commity of the Senate, said that lawmakers have agreed on the responsibility of the financial programme, the protection of aid against losses, the agreement of relief, and the punctual effeciveness of the plan.
The new law also seeks to limit the so-called golden parachutes for the managers of companies participating in the programme and it will establish a committee, which will ensure the supervision of the funds.
It should be managed by the Ministry of Finance.
"We have worked very hard on the issue and have made significant progress towards an agreement that will work and will be effective in the market and for all Americans," said Paulson.
The plan also includes aid for property owners, who have problems to pay.
The government should negotiate new advance in the case of mortgages that it will buy, while reducing payments of debtors and allowing them to keep their homes.
Marek: A psychological help
According to the chief economist of Patria Finance David Marek, the plan is a good idea, but its implementation will be very difficult.
"And this is because we do not know what will be the mechanism and the price of buying assets.
This will be crucial to decide on the sharing of losses between the financial sector and the government," said Marek to the server iHNed.cz. this week.
It is not so important if the plan will be adopted now, or early next week,  according to Marek
"It is much more important that the congressmans agree this week, that they support the plan and will devote themselves to it as soon as possible.
The psychological importance of the agreement, signaling the adoption of the plan, is the most important thing at the moment," stressed Marek.
A fight taken to extremes: MP3 players versus mobile phones.
We advise you on how to make a choice.
While virtually all mobile can read MP3 files, no MP3 player can make phone calls.
It seems to be clear that it is better to buy a phone.
But that does not mean that there are plenty of reasons to buy an MP3 player independently.
The choice depends entirely on the mode of use and requirements of the future owner.
It would be absurd to buy an expensive and high-end gramophone for the house to play the new album of Maxim Turbulenc.
To begin with, such music does not go on vinyl record, and, from the point of view of quality, there is no objective reason for that to happen, anyway.
But if your shelves are stacked with vinyl records of rock, jazz and blues music, it is more likely that you have dreamt of buying a gramophone.
The same applies to music for travelling, which is normally compressed, in short – MP3 music.
Here, too, there are factors to consider on the basis of price and quality.
For one, it is probably impractical to spend eight thousand kroner for a reader, in the same way as a Pink Floyd fan would find it hard to use headphones bought for twenty kronor at the market.
Two extremes, between which there is enough room for everyone.
The choice is wide.
Battery life is also crucial
Some upmarket music players are capable of much more than just playing music, but these consist mainly of functions different from most mobiles.
No current device is as universal as the mobile phone.
Besides the primary functions of making telephone calls and sending SMS, it is able to read music and films, to record them, to take pictures with a camera of varying quality, and even to serve as a navigation guide.
And taking into account Smartphones and communicators, you have in your pocket a veritable small computer.
Given that no fridge knows how to grill meat nor any television how to take photographs, we are here in the presence almost of a miracle.
The universal nature of the mobile is not without problems.
The more functions you use, the lower the average expected battery run.
And the music player is one of the most power-hungry applications.
Mobile phones which are able to play music for ten to twelve hours are rare. In most cases, this figure is much lower.
In this respect, music players (even the most rudimentary ones) are much more efficient.
Count on cheap mobile phones playing music for not much more than a few hours.
It will be necessary from time to time, just to be sure, to make a second charge for work - this being the case even for more expensive devices.
This should be no problem for MP3 players, even the cheaper ones of which are able to operate for 9 hours on a single charge.
Another problem occurs while recording music on a mobile.
Unfortunately, only a few have a universal USB connector, because not all can be directly connected to the computer, without a special software.
We can, of course, record music directly onto the memory card, but few card readers know how to deal with them, given the tiny dimensions of memory cards used in mobile.
As regards MP3 plays, with the exception of the iPod, you don't need any software.
It is enough to fill the device directly from the computer, through the USB connector.
Most mobiles and MP3 players will themselves create a media library classified according to the name of the artist, the title of the album, genre, or according to the user's criteria.
Some devices have a single structure resembling that of an indexed tree, following the way of Windows Explorer, while others are capable of two (iriver, Samsung, Sony, Cowon, and smartphones with operating system).
MP3 players are easier to use, while mobiles need more expert knowledge.
In the choice of a device, look especially for battery life, memory capacity, quality and output of sound, and of course, the user interface.
If music is for you, essentially, a background noise and if during the day you will listen to it for a limited time, for example while taking the tram, you only need any mobile capable of reading MP3s.
Almost all mobile are now capable of this.
You needn't even pay too much attention to the music formats that the mobile or the MP3 player is able to read.
All are able to read MP3 and the vast majority of music that you will own will precisely be in this format.
It is one of the most widespread formats and besides it, the vast majority of devices are also able to read music in WMA format.
AAC (the format used by Apple and its iPods), meanwhile, is less current.
High-end mobiles also allow, for example, the purchase of music online.
Songs can be bought by simply visiting the web pages of the operator (or those of another source) from the mobile device, and buying it.
This service alone should be a compelling enough reason to buy a mobile with music playing capabilites.
The choice of operators is unfortunately miserable and is limited, in most cases, to radio tubes.
Prices are not the lowest.
However, it is generally believed that this way to buy music (either by GSM, Internet, or by wireless Internet) will dominate the music industry in the future.
Most people carry their mobiles with them at all times.
Every time you want to hear something, you just have to get your the mobile out from your pocket, whereas you may have forgotten your MP3 player at home.
But it is also important if you are always carrying headphones or a handsfree with connection.
If not, you can use the integrated bodies that virtually all mobiles have, but very few MP3 players.
For many, the main advantage of mobile phones that play music is their prices.
The cheapest normally cost less than three thousand.
For a price of three or four thousand kronor, one can buy a very decent walkman.
But in most cases, you will be limited by the absence of standard output for headphones.
The price of the best equipped telephones, which also come with a standard connector for headphones, does not exceed 15 000.
MP3 players, however, have the advantage of having easy controls.
Virtually anybody can master the controls of the most rudimentary MP3 players - which do not necessarily correspond to the cheapest (see our choice).
A minimum of functions and the resemblance to the controls on a cassette player commonly used in the past, or gramophone, is obvious.
There is no risk of unwitting use of mobile Internet, followed by an astronomical bill of data transmission.
Which device to choose
Even the cheapest mobile phones (for example The Vodafone 527) generally have a hot-swappable memory card slot (the type M2, microSD, etc.).
Even taking into account the additional purchase of such a card, you will not exceed two thousand kronor.
But be careful.
The basic models in principle do not support cards with memory exceeding 2 GB.
Only the most expensive ones support 8 GB cards.
If you already have a mobile and want to buy a cheap MP3 player, go for a Cowon, a Creative, a Sony, a Samsung, a Emgeton, or an iriver.
Depending on the capacity (Max. 2 GB), you should not spend more than 1 100 kronor.
If you belong to a group of more demanding listeners, go for a specialized mobile-walkman (Sony Ericsson, or some Nokia and Samsung).
These devices have dedicated music player buttons, and consequently have ease of use closer to that of a regular MP3 player.
Sony Ericsson, whose mobile-walkman series walkman have the same menu as MP3 players, is the most advances in this domain.
The same service, in the same price category, but with a greater capacity of memory (up to 16 GB) and a better battery life (normally between 15 to 35 hours), is guaranteed by an MP3 player produced by one of the companies mentioned above.
A virtual operator will win the Czech Republic this year.
Perhaps
The mobile market in the Czech Republic is relatively advanced. Our operators propose virtually the same services as their partners in western Europe.
Despite this, something is still missing - a virtual operator, which would force the traditional operators to lower prices.
It may be that it will not have to wait for long.
We have already raised the issue repeatedly on Mobil.cz, the fact that the Czech operators are some of the most expensive in Europe.
The CˇTÚ (The Czech Office of telecommunications), which pointed out that the price of an SMS here was higher than in the rest of the Union, has confirmed the fact.
So, following the latest step of the European Commission in the field of the regulation of roaming charges, a paradoxical situation may happen - text-messaging from abroad will be cheaper than in their own country for some customers subscribed to Czech mobile operators.
How is it possible that prices in the Czech Republic are so high, compared with Europe?
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition.
It may sound paradoxical, given that we have three networks and a mobile penetration that far exceeds 100%.
On the contrary, the mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely competetive.
In this, Pavel Dvorˇák, the President of the Council of the Czech Office of telecommunications (CˇTÚ), who has repeatedly said that in the Czech Republic there was no room for another operator, is of the same opinion as the operators.
It is probably true that a classic operator with its own network has apparently not much chance (besides it would be difficult to find clients, now).
But there is still a possibility - a virtual operator.
It is precisely the entry of a virtual operators on the mobile market that has led to a considerable reduction in prices, which subsequently led to similar reactions from the traditional operators.
Yet, even before the entry of operators such as Tesco Mobile or Virgin Mobile on the market, names similar to those heard at home are being heard in Britain.
However, it became clear that there was room for such operators and that they could have a real success.
We do not have to look too far to find examples.
In February we were informed of the launch of the virtual operator Mobilking in Poland.
In six months, the operator has managed to gain more than 100 000 customers and has become the fifth largest operator of the country.
Let us not forget that the financial group Penta supports Mobilking, and, among other things, owns the U: Fon in the Czech Republic
Virtual operators have the advantage of being able to focus on a much more specific target group.
For their operation to be effective, indeed they need far fewer customers than a classic operator.
They are, indeed, free of the relatively high costs of construction, operation and maintenance the mobile network.
That is how the world over, virtual operators are emerging as low cost alternatives - they offer cheap calls and text messages, at the cost of a limited supply of services.
For example Tesco Mobile in Britain offers SMS that are at least two times cheaper than its competitors.
However, as shown by the example of Mobilking in Poland, investing in an unusual target group can also be a good advertisment stunt.
Indeed, this operator targets men in particular.
"The real men choose Mobilking - an operator which satisfies them, and that they can trust," said David Seibert, the CEO of Mobile Entertainment Company, which is exploiting this virtual operator.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to work at home.
Miroslav Cˇepicky´, the spokesman for Vodafone, has his doubts: "The Czech market is relatively small for a segmentary approach, which is the basis for most virtual operators.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the offer of services. "
In the Czech Republic, no chance, say the mobile operators
But it seems quite clear that if there will be a virtual operator in the Czech Republic, it will not be Mobilking.
"We are discussing the expansion of this project towards success, but in the Czech Republic the negotiations are not very promising.
The launch of Mobilking will instead take place in other countries in the region, " said Jana Studnicˇková, spokesman for the financial group Penta in a telephone interview for Mobil.cz
It has thus been indirectly confirmed that operators in the Czech Republic, in any case, did not support the idea.
On the contrary, they are trying to do everything possible to avoid the appearance of a potential competitor.
GTS Novera the group, which would like to take a step towards becoming a real competitor to Telefonika in the field of client enterprise, has not been hiding for a while now, its intention to launch a virtual mobile operator.
"We are very keen to offer our clients not only fixed telecommunications services, but mobile as well.
And the sooner the better.
We have already had negotiations several times with all the Czech mobile operators about the possibility.
With some, we have managed to make progress in the negotiations, "said the spokesman of the Pavel Kaidl group.
Thus, the future is perhaps promising.
According to unofficial information, it seems that perhaps we could have the first virtual operator already by the end of the year.
But for the moment, its creation is accompanied by a total silence.
"At the moment, we do not believe that there is room on the Czech market for a virtual operator as such.
The Czech market is very specific in comparison with others.
For the moment, nobody with a complex and serious project plan in this area has contacted us," mentioned Vlastimil Srsˇenˇ of the press Department of Telefonika O2, in its statement for Mobil.cz.
Other operators also refer to the specific nature of the Czech market.
The spokesman for T-Mobile Martina Kemrová says in a rare agreement with the declaration of O2: "We have not seen until now a project that is both viable and bilaterally advantageous, which could serve as a basis."
And she adds: "It is almost impossible for a virtual operator to appear on the T-Mobile network by the end of the year.
To operate in such a limited period of time, we should already have an agreement now. "
Vodafone heads rather its attention on obtaining its own 3G licences.
Miroslav Cˇepicky´ said about this: "We are open to talks with potential virtual operators, especially in the field of shared infrastructure costs.
This is what we think will bring in more customers.
The main strategy of Vodafone in this area is to find a partner to put in place a common network for a fast mobile Internet. "
The authorities responsible: In line with operators
The attitude of mobile operators is easily understandable: the entry of another operator would mean an increase of competition, which would lead to lower prices and thus reduced benefits.
What good then to facilitate the advent of such a competitor?
When it comes to their interests, operators can be as thick as thieves. The chicane accompanying the creation of U: Fon stands witness to the fact.
The greatest pressure on the CˇTÚ, at the time of  U: Fon's creation, was exerted by T-Mobile.
Witness information is available to the public, gleaned from CˇTÚ websites.
Today, however, the U: Fon is ready to support the argument for not accepting a virtual operator.
Martina Kemrová said about this: "Competition on the mobile market was, moreover, recently increased by the entry of a fourth mobile operator to the market.
Given the nature of the mobile market in RT, it is clear that the entry of a new competitor would submit itself, and especially its services, to high demands. "
But given the attitude of mobile operators, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
It is not just about the attitude of CˇTÚ, which, unlike Britain and other developed countries, has unfortunately no power to intervene in the economic competition in the Czech Republic.
It belongs exclusively to the Office for the protection of economic competition (ÚOHS).
However, it adopted its usual position faced with this problem.
"The entry of a virtual operator on the mobile market would be possible following the conclusion of an agreement between a mobile operator and the virtual operator in question about renting the necessary infrastructure.
No such agreement has been reached at the moment, because potential investors have not presented enough interest in the traditional operators, " said Kristián Chalupa of the External Relations Department of ÚOHS in response to our question.
A formulated answer like this is not suprising, coming from the representative of the operators.
But coming from an office, which must represent the interests of consumers and besides other things ensures that no one benefits from its position on the market, such a statement is confusing.
As Kristián Chalupa adds: "Abroad, where virtual operators are normally present, we can see that their entrance to the market has contributed to a fall in the prices of mobile telephone services. "
But pressure in the direction of an honest functioning market and lower prices is apparently not among the interests of ÚOHS.
What is most shocking is the almost concordant view of the three mobile operators, which stems from their reactions.
The question, if it is really a matter of chance, pops up naturally.
Similar to the price of petrol being identical at all service stations is a matter of chance and hard struggle of competition.
"The office has not met with signs of anti-competetive behaviour on this subject, and hence has no reason to intervene in one way or another.
None of the operators has a dominant position, none has therefore a corresponding increased responsibility for its behaviour on the market.
Even the telecommunications regulators lack the tools necessary for the opening of the mobile market to virtual operators," said Chaloupa in his statement.
The interpretation of the dominant market position is one of the many points of contention.
Of course, there is an analysis of relevant markets drawn up by the CˇTÚ according to which the telecommunications are, from the point of view of economic competition, a single market.
None of the Czech operators has a dominant position on such a market.
However, some right wing experts propose a different view of things: for the creation of a virtual operator to be possible, we must obtain, each time, the consent of the network operator.
And the mobile operator has quite logically the monopoly on its network.
That is how it necessarily plays a dominant role in a certain segment of the business.
But even without admitting this argument, it should at least be worrying for the ÚOHS that three mobile operators are clearly proceeding in a similar way.
But the complaints from many interested parties (including the GTS Novera company mentioned earlier) show that they meet with similar constrains in their negotiations with all operators.
To place the blame on the CˇTÚ is a fairly common trick in communications, through which the ÚOHS is washing its hands of the matter.
We have already seen this kind of attitude in several similar cases.
We have not managed to pass the new law on telecommunications, recently adopted, which extends the powers of the CˇTÚ in the field of economic competition in telecommunications, although many specialists promised an improvement in the situation.
This, the representatives of the ÚOHS must very well know, but their interests are apparently elsewhere.
When nobody is watching, it can work
That being said, the operation of a kind of virtual pseudo operators in several mobile networks in the Czech Republic, remains unnoticed.
It is companies publishing their own list price of mobile telephone services, but these are only public in part.
In most cases, it is a question of firms in charge of multi-level marketing.
Specialized mobile telephone services are offered for example by Amway, Bohemia Telecom, Starlife and others.
The lists of price of these firms tend to come to a select few.
The magic trick consists in the fact that the company pretends to be a customer classic company, which commands a large number of SIM cards, for the operator.
As a client is important, it offers special prices (and other benefits).
The problem is that the commercial state of all Czech mobile operators prohibits such a resale.
"If what you suggest happened, it could be a violation of the contractual conditions that we would then examine and could lead to a stop in cooperation with the company in question," responded Martina Kemrová to our question on this issue.
However, it is quite unlikely that an echo of such activity would not reach the managers of the mobile operators.
Especially in the case of the three companies mentioned the number of customers can be in thousands.
No operator, however, is against such a procedure.
Indeed, the activities of these firms brings them considerable profits, and, at the same time, as opposed to a traditional virtual operators, they do not threaten them with their own official marketing scheme.
Miroslav Cˇepicky´ indicates the problems: "The law allows such speculation, however, the services of these companies are used by only a few customers as a percentage.
In addition, they are forced to admit that the SIM card in their phones is not registered in their name, so they cannot own them fully, in the manner of ordinary customers of mobile operators.
But that is precisely what should seem strange to the CˇTÚ.
Moreover, there is another question to the ÚOHS.
If mobile operators turn a blind eye to such a procedure, why block the creation of a virtual operator?
It should be added that the ÚOHS has relatively enough powers to disclose such activity, and if it does not want to settle with the explanations of the operators, who say they had no idea that this would happen, their contractual conditions forbid it.
When we will no longer be the most expensive country
As we have already mentioned several times, the entry of virtual operators on the mobile market has made a significant drop in the price of services.
But in almost all countries where virtual operators appeared , the traditional operators always made an attempt, sometimes more sometimes less, to prevent their creation.
The arguments used by them were virtually the same - a market that was too small and too saturated, problems with the quality of services, etc.
But precisely at this point intervened regulators, in developed countries, who defended not the interests of the mobile operators, but those of their clients.
Both by formal measures and informal pressure, they ended up with the creation of a first virtual operator, which was followed by others.
Unfortunately, the Czech regulators deal with this issue in the way of a hot potato disposed of by passing to the nearest target.
Following the experience, we cannot shake off the impression that the confusion in competences leads to profitable situations for them.
But we must not give up so easily.
If rumours are to be believed and we are indeed to soon witness the creation of a virtual operator, the Czech mobile market could be put in motion again.
If one of the operators accepted the creation of a virtual mobile operator, the ÚOHS will find it difficult to remain impassive faced with the rejection (left to discrimination) of other interested parties.
And perhaps we will cease to call ourselves more expensive than the rest of Europe.
The new Czech anthem has four new versions.
Choose the best
Listen to the four new version of the national anthem.
Sunday, on the occasion of the National Day, the Czech Prime Minister Mirek Topolánek formally presented the new recordings of the national anthem Kde domov mu˚j (Where is my homeland?).
The anthem has again been recorded by the orchestra of the national theatre under the direction of Jirˇí Beˇlohlávek.
We have four versions - one each with solo male or female voices, an interpretation with choir and an instrumental version.
The song is performed by Katerˇina Kneˇzˇínková and Adam Plachetka.
Otakar Jeremiásˇ and Jaroslav Krcˇek are the authors of the arrangements for the anthem.
You can listen to the four new versions on the server iHNed.cz.
Beˇlohlávek considers the Czech national anthem as one of the finest anthems.
As he had already confided to the Cˇesky´ rozhlas (the Czech public radio), he has chosen singers with young and representative voices, which are marked and appreciated, for the interpretation of the solo versions.
"From the beginning, I insisted that the two singers, and the choir, have a clear diction and that they sing simultaneously, so that the words are well understood," he said.
The Czech national anthem will celebrate, next year, its 175th anniversary.
The song Kde domov mu˚j was sung for the first time in 1834 on the planks of the Stavovské divadlo (the theatre of the state) in Fidlovacˇka (cobblers' fair), and was an original Czech composition by Josef Kajetán Tyl, accompanied by the music of Frantisˇek Sˇkroup.
It soon became popular and people spontaneously adopted it.
After the creation of the Tchécoslaovaquie in 1918, the first couplet became a natural part of the national anthem.
It remained as one of the seven national symbols even after the creation of the independent Czech Republic.
How does the 'new' anthem sound?
The common transport agency of Prague (MHD) will introduce, on Wednesday, the chip in their ticketing system
Wednesday 1 October 2008 will noted in the history of Prazˇsky´ Dopravní podnik (the transport agency of Prague) as the date on which passengers in the metro, the trams and buses will have, instead of a ticket on paper, an electronic coupon in their pocket.
At the moment, this service is accessible to nearly a hundred thousand people, owners of the smart card Opencard.
Passengers can buy a coupon valid for 30 days or 90 days (this will be available from 1 January 2009) as well as register their smart card at information points and the offices of Dopravní podnik (the transport agency), located in the underground stations at Muzeum, Mu˚stek, Nádrazˇí Holesˇovice, Andeˇl, Roztyly, Letnˇany, Kobylisy, Rajská zahrada, Kacˇerov and Luka.
Since yesterday, there is also the possibility of buying the voucher over the Internet on the web pages of Dopravní podnik: www.dpp.cz.
More than four hundred people made use of the service during the morning.
Those who will begin to use the shop online can forget once and for all the counters in the underground stations, where they would stand impatiently in long lines in order to obtain tickets on paper.
Indeed, they will buy their coupon by Internet and we will register it on their Opencard cards in one of the thirteen Meˇstská knihovna (municipal libraries).
"At these contact points, a trained member of staff will be at the service of passengers, and will help those who are interested with the online purchase, as well as registering their coupon with their card," said the spokesman of the project Martin Opatrny´.
At the libraries, it will also be possible to register the electronic voucher on the Opencard in vending machines installed in the lobbies of several underground stations.
What do these machines look like?
They are red in colour and remind one of the machines used to punch tickets, and passengers have perhaps already noticed them in the underground stations at Roztyly, Budeˇjovická, I. P. Pavlova, Florenc and Vltavská.
"Today, the city has five, but by the end of the year, there should be eighty," added Opatrny´.
An automaton will monitor the coupon instead of the driver
Vending machines which will operate from tomorrow, are easy to use.
It is enough to insert the Opencard card with the chip and the coupon bought earlier will register itself on the card.
The electronic vouchers are valid from tomorrow not only in the capital, but also in the surrounding areas of the city.
Namely the suburban trains and buses 300-499, which the inhabitants of the Bohemian community essentially use to gain access to the capital.
"In the trains integrated into Prazˇská integrovaná doprava (integrated transports of Prague), supervisors are equipped with card readers, in which they establish the validity of temporal and zonal vouchers," said the master of tickets Filip Drápal of the organisation Ropid, which oversees the time-table of the community transports of Prague.
Suburban buses are equipped with card readers integrated into the driver's till box.
At boarding it is therefore necessary not only to show the smart card to the driver, but also insert the Opencard into the slot on the side of the box.
That's how the driver tests the validity of the registered voucher.
"If the passenger needs to check the validity of the registered voucher, it's as easy as asking the infromation from the driver," said Drápal.
Passengers who do not take the suburban bus and do not recall the date when the validity of their coupon expires, can once more visit the new machines, originally used to record the voucher on their cards.
On the screen of the machine they will find all the information about the validity of their document.
The Sudeten called for a referendum in the US
The Sudeten Germans wanted that Sˇumava National Park be a part of the US in 1945.
It stems from a letter filed in the collections of the Jihocˇeská veˇdecká knihovna (The scientific Library of south Bohemia).
If we cannot be part of Germany or Austria, at least we want to live under the management of the United States of America.
In 1945, some groups of Sudeten Germans were allegedly addressing themselves to the President of the United States with such a desire.
This information stems from, among other things, a letter preserved in a private archive, which is now a part of the the collections of the Jihocˇeská veˇdecká knihovna.
Germans of Cˇesky´ Krumlov ask in the letter, the US president not to allow "sˇumavská zˇupa" (region of forest in Southern Bohemia) - annexed by Hitler under the Munich Agreement - to be made a part of Czechoslovakia.
"We understand the situation and want to be really sure that the words proclaiming that American troops come on German territory not oppressors and enemies, but as liberators," is written in the letter, signed "Persons, who hold the fate of the Sˇumava close to my heart."
Since the rallying to Czechoslovakia promises nothing - by knowing the Czech national character -  but brutality, attitude without consideration, incomprehension, oppression and servitude, the authors of the letter urge the American president to take in his hands the protection of the Sˇumava for now and forever.
"We cannot believe, that you would give the territory to a foreign government, which oppresses and destroys the minorities and has done nothing to aid the victory of the Allies, without taking into account the opinion of its quarter of a million inhabitants," says the letter.
The alleged reason for which the authors cannot sign the letter is the fear of the desire for revenge of "Czech oppressors".
If the US president doubted the opinion of Germans of Sˇumava National Park, he had but to organise, according to the authors of the letter, a vote in the region to establish whether its people wanted to be part of the US, or live under the management of the US.
Although the textual content of the letter, given the current knowledge of post-war history, seems somewhat naive, according to some survivors, it illustrates the expectations of the Sudeten Germans of the time.
Although German Czechs should have foreseen the possibility of their expulsion from the Republic, very few actually accepted it as a real possibility.
Some expected that the US and Britain were going to obtain a certain type of autonomy for the Sudeten.
Other believed that they would simply remain in Czechoslovakia.
The famous Austrian journalist Gustav Chalupa, born in 'Cˇeské Budeˇjovice, confirms this.
During the war, he was, as a German of 'Cˇeské Budeˇjovice, part of the marine forces in the Baltic countries.
When at the end of the war, he was captured by the British and placed in the prisoner of war camps of the region Holstein, dozens of Germans approached him to learn Czech.
"They believed that once home, being Czech would be beneficial to them," said Chalupa.
According to him, none of the Germans prisoners who lived in Czechoslovakia before the war believed that, following the Benesˇ decrees, they would be expelled from the Republic.
You do not think - you pay for it.
An emotional campaign will attack drivers
The most expensive action in Czech history targetting road safety.
A way to characterise the emotional media campaign that the Ministry of Transport has the intention of launching on Wednesday.
The office of the minister Alesˇ Rˇebícˇek thinks it will discourage drivers from dangerous driving.
This campaign costing 150 million will appear on television, radio, cinema, on the Internet, but also on leaflets.
It should discourage drivers from driving fast and of drunk-driving.
But also remind them to wear seat-belts before starting a journey.
It is primarily targeted at the conscience of young drivers, motorcyclists, pedestrians, as well as professional drivers.
What will appear in the spotlight?
Especially personal stories that will attack the emotions.
Witness also the slogan 'bloody" throughout the campaign.
You do not think - you pay for it.
The phrase "You do not think" is inscribed in capital letters on the registration plate.
Then, in a puddle of blood, the phrase 'You will pay'
What should be a symbol for the fact that we can pay with our life for a moment of insufficient attention.
These blips will "haunt" spectators until 2010.
The Ministry has been inspired by similar campaigns in the Anglo-Saxon countries, where we can commonly see images with drastic images of the victims of accidents.
He believes that this will lead to a reduction in the rate of accidents and the number of deaths on the roads of the Czech Republic.
The blips were prepared by the agency Euro RSCG.
The strategy of sugar and the whip against drivers
"What works with drivers is the system of sugar and the whip.
For them, sugar is represented by, for example, the time they save when they skip a red light.
The whip is the threat of fines or an accident.
Drivers should be reminded of the risks," said Martin Korˇán, the Transport psychologist at the Na Homolce hospital.
That is how we need information campaigns in the press and above all negative advertisements, believes the psychologist.
Signs pointing out the danger to drivers are, according to him, already less effective.
"When a static panel which warns against a danger is installed, it will probably quickly merge with the environment and the drivers will not notice it any more," said Korˇán.
Olmert would return almost all the occupied territories in exchange for peace
Ehud Olmert, the president of the stand-in government of Israel, ruled in favour of the return of almost all the territories occupied in 1967, including the West Bank and East Jerusalem and the Golan Heights, in exchange for peace with the Palestinians and Syria.
He made that statement in an interview published Monday by the Yedioth Ahronoth newspaper.
"We need to reach an agreement with the Palestinians, which means that it will be necessary to return almost all the territories (occupied), if not all," said Olmert on a daily basis.
"We will keep a certain potrion of the territory, but we must give the Palestinians a similar portion (of Israeli territory), since otherwise, peace will not happen," he added.
He admitted that the restitution could possibly include East Jerusalem.
"Anyone who wants safety in Jerusalem, and especially does not want that tractors and bulldozers crush their feet, as happened to one of my best friends, must renounce parts of Jerusalem," noted Olmert referring to the two attacks in the city, in July, where several people were killed and dozens were injured.
According to the prime minister, it will be necessary to find "a special solution to the Temple Mount, the sacred and historical sites" located within the old city.
"Anyone who wants to maintain Israeli sovereignty on the whole city will be forced to integrate 270 000 Arabs.
It will not work, "he stressed.
Retirement from the Golan Heights
Olmert also ruled in favour of retirement of Israel from the Golan Heights, which is, according to him, a prerequisite for the conclusion of a peace agreement with Syria.
But that would require also some efforts from Damascus.
"I do not propose to make peace with Syria solely on the basis of a retreat from the Golan Heights," he said.
"The Syrians know very well what they will have to give up to get the Golan Heights.
They will have to give up their current relations with Iran; they will have to give up their relationship with Hezbollah (Shiite movement); they will have to abandon the constant supports they give to terrorism of Hamas (Shiite movement), Al-Kaïda (terrorist network), as well as to Jihad (holy war) in Iraq, " said the Prime Minister.
Issues that arise after the accident: Were the stewards in the car illegal?
The law is ignoring them; walking on a long-distance journey car is prohibited.
In the context of the tragic accident of the coach of the  Student Agency society near Padua, Italy, raises the question whether stewards and passengers can move within the coach during the journey.
"If we wanted to respect the law strictly and formally, the activity of a steward is against the law on the road," said the spokesman for the Ministry of Transport Karel Hanzelka.
The accident in question, during which a stewrdess aged 22 years died, was apparently caused by a lorry driver who crossed the path of the coach.
The girl was at the moment, unfortunately, seated next to the driver, on the most dangerous seat in the vehicle, although she had the choice of sitting in any of two other seats.
But the coach can have an accident or brake suddenly at a time when the steward serves coffee or distributes newspapers.
What matters is whether the coach is equipped with a technical sheet that states which ones are standing places and which aren't.
If this equipment for standing places is not approved, passengers must remain seated.
Long distance coaches of the Student Agency don't have standing place, a fact which has been confirmed in Aktuálneˇ.cz by the director of the company Radim Jancˇura.
"It is a question that we have dealt with the Ministry and, at the beginning, it prohibits any movement of passengers.
Then they ammended it to allow passengers to go to the toilet during the journey on condition that they have their own seat, " he revealed his position.
The law ignores the steward
"There is no clear legal interpretation of the role of steward - no legal prescription deals with this role.
On the other hand, no legal prescription prohibits carriers from offering services.
The law on road transport is only concerned with terms of the recipient of a vehicle; it does not define his rights and duties, " adds the spokesman Hanzelka with more ambiguity.
Josef Pokorny´, the director of the Department of road traffic, believes that the law deals sufficiently with the problem.
"Everything depends on whether the coach has in its approval, permission to propose standing places.
All depends on it, "he says.
Coaches are divided into three categories: urban, where there are standing places and a maximum speed limited, inter-urban with standing places and a higher speed limit and long distances coaches without standing place with the maximum speed limit and seats equipped with seat belts.
As in a plane, said an expert
Jaroslav Horˇín, an expert of BESIP (safety of road traffic) on safety in transport, does not see the displacement of stewards on board as a major problem.
"During a regular traffic, there is no risk. The situation can be compared to that of service in aircraft.
As in the case with an aircraft it is not clear when turbulence will strik and an air hostess could bang her head. "
"In cases where the coach would have braked suddenly, the laws of physics would obviously be valid.
In the same way as in a city bus or in a tram.
The carrier must manage the safety of the stewards by internal regulations, "he says, and also think that from the point of view of the law, the problem is not resolved.
Jancˇura is prepared to remove these services
Student Agency is the only carrier coach services to offer stewards onboard.
It has two hundred of them recruited.
Even after the accident, the director does not consider their job as a risky job.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
Passengers can receive their coffee and their newspaper upon boarding.
It would reduce the costs," he says.
The security concerns are the reason that explains the absence of stewards on board its vehicles said the director of the Asiana Litvine Alexei, which ensures, compared with SA, a very small number of lines.
"We have not stewards. We objected to it from the beginning.
Sooner or later it will eventually a fatal accident," he said, a year ago, to Ty´den.cz.
A great tragedy occurs
A young stewardess from the Plzenˇ region, who had been working for the company for two years, has died in the accident on the Naples line.
A Slovenian lorry which was probably leaving a hard shoulder without using indicator lights must have blocked the path of the coach.
The driver of the coach tried to avoid it by swerving hard, but still grazed the right side of the lorry.
Jancˇura denies that the two seats reserved for stewards had been sold.
"In the case of long-distance journeys, it is not possible to reserve these places; they are blocked."
The company wants to bring charge against the lorry driver.
For compensating the girl's family, the agency will not wait for the judgment of the Court, and as far as the financial compensation is concerned, it is also counting on the culprit to pay.
A change in the law?
Not in sight
A change in the law, which is being drafted, for more than a now by a group of 30 experts of the Transport Ministry, could provide clarifications on the movement of stewards on board a bus.
"However, it has not led to any conclusion on this point.
In fact, it is not so much interested by the bus itself, but rather by the points system, the maximum speed on the motorway and the use of mobile phones while driving," said the expert Horˇín.
"The Ministry of Transport does not consider the activity of stewards as something that would fundamentally endanger the safety of passengers," concludes the spokesman Hanzelka, by saying that the control of security on board coaches is under the power of the police and the office for safety at work.
The hopes of the people of Düsseldorf rest on Frankfurt.
The big words were not lacking in the letter from the chairing committee of WestLB to employees of the house.
By a union of the bodies of the financial institution of Düsseldorf with the Deka Bank in Frankfurt, "the central institution of the financial markets of the financial group of the Sparkasse" could be formed, according to the letter made public on Monday.
WestLB would bring a "competence block" doubled by a durable productivity in such a case.
In short, such a relationship could be the decisive impetus to other concentrations in the Länder banks sector.
This is what it is like when a directorial committee wants to demonstrate its ability to act in difficult times.
Because WestLB, injured, is under heavy pressure.
It is not just the European Commission, but also the Federal Services for Authority Surveillance which have, only recently, made it clear to the government of the Land of Rhenanie North-Westphalia that the time was running out in the search for a solution for the future.
A relationship of any kind between the Deka bank, which knows its customers on the basis of their investment funds, and WestLB, has been questioned for some time now, even by Frankfurt.
The head of the Deta-Bank Franz Waas said during the presentation of the figures of the semester ending August that he saw no sense in the merger of the house of the Mainzer Landstrasse with a bank of Land, the Helaba or WestLB.
However the board of directors of Deka, of which each half is supported both by Länder banks as well as groups of savings funds, has charged the directorial commity to initiate talks with WestLB for common commercial activities.
It could be start the flow of the financial market, or parts of it.
The talks, however, have only begun, according to sources in the financial centre.
This is not the first time that the Deta-Bank, which, with its 3,000 employees, counts as one of the largest employers in the financial centre of Frankfurt, comes into play when it should be consolidating the sector of the coffers savings.
In 2003 we thought for a moment that the Deta-Bank could merge with the bank of the Land of Rhineland Palatinate and Halbab.
Nothing however came out of this ternary display.
Barely had the plans been made public that the government of the Hessen proclaimed itself against any participation with the Hellaba in these matters.
Later, the other two houses fell at odds as well.
The bank of the Land of Rhineland Palatinate was attached in its place to the bank from Baden-Wuttenberg in Stuttgart.
But there nevertheless new negotiations on the reunification of the Deka-Bank with the Länder banks.
Finally, Günther Merl, chairman of the directorial committee of the Hellaba,  voted against any business strategy involving a merger with his bank.
Regardless of this, the feeling that mergers between the various institutions of the public sector is especially urgent is spreading.
Now that the election in Parliament of the Land of Bavaria is over, a union of BayernLB with the bank from Baden-Wuttenberg could be seen very soon.
For the Helaba, this is not particularly good news.
If the pressure which requires new mergers were to increase, it could see potential partners gradually slipping away from it.
In the South, it will be from now on a junior partner, although it has so far resisted the crisis better than the banks of Munich and Stuttgart.
The savings and transfers of Hesse-Thuringia, which holds 85 percent of the capital of the Helaba, however has drawn a lock at the beginning of the year on any union with WestLB.
It rests on the rigour of NordLB.
Such geo-strategic thoughts, however, reveals only one of the sides.
Another facet raises the question of how the various business models of each of these banks can match.
In June, Merl said that the decisive question, namely through what business model the viability of the future of Länder banks was to be guaranteed, had not previously been determined by the German grouping of savings and transfers.
At the end of this, a butchering of WestLB could take place, a butchering which here is obviously not desired.
It is also the issue of contention in the letter of the current directorial committee: in all eventualities, a 'global solution' for the establishment will be aimed for.
How this will all be lumped together with the union of certain entities with the Deta-Bank remains to be seen.
The second weekend of the beer festival is also known as the weekend of Italy.
For Elena, this is the first time, for Luca already the third or fourth time.
But this time, Elena accompanied him as his sweetheart, and therefore there is nothing like it, he says.
Behind them, near a barrel of five litres of beer of the Kaiser brand, is a well built bearded man who shows to approximately 200 visitors to the beer festival what deep sounds his throat can produce.
Elena first claps Luca, then embraces him.
They came to Verona all the way from Bologna.
From bus station near the station at Puorta Nueva, four bus start this evening at 11.45 p.m., and are expected to arrive at 6h30: 'destinazione Monaco, Festa della birra,'
Three buses are reserved for Italians, and in one of the busses only Brazilians travel.
In a corner of the car park, the Latin Americans sing of gold alongside their flag; they have already celebrated last night.
And this isn't noisy for the Italians, explains Marco Guarda.
The buses belong to Marco, who wears a long overcoat lined with fake fur and large silver rimmed spectacles.
For five years, they have been going to the beer festival, and have already made three trips this year.
They go at night, remain the whole day at the festival and return at 10.30 p.m.
Staying the night would involve unnecessary costs, explains Marco.
The journey costs 75 euros, including the welcome pot of Kaiser beer brewed according to the law of Bavarian purity, insurance and a responsible for the group speaking German - Marco has taken a language courses in Frankfurt.
And already buses drive into the night in the 'Autostrada Brennero direction.
There is no beer, not anymore.
Quickly, everything becomes calm in the bus as the passengers sleep.
It is better for this way, as they will still need their strength.
Breaks will be made at Bressanone, and Holzkirchen, while many other busses with Italian registrations plates will again make a short stop shortly before Munich, on the motorway 8.
When Marco's group finally arrives at the parking lot near the place Thérèse in the morning at 6h30 as scheduled, almost 50 other bus from all across Europe are already here.
Elena, Luca and others come together, Marco makes a last speech and explains the plan of attack.
Firstly: wear the small yellow hat.
Below and to the left is written 'Been Festival', in Gothic, and alongside it is the internet address of Marco's travel agency: "conoscersiviaggiando.it '".
Secondly: 'When the doors of the beer tent open, we run for ir,' cries Marco in the early morning.
Run! Run to reserve the seats at the far end of the tent.
Not in front, because that way we create a block, and not all the yellow caps on the same benches, we must distribute them in the hall! '
A tankard, cries Marco, costs 8.25 euros.
And do not forget the deposit.
Show the security guards that we are well behaved!
As soon as you leave your seats, they are gone! '
Thirdly: 'This evening, be back here at half past ten sharp! Is that understood?!
And that's it, it's go to the festival of beer.
On the road, someone nails yellow hats to the trees, the signs and even an election poster of a large Bavarian People's Party, so as to easily find the return path.
one must be ready for the return.
This is the second weekend of the beer festival, known as the 'weekend of Italians'.
There are no precise figures: we are talking about 50 000 people who make their way through the Alps and drown themselves in tankards of beer.10 percent of visitors would have specially come from Italy this weekend.
The police of Munich is reinforced by seven policemen of South Tyrol, by the Italian rescue volunteers who bear the Bavarian Red Cross making a statistic on the countries where the Italians occupy the first place before the British (60 interventions) and the Austrians (approximately 80) with nearly 200 medical interventions in all.
The one which is most appreciated by Italians, is the tent of the brewery Hofbräu.
Nights of insomnia for shareholders of Hypo Real Estate
The German banking system is relatively stable, insisted the Federal Finance Minister only a few weeks ago.
What chance that the politician used the word relatively and also slipped that the German banker would not be saved by the movements of crisis.
It is indeed what took place this weekend.
The real estate financier Bavarian Hypo Real Estate (HRE), from the DAX side, obtains credit of a billion to protect themselves from economic turbulence from a consortium of German banks.
A person aware of the situation said to Reuters on Monday that the aid commitments were EUR 35 billion.
The Hypo Real Estate must from now on pay interest on a fraction to what it has the right.
The money comes from private banks as well as from banks in the public sector.
In the background, is the dependant society Depfa which bears the losses.
The state financier had, according to a newspaper article, refinanced itself in a very short term for projects in the long term for which it had borrowed money - which is no longer possible given the distrust towards the markets.
In the first half of 2008, the reserve of liquidity of the bank had been reduced to 95 percent of 2.37 million euros, the rate of capital also had declined slightly to 1,45 from 1.6 percent.
The benefits and net profits coming from financial transactions were, compared to the same period last year, zero, while the profits from the allocation of debt securities and and the termination of provisions in the operations of credit had fallen by more than 70 percent to 5 million.
And it is only thanks to the important benefits of the reimbursement of costs of accounting downstream from the restructuring of the former group Depfa, as well as the interest payments, according to the tax book procedures and commercial procurement for companies of Konzern that the deficit of the gains of about 16 percent has proven to be moderate.
After its privatisation in 1990, the former state financier had first of all badly speculated on industrial real estate loans, which then had been affiliated with the bank Aareal.
Because the state financier was not sufficiently profitable, the Depfa then committed itself more to infrastructure projects and in the funding of projects in common between private investors and the State (Privat-Public-Partnership, PPP) and diversified internationally.
On the value of the dependant society, the Hypo Real Estate must proceed with amortization which should have a real effect on the calculation of gains and losses, but which still remains unclear.
The fact is that dividends have been cut.
Already for 2007, they had been cut by two thirds.
The Hypo Real Estate, since the takeover of the Depfa, has been a highly important investor of state and infrastructure.
It is more robust than other institutes dependent on refinancing from the inter-bank market since it has no customer deposits.
With the collapse of the investment bank Lehman Brothers two weeks ago, the allocation of appropriations between banks has again been delayed significantly, the banks having accumulated their liquidity.
The Hypo Real Estate needs about 50 billion euros annually of the global appropriations of Depfa as a means of short term refinancing.
According to a statement from the Hypo Real Estate, the need to finance the group is covered by the medium-term credit and the company being protected from the influence of the international financial markets which is largely outside the current jurisdiction of the state.
Other sources say that the refinancing would be provided through the funds until the end of 2009.
The chairman of the directorial committee of HRE Mr Funke explained that the group Hypo Real Estate should not have to resort to the financial markets in the mid term.
The Federal Reserve and the Federal Institution for the Surveillance of the Financial Services (Bafin) assume that the ability of the Hypo Real on the market is now guaranteed.
Shareholders and creditors of the bank have nothing more but to hope.
However, in view of the dynamics and unpredictability of the crisis, there is no certainty.
It is not unthinkable that one will have to resort to financing in full spread.
But the opposite must not be ruled out.
After the fact that the bank is, according to the latest reports, at the gates of insolvency as of Sunday evening, this rescue measure will not be able to reassure people either.
Share price fell by 75 percent to EUR 3.30.
The course of the obligations, however, are going particularly well.
While the primary debts have barely budged, the secondary loans are flagging.
Most affected are investment funds of the old dependant society Württemberg Hypo and those of course that have a life beyond 2009.
The obligations of the Hypo Real Estate bank appeared to be an alternative investment of speculation, now their value should be seen as dependent on the stability of the international banking system after the tightening of the banking crisis and the crisis in the same institution that has brought the crisis in the company by its takeover of the bank Depfa.
As long as the less affected issuing bodies, governments and commercial banks are still prepared to support the system, we can assume a reduction of arrears on time.
Otherwise something will happen that no one would hope for at the moment - that the financial crisis can be overcome in 15 months.
But with the renewed noise of a partial nationalisation, the likelihood that approached certainty has now become a mere hope.
This should particularly bring nights of insomnia to long term creditors on the decision of whether they should secede from their commitments or not.
Short-term investors can still use an automatically taken postponement of losses for the next few years on the next income tax capital stock market gains.
Sylvana and the secrets of Bento's box
When Sylvana Hiltrop, 16 years old, must be present for the first day of Highschool at Tachibana, girls are giggle at her: The German is so "kawaii '!
What does it mean?
Sylvana already know that word thanks to Mangas - in her new exchanges Log, she speaks of Japan.
"The first day of courses in Japan.
How excited I was.
I was already afraid on my way to school.
I live on the outskirts of Tokyo in the direction of Kawasaki and I take the train which takes me 40 minutes to get to Tachibana Highschool.
I had to find the way by myself. Fortunately I didn't get lost.
The beginning of classes does not seem to be as strict as back home in Lower Saxony.
Pupils arrive one after the other from eight o'clock, until eight forty, when the Professor begins a round of the 'home' room.
But before the classes began, it was up to me to introduce myself.
I am not at all of the kind of person who loves speak to people, particularly in front of a class of 40 pupils.
As I didn't yet have the school uniform, I wore an old skirt of my mother, a shirt, blue rising socks and black leather shoes.
In this outfit I presented myself in front of the desk, and tried to pronounce everything correctly: 'Sayonara Wo She Sylvana...' - my name is Sylvana, I come from Germany and my birthday is in a week.
At the time, I was very pleased to have begun to learn the language two years ago.
The 31 girls of the class all whispered, stiffled laughs and made signs, and I clearly heard the word 'Kawaii'.
I already knew the word thanks to my mangas.
It is an essential part of Japanese teenage vocabulary and means "cute".
Then I quickly crept back into my place.
The girl next to me gave me big ironic smile, she found it an honour that the new girl should sit next to her.
The rest of the hour was relatively quiet, but when the gong rang, I was assailed in the hallway.
Everyone spoke at once, stiffled laugha and asked a lot of questions - in this case, it was quite difficult to understand Japanese English.
During the break, they then took out their Bentos.
My host mother had also made me this kind of Lunchbox - it's really something other than its miserable German counterpart.
I had rice with aromatic herbs, small sausages, a salad of cucumber and algae, fruit and a kind of meat covered by tofu.
Most of the time, I have no idea what I eat exactly here in Japan.
Things have a bizarre appearance and a completely new taste.
What is certain is that everything is really good.
Well, except perhaps the candied salted plums, brrrr!
The Bentos are not only lunches in Japanese schools.
Sometimes a girl offers a boy a Bento she has prepared herself, with particular care, in the hope of being able to know the boy a little better during the break.
I read it in my mangas.
I am curious to know if I could see this here as well.
"Why Japan in particular?" my friends asked me when I told them that I wanted to spend a year at school in Tokyo.
I always responded:
"Because it fascinates me,"
Truth to speak, reading mangas is what I love best for some years now.
And to better understand the mangas and their culture, at some point of time I also began to learn Japanese.
For me, it was clear that I had to travel there some day.
Because I have also a weakness for traditions, customs and habits.
And here, they give them a lot of importance.
On the one hand, Japan is the country of technology and the latest trends, on the other hand, it is tough, disciplined and traditional.
And as everything is so well organised I never felt lost here, even if Tokyo is the largest city that I have ever seen. "
Rats also have sensations
If a rat or a cockroach flees from danger, does that mean that it also feels fear?
The neurophysicien Joseph LeDoux is convinced that many animals also have sensations.
But how can we ensure that it has the same feelings when it behaves in the same way as we do?
In the online magazine "Edge", contributions by famous scientists are being published for several years.
Spiegel Online presents answers to the question in a series of articles  "What do you think is true without evidence?"
I believe that animals have sensations and other states of consciousness, without me or anyone else having been able to prove it, just as we cannot prove that other human beings have a consciousness.
But in this case, we can at least hope that all human brain have the same configuration.
As soon as we turn to other species and that we address the issues of feeling or in general of consciousness, we are moving into difficult terrain because the hardware is not correspondant.
When a rat is a danger, it does the same as many other animals: plays dead, flees or attacks.
People behave similarly, which is why some scientists deduce a similar subjective experience.
However, I do not think so.
Two aspects of the structure of our brain make the transposition of our subjective experience to that of animals difficult.
One aspect is that the circuits associated with almost all human consciousness include the Perifrontal Lateral Coretx (from the fact of its participation in short-term memory and functions of direction and execution).
This vast region is much more developed in humans than in other primates and appears to be entirely absent among other species.
At least for these aspects of our conscience which depend on the prefrontal cortex, including the consciousness of who we are, and the ability to predict and decide, it is reasonable to assume that human beings are different even from other primates.
Another significant feature may lie in the linguistic nature of Man: A large part of his existence is related to language, which means that his consciousness often depends on it.
In this case, we could exclude animals.
But even if consciousness does not depend on the language, it is surely influenced by it, so that animal consciousness, in whatever way it is produced, is probably very different from most of our states of consciousness.
That is why it is also difficult to determine what may be consciousness among other animals.
If that, internally and subjectively, cannot be measured and, because of the particular nature of the hardware, be analysed based on our own experience, then its observation raises some serious problems.
Most of my developments refer to the contents of conscious, but there is also another aspect of awareness that should be more easily accessible scientifically.
We could examine the animal process of consciousness without taking into account its content, and that is exactly what happened during the studies on short-term memory of primates, particularly with the example of sight.
But in this approach which Christof Koch and Francis Crick followed, one focuses more on the nervous correlations of consciousness than on causal mechanisms: the two may or may not be identical.
Curiously, this approach also highlights the importance of the prefrontal cortex in the phenomenon of sight.
But what does that mean for the emotions?
I conclude that an emotional system such as the fear is activated in a brain aware of its own activity.
What we call as "fear" is therefore the mental state in which we find ourselves when the activity of the localised defence system in the brain (or its consequences, as the reactions of the body) absorbs live memory.
Observed from this point of view, emotions are closely linked to the regions of the cortex that characterise primates and especially Man.
Of the subtle degrees of feeling, associated with our volubile nature, emerges, because we have the ability, with the help of words and grammar, differentiations and categorisations of the state to put the blame on others.
On the opposite side, Antonio Damasio for example believes that the sensations resultant from primitive activities are born in the areas of the corporeal feeling of the cortex and the core of the brain, like Jaak Pankseep who focuses more on the just the core of the brain.
As the network has not changed much over the course of human evolution, it could by all means participate in horizontal sensations of all kinds.
On a purely theoretical perspective, I cannot contradict him, but I believe that it cannot be proven.
Pankseep argues that what is fear among humans and rats is probably also felt the same way in both cases: how could anyone check whether rats and humans feel the same thing when they behave in a similar way?
A cockroach flees before danger, but does it feel fear?
In my view, similar behavious is not enough to prove similar experience.
Of course, the nervous comparison helps: rats and humans have similar brain cores, cockroaches on the other hand don't even possess a brain.
But is it that the core of the brain is at the root of sensations?
And even if we could prove that for Man: How could anyone show the same for rats?
I believe that rats and other mammals, perhaps even cockroaches (who knows?) have sensations.
But I do not know how to prove it.
And because their sensations probably differ completely from all of us (as humans our consciousness is based on special circuits, and on the language), I prefer to explore the emotional behaviour rather than the emotional sensations rats.
In all cases, progress hinges on the nervous system as we gauge it in rats and Man.
As I do not explores language and consciousness among rats, or sensations, I do not know if they exist.
We could see this as a cause of short term, but I prefer to move forward rather than constantly beat myself against a wall.
I am an emotional pragmatic.
Platini, the UEFA president: A grace period for Poland and Ukraine
Iwan Wasjunik Deputy Prime Minister said that the preparations would soon be placed under the direct responsibility of the President and the Prime Minister.
"The government considers UEFA's decision at Bordeaux as a sign of confidence in Ukraine and its ability to host, in collaboration with Poland, the European Championship," announced Wasjunik.
"But this is not an amnesty for our country.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
In the timing of the construction or the destruction of stadiums, the streets, hotels and airports, the two guests running after the delays.
The number of stadiums for the European Championship could possibly be reduced from eight to six.
"We no longer have any time to lose.
We must work at maximum speed, " said Grigorij Surkis President of the Ukrainian League.
"UEFA constantly has an eye on us."
Even tougher means of action were decided in Poland.
The directorate of the Polish football league PZPN has been suspended by the National Olympic Committee after many scandals and replaced by Robert Zawlocki, an independent administrator.
The Committee met on the request of the Minister for Sport Miroslaw Drzewiecki.
"There is a real danger that the PZPN will not be able to act within the rules," said Drzewiecki of the Polish news agency PAP.
"We have ensured in a letter to the President of UEFA that the preparations for the 2012 European Championships will not suffer."
Several members of the First Division Leauge were already convicted of manipulation of compulsory relegation in the previous season; in the end, the beginning of the League had even to be shifted at the last minute.
Dennis Quaid outraged at counter-attack
She wanted to make promotions for a new film, spoke of her private life in an interview, and has now created trouble with her ex: The Hollywood star Meg Ryan unveils her life with her former partner Dennis Quaid.
He foams - and counter-attacks.
A late war of roses for the former couple Meg Ryan and Dennis Quaid: seven years after their divorce, the two Hollywood actors are engaged in a disgraceful battle - in full view of the world.
Last week, Meg Ryan had expressed in an interview for the American newspaper InStyle the causes of the failure of marriage, "Dennis had long been unfaithful, and it was very painful."
She would know of the extent of deception only after the divorce.
The reason for this striptease of thought is the relations of the press towards Ryan's new film "The Women" - which tells the story of an adulterer.
The reaction of Dennis Quaid, 54, on being called an unfaithful husband region was clear: it is "monstrous", he said to the "New York Daily News", that "Meg is again bringing up the history of our relationship and manipulating it".
It would be moreover "regrettable", that "the trouble and the confusion following a divorce for every child were to be rekindled in public" for their son Jack who is now 16 years old. "
While Ryan has lived alone after the divorce, Quaid has remarried and will soon be the father of twins.
This was his response to the taunt: "In any case, my life continues.
I am pleased to have a wonderful family which is doing very well".
The fares of plane tickets and hotels is falling
In the first half of 2008, flights and hotels were less expensive than the previous year.
In Germany, according to a current study, flights are cheaper by almost 50 percent.
Flights and hotels will again become profitable - it is the result of a study conducted by a provider of financial services and American Express travels.
The company has analysed reservation data for the first half of 2008 and has established that after a price increase in the first quarter, a sharp fall in profits was witnessed in the second quarter.
After the market prices of hotels have risen for years, bed and breakfasts have already cut their prices in many places.
From January to March, prices rose by 6.9 percent in 41 of 48 examined European cities on average, compared with  the same 41 of 48 examined European cities in 2007.
From April to June, prices were already 3.6 percent lower than in the previous year.
The trend has been marked especially in Paris and Rome, where passengers were paying 30 to 37 percent less than a year earlier.
The causes of this rest for American Express in the weakness of the dollar, which has led to a 'decline in the desire to travel of American tourists'.
Financial markets such as Frankfurt or London would be even more affected by the decline in the price of hotels than industrial cities such as Hanover, Cologne or Stavanger.
In the Swedish town, hotel prices have increased by 26.3 percent, the highest in Europe.
Also in terms of price of flights, the trend was on the rise in the first quarter.
Due to the increase in the price of kerosene, passengers in economy class had to pay an average of 7.1 percent more than in 2007, while on long flights, which consume a lot of fuel, the prices have even gone up by 29.2 percent.
From April to June, the economy class ticket prices have fallen by an average of 12.5 percent compared with the previous quarter, while variation in prices of business-class and first class tickets have been far less pronounced.
In Germany, prices have been falling even more than in other European countries.
From January to March, prices had risen by 11.9 percent in the second quarter, they have fallen by 23.6 percent.
German domestic flights have even been halved according to the study.
The reasons for this fall in prices would be a slowing economic growth, explains the firm.
Demand will acquire ground for many market segments of travel by air.
On the other hand, there is a growing pressure of competition in the "open skies" Treaty liberalising air traffic between the United States and Europe.
Sign of the tense situation is the removal by the airlines of non-profitable routes, and the high number of airlines filing for bankruptcy during the first half of 2008 - there were 24 companies in Europe alone.
HSV beat Gladbach 1: 0
With a goal and simple methods, SV Hamburg reaches top of the league table.
In Borussia, Luhukay has not yet managed to find a functional 11.
From Kristoffer Klein. Enlarge. Hard landing for international player Marko Marin.
The player from Gladbach entered late in the game and his rising shot hit the framework of the goal.
His message was precisely formulated, it came out of his lips in a persuasive manner.
He knew that he was right.
"We need this second goal," whistled Hermann Rieger in the corridor of the changing rooms of the Hamburg ring.
There was not much activity in the changing room, half-time was over, and most were sitting in their places.
Rieger has been HSV's physiotherapist for nearly three decades, and has a great reputation like many former players.
And that is why his application has been received in strategic places.
The assistant trainer Cornelius Jol has acquiesed and given the thumbs up.
Cornelius is the brother of the chief trainer of Hamburg Martin Jol.
Whose orders seem to have been similar: and hurry up with the second goal!
The implementation was missing.
"Everything was not very nice to see today," confessed  Marcel Jansen later.
Bastian Reinhard would also have wanted be more relaxed.
This 1: 0 scoreline (1: 0 at half-time), Hamburg owed to a successful strike off the head by Mladen Petric (in the 11th minute); and the fact that the weak Gladbach players weren't able to do any harm to the weak Hamburg players.
"It was a dirty victory", summed up Marin Jol.
The Hamburg SV will celebrate its 121 years on Monday.
Already on Saturday afternoon, the fans were cheering themselves, the blue sky above the stadium and the provisional league tables on the giant screen that showed their club as top of the league.
Will it be a birthday without a genuine party.
"We know how to take a step back," said Marcell Jansen.
It is clear that the interim result more clearly reflect the unpredictability of the premier League that the domination of his HSV.
The team with its new arrivals - the Brazilians Neves and Silva, the goalkeeper Petric as well as Jansen lately of FC Bayern - looks nice enough, but has not shone yet.
"We need more charm and more dribbles", demanded Jol.
After the failure of the vote
On Wall Street, fear travels.
The first news of the failure of the rescue plan has seen Dow Jones temporarily loose 700 points.
It was the biggest loss of points in the space of a day in history.
Later, Dow Jones recovered a little.
Towards 8.30 p.m., the most important stock index in the world showed 10.579 with a fall of five percent.
The Nasdaq stock market index of technology was at 1548 points with a fall of more than seven points.
The biggest losers till date, before Dow Jones, were American Express which lost nearly 14 percent and Bank of America with a loss of about 12 percent.
No title could bring back profits.
The shares of Goldman Sachs Bank showed a drop of almost 10%.
Only a few days ago, the big investor Warren Buffett was involved in society.
In the framework of the rescue plan, the resources must be mobilised to purchase what we call spoiled mortgage documents.
The sum, however, must not be paid at once, but in installments.
In return, the state should recover options on the shares of the financial society that can be exchanged in correlatively to the evolution of the situation in a way so as to reduce the burden on the Public Treasury.
Share prices being sucked into the eddy in Europe and the United States
The billions in aid for banks in Europe and the United States does not mask the concerns of investors.
The course of action of the great German bank Hypo Real Estate collapses and pulls Dax into the abyss.
The american of Dow Jones collapses despite the rescue of the financial market planned by the state.
Dramatic reductions in the rates of Hypo Real Estate and Commerzbank led the German index (Dax) to a profound deficit.
The Bavarian real estate company's shares lost three-quarters of its value in spite of the rescue operation of the federal government and private banks, Commerzbank fell by more than 20 percent.
The Dax clearly slipped below the important psychological barrier of 6,000 points and quoted 5.839 points with a deficit of 3.7 percent.
The world over, stock markets fell to their knees.
In New York, Wall Street opened with marked losses.
Investors feared that the rescue plan of $700 billion of the United States Government may not be sufficient to restart the financial markets.
The Dow Jones at 10.809,25 points lost 334 points, or 3.3 percent within the first hour of opening.
The House of Representatives of the United States intends to vote on the rescue plan, the vote in the Senate should follow on 1 October.
Other European stock markets also have all gone the same way: In London, the FTSE 100 index has seen a decline of 3.2 percent for the moment, the CAC 40 in Paris has lost 2.9 percent.
In Asia, Japan's main index Nikkei fell to 11.743,61 points after an increase from 1.26 percent.
In Hong Kong, the Hang Seng index has gone awry by 2.1 percent to 18.286,90 points.
In India, the main Sensex index has lost 506,43 points, or 3.9 percent, and closed at 12.595,75 points.
In the MDAX, the shares of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
The private bank Sal Oppenheim, has signed up for 23 million new shares.
The multinational trade and tourism agency has also indicated that the shares will not be sold to Thomas Cook.
Dark matter affects the flight of space probes
For years, a mysterious phenomenon has left researchers puzzled: dark matter affects the speed of space probes during gravitationnel support manoeuvers.
Experts fear that the general theory of relativity is not entirely correct.
For nearly 18 years, the space shuttle "Ulysses" has been flying in space.
Cryogenic death threatens it by the fact that its fuel may soon be frozen.
For years, a mysterious phenomenon has been the cause of confusion among researchers - the anomaly of the gravitationnel effect.
The gravitationnel effect is a means used by space probes to get an extra boost from the gravitational field a celestial body, the Earth for example.
Thus, the probes can save on a lot of fuel.
The Euro-American research probe Casini-Huygens used this physical device, just as the solar probe Ulysses.
This is what has surprised researchers for years: flying bodies do not behave a 100 percent in the way one would expect them to according to the venerable laws of gravity.
What is more, the irregularities occur at the level of speed.
The probes become are unexpectedly faster or slower.
Until now, physicists could not explain this.
They named it as the anomaly of the gravitational effect.
Some experts fear that the general theory of relativity of Albert Einstein, which describes the force of attraction of matter according to the curvature of space, may not be entirely correct.
The American physicist Stephen Adler of the Institute for Advanced Study in Princeton still believes staunchly that Einstein was not wrong and is trying to explain the anomaly of the gravitational effect with the help of so-called black matters that astronomers have identified in the universe.
"This black matter, which is also in the vicinity of the Earth, might be responsible for this anomaly," he writes.
Space physicists have known of the existence of dark matter only for ten years.
It apparently emanates a force of attraction whose effect is tangible on other celestial bodies.
It is entirely invisible, i.e. that it sends nor reflects any electromagnetic radiation, especially visible light.
According to the calculations of scientists, black matters accounts for a fifth of the mass of the universe.
Tourists kidnapped in Egypt are set free
After 10 days in the hands of their captors, tourists kidnapped in Egypt will be released as the Italian Foreign Minister has confirmed.
The Sudanese kidnappers had demanded a ransom of several million euros.
During the shooting before the release, six kidnappers would have been killed.
In southern Egypt, five Germans have been abducted.
Negotiations for the ransom are already underway.
The Germans are constantly in the sights of the kidnappers.
Welt Online depicts the most important cases.
The European tourists kidnapped in the Sahara are visibly free.
This is what has been communicated by the Egyptian state television, the Arab television channel Al Arabija and the Italian media.
Italian Foreign Minister Franco Frattini confirmed the release after the news bulletin on the Italian television channel Sky TG 24: "Our citizens and the other hostages were released.
We are checking their state of health, "said Frattini.
The five Germans, the five Italians and the Romanian and their eight Egyptian companions are doing well and are safe, announced the Egyptian national television.
The 19 participants of the excursion in the desert should already be on the way to Cairo.
The circumstances surrounding a shooting before the release of the hostages are still unclear: the kidnappers were close to putting an end to the kidnapping, before the Sudanese army killed six of the kidnappers without warning, according to an Egyptian security official.
"The issue was resolved.
They agreed upon a ransom, " said the official.
There was nothing left but to collect the hostages", when suddenly, "this surprise" occurred.
Sudanese soldiers had killed six of the kidnappers this Sunday in the border area between Sudan, Chad and Egypt, and had arrested two of them.
The kidnappers had demanded a ransom of a total of six million euros from Germany; the money would have been given by the German wife of one of the hostages.
The newspaper 'El Masri El Jom "said that, in the words of a German mediator, the release of the hostages was delayed because the kidnappers feared for their safety.
According to article, the kidnappers wanted to release the women hostages after the ransom had been paid.
Men were to be held until the kidnappers have found a sure way to flee.
The German Embassy in Cairo refused to make any comment on this story.
Abuse of a step-father-" which led to suicide "
A court has been told that years of abuse inflicted by her stepfather led a woman to commit suicide.
Michael Trerise, 57 years old, from Stithians, in Cornwall, has been jailed for six years after he admitted to eight counts of indecency acts.
The high court of Truro has stated that he regularly bound his step-daughter, Stéphanie Randle, during her childhood, when she was between 5 and 7 years old.
Trerise wrote in a confession letter: "I feel responsible for her death".
The court was told that Ms Randle, aged 34 years, has committed suicide at home at Mutley, Plymouth, on 1 April 2007.
When she was a child in Coventry, Trerise had bound her before forcing her into sexual acts, while her mother worked at a pub.
Trerise and his wife divorced in the 1980s, and he returned to live in Cornwall.
His step-daughter left for Plymouth.
But the court was told that Ms Randle, assiduous volunteer of National Trust, was haunted by the abuses that had been inflicted on her twice a week.
The Attorney General, Ramsey Quaife said in court that friends had mentioned that Ms Randle, who was a good surfeuse and cyclist, seemed since 2006 "emotionally dead," and "had lost all hope to life."
In April 2007, her real father, Terrance Randle, found her dead in his apartment in Plymouth.
We think she committed suicide by suffocation with a plastic bag.
Mr Randle confronted his daughter's step-father, who had also written a letter of confession that ended with: "I tied and bound her up regularly".
"I have not abused her sexually.
"I feel responsible for her death."
The judge Christopher Elwen said to Trerise: "You are truly bizarre as a fetishist, your victim must have been terrified of you, especially at the age of 7 years.
"This unpleasant saga ended with the suicide of the victim.
And even more surprising is that if she had not committed this act, its history would certainly never have ended up in court.
He added: "I stress in particular, as described by her father and mother, the effects of your crime on Stephanie over a period of many years."
"Without these, she would probably now have been a young woman, happy, promising, and successful."
Condemnation for loss of official data.
The ministerial officer of the Cabinet Office, who had forgotten top secret documents in June on a train, will be condemned by the Official Secrets Act, the BBC has learned.
An employee of the Ministry of Defence was in transit when he forgot two highly classified documents, on a train going in the direction of Waterloo.
The documents passed into the hands of the BBC before being handed over to the police.
Here is the least condemning view of this act, without any insinuation of criminal intent.
The BBC correspondent Frank Gardner said that this episode had (surprised?) people of Whitehall.
"They would have thought that this would have remained between the walls of the Ministry of Defence and the Cabinet Office," he said.
The employee who cannot be named, is accused of violating the section 8.1 of the act, i.e. of the clause which deals with the preservation of information.
The Crown Prosecution Service has suggested that the ministerial officer be placed under the surveillance of the Metropolitan Police, given the sensitive nature of his work related to the Committee associated with the secret services.
The documents that he has lost contained assessments on Al-Qaeda and the resources of the security forces in Iraq.
He was informed of the decision on Monday morning and was then transported from home to a secret location.
Building societies against the B&B bill.
The British building society may have to pay a bill of more than £80 million to cover the rescue of the Bradford & Bingley bank.
The government has provided £14 billion to protect the deposits of 2.6 million bankers with Bradford & Bingleys.
The interests of the loan will be paid by all companies that collect the dividends from the investors, including 59 building societies.
The Director-General of Building Societies Association (BSA), Adrian Coles said he is "irritated" to know that companies and their members will have to pay the bill...
The loan of £14 billion will be repaid when mortgages of Bradford & Bingleys are released.
But the interests that are at the same time growing, will subsequently be debited, each year, to the 700 financial companies that collect on the deposits.
The Financial Services compensation Scheme confirmed to the BBC, that the 59 building societies are included in the list.
It is annoying to see that the institutions that have had a prudent behavior … must now pay some of the bills of institutions that were much less cautious.
Adrian Coles, BSA
It is being proclaimed that every society must pay a sum proportional to the deposits that it holds, and that intermediate companies must pay about 18% of the cost.
The Treasury estimates that the interests of the loan will rise in 2009, to £450millions.
This means that companies will have to find £81 million to settle the interests of the first year.
Adrian Coles, Director-General of the commercial committee of building societies, told the BBC that this decision was unfair.
It is "irritating" to see that the institutions that have had a prudent behavior during the resumption of the housing market, must now pay for the institutions which were much less cautious.
According to the BSA, no society has failed since 1945, the first date of its history.
"We must examine all aspects of the case for the coming weeks, to assess the options to adopt so as to avoid the building societies and their members paying a hefty bill" said Mr Cole.
The interests of 2009 cover seven months, from the end of September this year till the end of March.
In 2010, it will be necessary to pay the interests of the whole year, which may double.
Given that the building societies are organisations without shareholder, their members end up paying the bill either by higher costs or lower interest rates on savings accounts.
The price of milk has increased to five pence per litre
People of Jersey have to pay more for their milk
Jersey Dairy has announced that it will increase the bulk price of its milk, to five pence per litre, from Monday.
It is the second increase in price which follows an increase of two pence in February, and comes following a research carried out consultation society.
Sellers must decide whether they will in turn increase the cost to consumers.
Before the increase in February, the wholesale price of milk of Jersey had been changed the last time in 2002.
A former PM of Bangladesh has been denied bail
A court in Bangladesh has rejected a request for bail from the former PM Sheikh Hasina, who is likely to be arrested upon her return.
Her lawyers have said that the court refused to give her because of her indictment for having extracted 50 million Taka ($729.000,00) from a businessman when she was PM.
This is one of the many accusations against her.
Khaleda Zia, the rival of Sheikh Hasina since a very long time, has been set free on bail earlier this month.
Sheikh Hasina should return to the Bangladesh in a few weeks, but her party, the Awani League, has demanded that the temporary military government give her full freedom first.
Correspondents have pointed out that the terms of her release are contradictory; since she was allowed to leave the country for medical reasons, they do not see why she could not remain free on her return to Bangladesh.
Her lawyers have announced that she will now appeal to the Supreme Court against the order of the Supreme Court.
"The Supreme Court has rejected the request of Sheikh Hasina saying that she does not require bail because she had been allowed to go abroad for medical reasons," said her lawyer Rafique-ul Huq.
"We will present an appeal against the order of the Supreme Court"
Her lawyers have argued that she needed this bail to return to the country in order to prepare for elections in December
Sheikh Hasina should return after 17 October, said a former leader of the Awami Party.
She was detained last year after the military interim government had assumed power, but was released in June for receiving medical care abroad.
Sheikh Hasina like Zhaleda Zia, denies the accusations against her.
Concerns for the Afghan antipolio campaign.
In Afghanistan, almost 200,000 children have missed the recent immunization campaign against polio, for reasons of violence linked to the Taliban, said the UN.
The UN has conducted a vaccination campaign in the six provinces last week.
But it says it has not been able to contact the children living in the dangerous areas of Helmand and Kandahar, located in the south.
A UN spokesman said this has happened despite the promises of the Taliban not to attack nor inhibit the thousands of nurses during the vaccinations.
BSkyB loses the ITV legal battle
BSkyB has lost its trial following the verdict of the Competition Commission, which will force it to reduce its participation in its rival provider ITV.
The Court of Appeal for Competition ordered BSkyB to reduce its share of ITV from 17.9% to less than 7.5%.
The Committee said that, in the past, the participation of MSkyB had prevented competition and had allowed it to unfairly influence ITV.
BSkyB had bought its share in 2006 following an agreement to prevent NTL, – now called Virgin Media - buying ITV.
In April 2007, the Office of Fair Trading said that the purchase of shares by BSkyB in ITV sowed doubt on the effective independence of ITV, encouraging by a result, the Competition Commission to investigate
Virgin boss Richard Branson, a group of consumers and the regulator Ofcom were all contrary to the purchase.
BSkyB retorted that being forced to reduce its share of ITV would not be sensible and instead was excessive – especially given that BSkyB had just given up its voting rights.
New investigations into the case of US prosecutors.
The US general counsel has appointed a special accuser to check the question of the dismissal of nine American prosecutors in 2006.
The whole matter was born from the account of the case by the inspector general of the Department of Justice, who criticized the actions of some cabinet officers.
The report was critical of officers of the White House, legislators and former Prosecutor General, Alberto Gonzales.
The investigation is based on the argument of the lawyers who hold that their dismissal was due to political causes.
Special prosecutor, Nora Dannehy now will inquire to know whether the officers lied to their interrogators, hence obstructing justice, during their investigation.
"Serious accusations of potentially criminal conduct, although unfounded, have neither been fully confirmed nor resolved," said the inspector General, Glenn Fine, in his report.
The appointment of a special prosecutor able to force the witnesses to testify, was one of its most important recommendations.
The dispute began by the radiation of nine American prosecutors made by the US Department of Justice in December 2006.
At the time, the department said that the prosecutors were dismissed because of poor performance.
But it emerged then, that the prosecutors dismissed were not more criticised than their colleagues, which incited some observers to attribute their dismissal to political reasons.
Some prosecutors have been accused of being close to the Republicans of Congress, while others have refused to investigate the allegations of fraudulent vote against the Democrats.
American prosecutors are investigating and following the judicial forums for the governement.
It is certain that they can be dismissed at any time, but not for political reasons.
The head of the Department of Justice, the Prosecutor General Alberto Gonzales, is accused of being involved in this case of dismissal, and in the end, he resigned.
A number of cabinet officers of the Department of Justice have also handed in their resignations.
The report by the inspector General was very critical of the role of Mr González in this case, saying that he considered him 'chiefly responsible' for the dismissals, and ultimately abdicated his role as leader, managing remarkably not to involve himself in the case.
Other cabinet officers, including the former colleague of Bush, Karl Rove, have been criticised for not having cooperated in the investigation.
The saga of Meat loaf will be honoured.
The Rock star Meat loaf, will be honoured at Q Awards for his epic song Bat Out of hell.
The singer, who will receive an Oscar at the ceremony in London next week, declared being "honoured" to get this recognition.
The song of nine minutes 50 seconds, was the title of the hit from the album of Meat loaf of 1977.
The evening of the prizes will be presented by Coldplay, with this year, the selection having been restricted to four categories.
Paul Rees, chief editor of Q magazine, said: "There are songs that transcend things like time and genre, and Bat Out of hell is one of them
The song, written by Jim Steinman, required a great voice like Meat Loaf's.
It begins with an instrumental section that lasts almost two minutes.
The song was released in the UK, as a single in 1979, and reached the 15th place.
In addition, his album Bat Out of Hell stayed nine years on the English charts, and sold more than 40 million copies worldwide.
Meat Loaf - or Lee Marvin Aday, which is his real name - has suffered from health problems in recent years, even undergoing surgery to cure an irregular heartbeat problem, after having collapsed on stage, in 2003.
In 2007, a strong attack of laryngitis forced him to cancel his concerts.
Then they found a cyst in his vocal cords.
A Dark Street in the City, Often Forgotten, and Maybe Soon are now on sale.
New York has hundreds of Avenues, boulevards, streets and other parallel roads, some famous, others merely functional.
Even veteran taxi drivers and and long time local residents aren't able to give proper directions to Extra Place, because they have never heard of it.
The street is in the East Village and travels the length of the north of First Street - not to be confused with Second Street - between Bowery and Second Avenue.
About 30 feet wide for 120 long, it looks more like a dusty alley than an active road.
. No signs indicate the street.
It is virtually impossible to find in a standard atlas.
The street, however, has fans.
For example, there is Avalon Bay, the builder of recent luxury buildings on First Street.
It wants to repave Extra Place, and create a smooth transition to the shops and boutiques, which should open in the new buildings.
Other admirers including neighbours for a long time, said they were happy with this shortcut simply because it is one of the last and oldest streets of the block.
But the Department of Preservation and Development of the city that manages the street, has no interest in maintaining it.
This month, at a meeting of the committee of owners of the neighbourhood, representatives of the city agency of Avalon Bay have outlined a proposal to allow a real estate agent to buy the street.
But the committee would prefer that the street rest in the hands of the city, and asked to submit a new proposal next month, said Susan Stetzer, the local manager of the Committee No 3.
"There are few areas still belonging to the city, and we hope that the city will keep Extra Place" she said.
"They could propose to restore and manage it, something which Avalon could equally do, but we'd rather maintain it as public property."
Avalon Bay announced several months ago that she wanted to repave the little street and install seats, some which will be used by a café to which the constructor will rent out space.
The proposal of this potential acquisition was made public in the meeting of this month.
Michele de Milly, the spokesman of Avalon Bay, said that although the company wants to exploit the street, this does not necessarily mean that it wants to be the owner.
"The main interest of Avalon Bay is to revamp this abandoned alley, and make it public" she said, pointing out that it was the city that made her the offer for the sale in the first place".
Seth Donlin, a spokesman for the Preservation of Real Estate Agents, confirmed that the city wanted to sell the street, stressing that the agency's mission was to develop the property rather than to manage it.
Compared to its more colourful neighbour, Bowery, Extra Place has left a slight historic footprint.
Some believe that extra Place bears the name since 1802, when the legacy of the great firm of the many children of Philip Minthorne was divided, leaving aside this small tract of land, which has remained abandoned ever since.
The late entry of CBGB, a punk rock monument closed in 2006, re-opened Extra Place; the street is certainly more famous thanks to the photo on coverage of the album of Ramones "Rocket to Russia"
"This place was magnificent" said Danny Fields, the manager of the Ramones, who took the photo in November 1976.
It was full of scrap metal, rags, barrels, posters, leaves and strings. "
Some residents, including the bloggers who had already talked about the move towards the luxury of the East Village, have opposed the idea of selling extra Place, saying that this humble property should remain public.
Others have proclaimed extra Place as a real rarety - a virtually identical fragment to the city that should be treated in peace.
Jeremiah Moss, who writes a blog called Jeremiah's Vanishing New York (subtitled "The Book of Disputes: A look bitterly nostalgic on A City in the process of extinction") describes the history of the City and Extra Place, in a piece published in 1952 in The New Yorker.
The author, Brendan Gill, wrote: "Extra Place is a small cul-de-sac, dark day and night, and outlined by the doors of a warehouse in persion rusted iron, full of newspapers from last week that fly along the gutters."
With a few exceptions, the street has always the same look.
A small rat scampers to the bottom of the alleyway near a door that once led the CBGB, and which has now become the location of a chic clothing store.
Graffiti on the walls, an empty bottle of beer of 22 onces, lies beside the newspapers that have just been thrown.
Passers-by said they did not think often of Extra Place, and suggested its development.
Mr Field, for his part, said that some underestimated the attractiveness of the street in its current state.
"The best years of my life," he said, "took place in dark, humid and disgusting places".
Bilingual Debate: Immersion into the English Language
In this part of the programme of supervision of Education, Bruce Fuller and Lance T. Izumi discuss the position of the candidates on bilingual education.
Lance T. Izumi, a former member of the studies in California, and former director of the department of education in the Pacific Research Institute for Public Policy, is the co-author of the book "not as good as you would think. Why the middle classes must be able to choose their school."
The favour of Hispanic voters is a complicated business.
Barack Obama's proposals on education is an interesting example.
The campaign by Mr Obama stresses that "African-American and Latin students have less chance of granduating than white students." This is true.
To combat these differences, the education programme of Mr Obama supports especially among many issues, "transitional bilingual education" for those who learn English.
However, the question for Obama is whether his desire to achieve a bilingual education that defends the instruction in class of languages other than English, goes beyond its interest to eliminate the differences.
Take, for example, sixth Street Prep, an elementary school in east of the county of Los Angeles.
In this school students are largely Hispanic, and of families with low incomes.
More than a third of students, many of which are newcomers, are studying English.
Among students of CM1, 100% have passed the state examination for maths, expert level, in 2008.
Similarly, almost 93% of students have passed the examination of English-language-arts
This incredible success was achieved through another ingredient than the one that was put forward by Mr Obama.
In practise Sixth Street put under constant analysis an assessment of capacity of students and an exemplary attitude.
In addition, and this is an example that Mr Obama could copy, reported Linda Mikels, principal of Sixth Street, the school has created the instruction of the English language by "full immersion".
The total immersion in the English language focusses on the almost constant use of English in teaching.
Ms Mikels, contrary to bilingual education, has confirmed "we had a great success with a student who had just arrived from Mexico; 12 months later, if you would have walked into his class, you would have had no chance to identify him."
"It works," she observed, "it worked for us"
Should Mr Obama not take the example of Sixth Street Prep and replicate it in other schools made up mostly of Hispanic students learning English.
The excellent results achieved by the school speak for themselves, but the policies on education within his party (the Associations for National Education have supported bilingual education for a long time) and his huge support for bilingual education, obscures the prediction of results by Mr Obama.
Although it is favourable that immigrants learn English, Mr Obama has recently seen this issue as insignificant, when he proclaimed that we all need to stop disagreeing about the wording of the laws in English.
"On the contrary," he said, "you must ensure that your child speaks Spanish ".
If Mr Obama really wants to eliminate the differences, he should then consider carefully, the models of education that work, rather than dismiss or view them as insignificant.
Net fall of oil following new concerns for the world of the economy
Oil prices fell sharply on Monday, because people fear that the rescue plan for the financial markets, will not be able to revive the economy.
The price of crude oil fell by 7 percent to $99.80 a barrel. The New York Mercantile Exchange during sales this morning.
Prices have fallen by more than $20 a barrel since last Monday.
These past two weeks, the markets for raw materials have been buffeted by the financial turmoil on Wall Street, as well as by two powerful hurricanes in the Gulf of Mexico.
Having experienced in July, an increase of up to $145.29 the barrel, prices have dropped to nearly $90 a barrel this month, before picking up again at the prospect of the deep uncertainty of the financial markets.
On Monday, investors are worried again despite the agreement on the rescue plan, which is the largest in history, reached this weekend by the leaders of Congress.
The news has been watered down by the recent concerns that the crisis would be durative.
In the latest episode of this financial catastrophe, " Citygroup will buy banking operations of the Wachovia Corporation, said the government on Monday.
At the same time, the Belgian, Dutch and Luxembourg governments have together met to nationalise the European financial conglomerate, Fortis.
Analysts at Barclays Capital said that the frenzied negotiations over the weekend, concluding with the agreement of rescue "do not seem to have managed to revive the market. "
While the economic situation is deteriorating, the demand for raw materials, including oil, should slow.
"The global prospective equity, interest rates and exchange markets, have become uncertain" wrote analysts at Deutsche Bank in a letter to investors. "
"We believe that raw materials will not escape this infection.
"As far as raw materials is concerned, our most pressing concerns is to understand how far the American virus will spread globally and in particular, in China."
Analysts of the bank reduced their expectations for next year, given the fall in consumption of oil due to the slowdown in economic growth, and were therefore obliged to reduce forecasts of oil and gas prices for 2009 by 20pour cent.
The celebration of the Second crucial time for the Improvement of the Team Record.
After spending during the last eight seasons, more time than anyone in uniform of the Jets, Shaun Ellis, the defender thought himslef to have seen everything.
He took a second look, when the jets transformed a 0-0 into an explosion.
"I have never seen anything like this," said Ellis.
The second half began after the Jets and the Arizona Cardinals played dirtily under the dark clouds.
Then the quarter back Brett Favre managed to make a pass to Laveranues Coles allowing him to make a 12 yards touchdown, precursor to an afternoon which saw their partnership taking a step forward.
Favre found Coles for yet another two touchdowns, the first when a corner back fell, and the second, 10 seconds before half-time.
"I didn't go out of my area" Favre said about all his passes to Coles.
"He is a mediocre player"
"We communicate extremely well, despite what people say."
Whilst Favre and Coles were playing catch, the defense beat the Cardinal's quarter back, Kurt Warner.
Darrelle Revis, corner back, intercepted a misfired shot and ran 32 yards to make a touchdown.
Eric Smith made another pass and intercepted him.
Linebacker, David Bowens let the ball go because of Warner.
At the last change, the loss of the ball by Bowens, may well be the most charming play of the game.
The Cardinals were in possession for the last 10 seconds, when the Jets recovered the ball, and Jay Feely made a goal from 20 yards taking the advantage to a 34-0.
It was the highest Jets score in one game.
The jets the coach Eric Mangini, who was asked to describe this madness, said "the second time or the third? "
When asked, both - the jets made 21 unquestionable points in the third time - Mangini said: "I can tell you that I appreciated the second time more than the third.
. "Many points were made in little time."
Gebrselassie rested, beats his world record.
Haile Gebrselassie, Ethiopian, has once again proved to be worthy of his title of best long distance runner of the century, having beaten his own world record in the marathon in Berlin on Sunday, becoming the first to run 26,2 miles in less than 2 hours and 4 minutes.
With a victory in 2: 03: 59 on a flat course, Gebrselassie has beaten his record of 2: 04: 26, made last year in Berlin by 27 seconds.
At 35 years, Gebrselassie won the 26th world record of his successful career in which he has won the World Cup or the world record for any distance between 1600m and the marathon.
Last month, Gebrselassie missed the Beijing Olympic marathon, fearing - as can seem exaggerated to people today - that air pollution would increase his problems of asthma.
On the contrary, he promised to run in Berlin.
In almost perfect conditions - sunny time, 48 degrees at the start, 55 degrees at the finish - Gebrselassie won on Sunday, maintaining an impressive average of a mile every 4 minutes 43 seconds
Track runners such as Gebrselassie and Paul Tergat, both Kenyans, converted into long distance runners, have contributed to lowering the marathon record by more than two minutes in the last ten years, since 1998, when the Brazilian Ronaldo da Costa won in Berlin in 2: 06: 05.
After the victory on Sunday, Gebrselassie said to reporters having suffered cramps in his calf two weeks ago, and having missed training for a week.
It is clear that the rest helped him remain brilliant, without rusting.
"I am so happy," he said to reporters.
"Everything was perfect.
I began again last week, and today I had doubts, but in the end it all went for the better. '"
He has been reproached - especially in Kenya, rival country to Ethiopia - for orchestrating his runs, and avoiding the stars of the marathon from around the world, counting rather on the hares as if they were in a track competition, and giving more importance to world records than to the sense of competition.
But that does not reduce the greatness of Gebrselassie's capacity as a long distance runner.
Gebrselassie on Sunday, preceded by four Kenyans, recorded a time of 1: 02: 04. half way.
Two elite Kenyan runners, James Kwambai and Charles Kamathi, continued to defy Gebrselassie after the head of the queue had disappeared.
A little more than three miles from the finish, Gebrselassie made his final push to pull away from Kwambai, who finished second at 2: 05: 36, improving his best record time by five minutes.
Kamathis came in third at 2: 07: 48.
In the women's race, Irina Mikitenko, born in Kazakhstan, now a German citizen, has completed a remarkable year with the seventh best time of 2: 19: 19.
English Paula Radcliffe holds the world record of 2: 15: 25.
Last spring, Mikitenko aged 36 years, surprised everyone by winning the London Marathon in 2: 24: 14.
She could not participate in the Beijing games because of a hypothetical pain in the back, but promised to win in Berlin, improving her personal record by nearly five minutes in her third marathon.
She ran making use of a clever strategy, leaving the group of runners from Ethiopia and Kenya take a clear advantage, then beating them around 18miles 1⁄2 later.
Askale Tafa Margasa of Ethiopia came second in 2: 21: 31, while Helena Kiprop, Kenyan finished third in 2: 25: 01.
In a City in Part, Pride and the plight of the Black Life
Hidden in the development of its huge park, a few miles from the sunshine, the brilliant and the giant Orlando, is a quiet town where are born the pride and complications of the African-American experience.
"Eatonville, first black city to integrate fully, childhood home of Zora Neale Hurston, this description that she made in 1935, is not so easy to make these days." The city of five lakes, three croquet fields, 300 dark skins, 300 good swimmers, full of guavas, two schools and no prison.
It is now become a city of pilgrimage
Alice Walker, Tony Morrison and Ruby Dee came to the Zora Festival every year at Eatonville, to pay tribute to Hurston, the most famous writer of the Harlem Renaissance.
And in various ways, the city that she described has become a tourist attraction thanks to its inclusion in the tourist guide to Florida published by The Depression- era Federal Writers Project- and remains a separate place.
It is as independent, worthy, and private as it was in the 1930s, when Hurston said that the rural population in Florida was often reluctant to share its true thoughts with the white man, who "knowing us so little, did not know what he was missing out on".
Even if it is the year of the election of a black president, Senator Barack Obama, who has also cited an open dialogue on the issue of race, many here remain cautious of the gaze of the foreigner.
"We are very careful about how to tell the story" said Hortense Jones, 59, resident since forever and the oldest parishioner of the village.
"It must be in line with reality.
Eatonville has long been defined as a paradox of triumph and fighting.
It represents both a historical model of a takeover of blacks and a community of nearly 2,400 people where the poverty rate is twice the national average.
It is a central point but also an example of rural southern black culture - a sometimes scorned,  at others acclaimed - reminiscent of the birth of slavery.
Which explains why the residents are both proud and protective.
The interest in the image of Eatonville born with Zora, that everyone here calls Hurston.
She presented her hometown to the world through books sincere, full of dialect, such as "Mules and Men" (1935) and "their Eyes were watching God "(1937).
Five paragraphs in the guide to the Florida transformed this city, located just outside of Route 17, a road that runs through the centre of Florida, often forgotten, which ends in a chapter in black history of the human drama.
As bold in life as in her literature, Hurston led readers to a shop owned by the first mayor of Eatonville, Mr Joe Clarke, which was then divided into several private parts.
"Passing the road on the left," she writes, "you will find the brown and white modern public school, with its gardens and its areas for games well maintained that Howard Miller has always taken care of, although he hardly knows how to read and write.
She did in addition mention the new husband of Widow Dash and wrote that Lee Glenn "sells drinks of any kind and everything that can serve travellers.
So, in just 100 words, Hurston associates Eatonville to self government but also to illiteracy, remariage, and sex.
Of course, Fodor was not like that.
It was not in fact a portrait that everyone appreciated.
Zora has described reality well" said Dinkins, 90 years old, a young girl of Johnson that Hurston has immortalised, citing the songs without colour, interpreted by men who have recognised their beauty."
She added: "Some people have not appreciated it".
We always remember Hurston as a person who was alive and eccentric, who returned frequently after her family has moved to Jacksonville, Fla.
Augustus Franklin, 77, remembers that Hurston usually came to the city without warning, on board a large Chevrolet, a cigarette in the mouth and wearing trousers here, where even today, we are proud of traditional clothes.
Many residents were fascinated, Mr Franklin said, while many made fun of her.
"People were always happy to see Zora" he said.
But he adds moreover, sitting in his chair on the back patio that looks onto Lake Sabelia, where Hurston was certainly baptised, that "she never stayed too long".
At the time of her death in 1960, Hurston was poor and her books were out of print.
Eatonville and the world seemed to have forgotten her.
Although she was once a star of literature, a contemporary of Langston Hughes and the only black woman at Barnard College of the 1920s, she was buried in an unknown grave in Fort Pearce, Fla, where she lived.
At Eatonville, no great commemoration, or mark for the general public.
I do not believe that they have understood the contribution or the legacy that she's given the world "said Valérie Boyd, author of" Wrapped in Rainbows ", a biography of Hurston published in 2003.
A crucial moment came in the 1980s.
Public officials of Orange County wanted to build a five-way motorway through the town to replace the Boulevard Kennedy, the main street with two ways for the community.
The development of Orlando has already pushed Interstate 4 up to the west of the city.
The proposal was made while Eatonville was just coming out of a difficult time in its history.
A forced integration, among other things, put an end to the relatively idyllic isolation of the community.
In the 1950s, the dispute on the mix of races led hatred to the gates of the community.
"Then, a gang of young whites would launch oranges and other objects at people sitting on the side" said Mr Franklin.
"A woman even died."
They launched a watermelon from their car '.
In a letter from 1955 to The Orlando Sentinel, Hurston questions the request of the Supreme Court to a forced integration, defining its decision in Brown v. Board of Education as "insulting rather than glorifying to my race '.
Residents proclaim now that the elimination of racial segregation in schools, although in some positive aspects, has weakened the cohesion of Eatonville and weakened the confidence of the young.
"Black children are used to being embraced - I remember well - we embraced our teachers in the morning and evening" said N.Y. Nathiri., daughter of Ella Dinkins and chief director of the protection of the Community of Eatonville, a non-profit group.
It lasted, he added, until teachers and students came from the same place.
"You do not embrace your white teacher because she is white - I want to say that there is now a line of cultural demarcation" said Ms Nathiri.
Civil rights, moreover, have helped to create space for many other Zora Neale Hurston- black writers, actors and artists who went beyond prejudice, as she did, an army of cheerful confidence and guidelines such as: "How can they deprive themselves of the pleasure of my company!"
It is beyond me. "
In 1975, the writer Alice Walker went to the anonymous grave of Hurston and began to fight to revive her reputation.
Five years later, an acclaimed biography on Hurston published by Robert E. Hemenway, a true bestseller, re-introduced her to the American cannons.
The project of the motorway happened just when the most famous girl of Eatonville had recovered her appeal.
And this time the old neighbours of Hurston see it as a saviour.
The community has begun to hold a festival in honour of Hurston to demonstrate the catastrophic consequences that the motorway would have created.
Hundreds of fans came to the inauguration of the festival two years later, and many came back in January, to commemorate it.
After many years, the county has rejected the proposal of the motorway.
"The fiasco of the five-ways motorway, very fast, a genuine civic pride" said Ms. Nathiri.
Ms Boyd summed up everything by saying that "Zora saved Eatonville".
The victory against the project of the motorway enabled it to change its own image.
Non-residents, such as Rachelle Munson, a lawyer who frequents our church since 1993, have begun to come in large numbers, and residents are beginning to reconsider the past.
Eatonville is classified as a historic city since 1998.
A mono-themed library (of course named Hurston) opened in 2006 on a magnificently repaved Kennedy Boulevard.
Today, Eatonville is an anomaly in Florida: Six miles from Orlando, it can at any time see itself as a back street after a summer rainy day, small as it was when it was founded by 27 black families in the 1880's.
(Today there are 90 percent blacks)
Foreigners who come to discover the history of Eatonville, its raison d'être, are still treated with caution.
One must ask for permission for most of the interviews, and some things - like the walls of the old church of Eatonville, painted by the white man, depicting black men in the fields - must not be photographed.
Many at Eatonville, like Ms Jones, a courageous teacher who has a weakness for bright red, always fear that their insular community will not be understood.
However, given the expansion of the festival Hurston, a certain level of local pride has emerged.
Young people in particular, tend to be regard Eatonville as Hurston did her  entire race: beautiful, problematic and all, neither better nor worse, but also proud, creative, hardworking, crazy and mixed than other racial and ethnic groups in America.
It's nice to hear the civic affection in the voice of the nephew of Mr Franklin, Edwin Harvey, 18, who plans to return to Eatonville after college to work for the local government or for the Police forces, who need additional forces.
And even the youngest like Alondra and Alexia Kenon of 11ans, twins of Winter Park, seem to have learned properly the description Eatonville.
"Most people, who pass by this area, will think, 'Oh, this city has nothing compared to others" Alondra Kenon said after the mass Sunday.
But if you stop and take the time to look at its history, it is a very beautiful city ".
Here in New York, all speak fluent finance.
Despite everything, nothing has changed.
If tourists in Manhattan stood far from the newsstand and giant TV screens of Times Square, they would not realize that they are in the eye of the storm.
Never they might think that in the glass offices and bees' nest above their heads, bankers and hedge fund managers who monopolize New York, are having the worst "working day at the office" since the fall of 1929.
The men continue to sneak on the pavements, with their trolleys and their shelves of muffins for morning meetings.
The Latin are always between residential buildings carrying fifty luxury shirts hung on their shoulds by way of a yoke, like mules.
The office workers continue to queue to buy their morning sandwich from mobile stalls, and it is impossible to find a taxi between 16h and 19h during the week.
I had not felt the crisis despite the completely pessimistic stories until this afternoon when I decided to open a new savings bank.
Fortunately that I had planned to work at the end of the afternoon, because I discovered that at my local branch of JP Morgan Chase, two dozen people were already queued.
Not in front of the cashier's desk, neither to withdraw nor to deposit money, but before the counter for customer service, where the usual customers get their checkbooks, tourists ask for directions to Macy's, and the new customers opened their accounts.
Most of those in front of me were there for the same reason as myself, I learned later from Starr, my 'personal authorized banker'.
Not in the same way, because they had already withdrawn their saving from smaller banks, such as those of New Jersey, Pennsylvania, and Staten Island.
They have withdrawn their money from savings accounts in so-called thrifts (such a building society), associations of credit, and the type of savings banks and their local subsidiaries which function only in a state, and who claim to treat customers as their families.
In the recent past, 15 of these banks have failed.
In recent days, Washington Mutual, a bank with a capital of $327 has made use of the syndicate of bankruptcy, and while the New Yorkers returned home for the weekend this Friday evening, another bank, Wachovia, having debts of savings accounts worth $440 million, sought desparately for buyer to save it.
The office and employees of shops which are in front of me, frightened of another potential debacle, have transferred money to a bank that seems more reliable, the one that seems to be causing the most rescue on Wall Street.
New Yorkers in general have become very familiar to the world of finance in recent weeks.
"I heard a woman at my local Chinese supermarket, talk on the phone of Lehman Brothers, the bank that failed, and its thin CEO Dick Fuld, with the same familiarity she may have used to criticise a colleague.
And Lyn, the uniformed doorman of my building, has changed the subject of our usual conversation about Brad and Angelina or commercial shipments of my fruit and vegetables.
She said to me, following my visit to the bank. "I put my savings in the market for Monetary Fund.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risks".
Graves Muslim desecrated while Austria fluctuates to the right.
Heinz-Christian Strache, who has abandoned the right of the Austrian Freedom Party, and Filip Dewinter of the Belgian right Vlaams Belang, take part in a demonstration to present the organisation 'cities against Islamisation' in Antwerp, on Thursday 17 January 2008.
They wear road signs of mosques crossed out in red.
The Police accuses the right-wing extremists of having desecrated an Austrian Muslim cemetery, at the end of the victory of political parties of the extreme right wing in the general election of the country.
More than 90 graves were severely damaged in the graveyard of Traun, near Linz, between Friday night and this morning; it was according to the police, an organized act.
Criminals painted Jewish symbols, such as the Star of David, on several graves; the detectives believe, however, that it could have been done to disguise the feeling of hatred of extremists to the Muslim immigrants.
Could this accident be somehow related to the elections?
A spokesman of the local Islamic Community said to be "deeply shocked" at the announcement of this desecration, which comes during the religious month of Ramadan, which is coming to an end.
Austria thinks seriously about regaining its courage, following its oscillation to the right in the parliamentary elections yesterday.
The two right-wing parties that have won almost 30 percent of the votes, the Freedom Party and the Alliance for the Future of Austria, led a campaign against immigration. Some of their slogans were even considered, according to critics, as xenophobic.
Heinz-Christian Strache, the head of the Freedom Party who won more than 18 percent of the votes, conducted his campaign against wearing headscarves and burkas, and has even expressed his opposition to alaha food.
During his final league in Vienna, he spoke of "a European brotherhood" to avoid the rise of Islam.
The two parties are trying to prevent the building of mosques and minarets, saying that they would be a political symbol of the Islamisation of Austria and Europe.
The polls and analyses made just after the elections, have defined the extreme right as the most important political bloc of the country, which is demonstrated by the majority of young voters who made the difference, because of their concern about their future in the European Union.
Gary Glitter forbidden to travel abroad.
The courts have banned the glamour rock star, Gary Glitter, accused of sexual abuse of children, to travel to France and Spain.
The magistrates have imposed a ban of six months on Glitter after he had spoken to the authorities who had him under control, of his intention to go to Spain via France.
In Kent Police imposed the travel ban last Thursday after having proved that Glitter was guilty of sexual abuse of children.
Glitter, also known by his real name Paul Gadd, was not present at the hearing the limited jurisdiction court of Ashford, but was represented by his lawyer Corker Binning.
A court spokesman said 'Thursday, 25 September in court of Ashford, Kent Police has asked for an application to prevent Paul Gadd to travel in France and Spain until 25 March.
"Paul Gadd was not present at the time".
Glitter, 64 years old, informed the authorities that he wanted to go abroad, leaving him to be recorded in the list of accused for sexual abuse.
He is bound to inform the authorities if it wants to go abroad for more than three days.
He must also inform the police, 7 days before his scheduled date of departure.
If he does not report his movements to the authorities, he could face a sentence of up to five years in prison.
The police in Kent has said that it would not discuss specific cases or potential travel destination of Glitter within the county.
A spokesman for the Kent Police said "The police in Kent will do everything necessary to protect our children as well as those abroad.
"We believe that it is easier to monitor someone who remains in the United Kingdom because we have devices able to manage any potential risks, much more effectively.
"Protecting the people of Kent is the most important intention of the Police of Kent, and we are closely monitoring the behaviour of those who are accused of sexual abuse in the region, in order to minimise the risks to the public."
. Glitter returned to the UK last month, having served 27 months in a Vietnamese prison for having abused two girls of 10 and 11 years respectively.
When he was released, Glitter took the plane to Bangkok where he would have to board a flight to London.
But he said he do not feel well, and refused to go to London.
The Thai authorities stopped him at passport control, and in the end, he went to Hong Kong.
The Chinese authorities refused him entry in their territory, and he was therefore forced to return to Bangkok, where the Thai police and immigration officers insisted that he go back to England.
Finally he arrived at Terminal 3 of Heathrow Airport on 22 August and remained there while his lawyer, David Corker, went to the limited court of jurisdiction of Uxbridge, West London, to record him on the list of people accused of sexual abuse, as required by Scotland Yard.
In the past, Glitter has already served a sentence of four months in the UK, for possession of images of child abuse.
A source of the Ministry of Interior said that Jacqui Smith, the Home Affairs Minister has been reassured and happy to know that Glitter was banned from travelling in France and Spain.
"I photograph the master outside the scene to capture the elements of his character" Günther Bauer - photographer
Or heels of trial of clothes.
The essence of the great masters of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco, released all tensions to get the relaxed aspect of the man or woman.
On the one hand the artist.
On the other, the person.
Inseparable except in intimacy, in these times unknown to the public, where we discover from intimate gestures and stolen looks of artists who do not care to be on stage.
German Günther Bauer mixes in "Flamenco - people" the theatric aspect of a few scenes with singers, dancers and guitarists with this less-known side of artists.
In this project, the photographer takes up the special iconography of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco from different angles.
Included in the program of the Month of the photograph of Flanders, the exhibition "reflects the international importance of flamenco, more every day," explains the creator, who clarifies that "Flamenco - people '" can be anyone but, having seen the pictures, the observer realises that they are not typical images of artists on stage.
These photographed people "in the street" are artists able to pass on stage the passion, the sadness, the joy... by exciting the public.
To capture moments of personality of these artists we should not photograph them on stage.
They have a personality and a unique character.
What interested me was to create an intimate atmosphere which would allow me to capture the personalitie of the stars of flamenco with a camera".
With the festival "Popular Song of Mines" Bauer began in 1997 a long journey to photograph singers, dancers guitarists or dancers with a film camera.
These are potraits which, thanks to the choice of the camera and equipment, give the impression of a classic photograph.
The implementation of various stylistic means breaks with the classic side of the image, with a touch of modernity, this reflects the perception of flamenco according to Bauer: "A very traditional music with roots, that is changing and surprises us every day."
It is not the dancing and singing itself, but the personality and the nature of the artist which captivates the public with his art.
The search for the essence and the magic has been the constant of this work that is now on exhibit at the El Fotómata gallery.
The stars of the flamenco like Diego El Cigala, Chano Lobato, Cristina Hoyos, Enrique Morente, El Lebrijano, Antonio Canales, Vicente Amigo, among others, are part of the selection made from around seventy artists photographed.
The project has turned into an anthologie of flamenco, which will soon be published in a collector's book of the portraits exposed at the gallery.
Passion for portraits has led Bauer to execute the idea two years ago with "portraits of old athletes' ('SportARTproject").
Although the concepts are different in "Flamenco - people ', the photographer admits that he loves photographing the portrait of people, knowing them, and to enter their lives for a moment.
I believe that the portrait is the most difficult kind of photography.
You find yourself in front of people, of characters that sometimes you do not know or give you just a few minutes to photograph them.
Despite these circumstances, as a photographer, I always attempt to convert my ideas into reality".
This collection of portraits of flamenco entitled 'Flamenco - people', is exposed at the El Fotómata gallery, located at No. 20 Rue de la Mata (street parallel to Peupleraie d'Hercules), which will be open until 16 October.
Vargas Llosa confess that the novel that he is writing requires "real courage"
The novel takes place in places that nobody knows and addresses unknown issues, but once again, Mario Vargas Llosa is determined to forward the project he is working on, a novel that has Roger Casemant as main character, an Irish nationalist who lived 20 years in Congo and who passed by the Amazon.
The favourite to win the Nobel Prize for Literature has said yesterday at the Hay festival Segovia that the novel, which currently occupies him "is a real audacity" and that "everything shows that he should not be writing it".
"If I was reasonable, I would not do it, but I will and hope that I can finish it," he concluded in his speech at the festival for exchange of ideas and thoughts which saw a hundred writers, historians and journalists and thousands of people for four days in the town of the aqueduct.
The author of "The city and the dogs' was the most waited for man at the third edition of the festival and has fulfilled his contract.
Vargas Llosa, who won the prize for popular support at the Hay Festival, spoke to a packed auditorium in Juan Bravo.
The host of the Festival, Felix Romeo, was confronted by a fascinated public who hardly realized time pass during which the Peruvian, with a staggering memory and with a great deal of humour, described the birth of his literary vocation, which was due to "his thirst to read" and "to live new experiences"; how he wrote in a "very methodical" manner thanks to the hard work of documentation, correcting and redrafting part of the text to cope with a "lack of inspiration"; how Faulkner, Victor Hugo and Alexandre Dumas have influenced his vocation and how his memories inspire his novels.
The Spanish-American novelist acknowledged that "there is no way" to measure and know whether his books are changing lives. "But I refuse to believe that literature is a pure amusement, a short-lived experience," said Vargas Llosa, who said that it "has the effects" and "makes people less similar", because it asks of writers' "not to give in to frivolity" and to assume their vocation.
Bad weather spoils the fair at Pozoblanco
The festival of banderilles which concludes with the bulls racing at the fair of Pozoblanco has been suspended yesterday morning, after the horse keepers have established that the ring was unusable.
In this way, the organizing committee, in accordance with Fermín Bohórquez, Pablo Hermoso of Mendoza and Leonard Hernández, has decided to suspend the celebration of the bulls race.
Bad weather has hit the fair, because ultimately two festivals out of three could not take place.
Saturday the rain prevented the celebration of the second scheduled bulls race.
According to the schedule, there were José Luis Moreno, Curro Díaz to Juan Bautista, who were to face off in the arena of Castilblanco
Hence only the event on Friday took place
Friday, the winner was Daniel Luque who cut three ears and was carried out in triumph, having made movements of arms with taste and aesthesis faced with the bull.
That afternoon Alejandro Talavante concluded with two banderilles planted on the back of the bull and cut one ear which when the audience discovered applauded more than his fight with the bull itself.
Worse for El text, who entered the arenas of Los Llanos without effort or glory.
In his fight with the second bull, after a fight much better, he was whistled at by most of the public.
Police control of a van in the province of Alava: two thousand kilos of hashish found
Nine fifty five in the morning.
Traffic control of the police in Euskadi (Ertzaintza) on the border of the Community of Armiñón (Alava).
Police officers arrested two occupants of a van while its other two fled.
Its cargo, more than two tonnes of hashish, the reason for which they were arrested.
The police have pursued and have arrested one of the other two occupants, a man of 28 years, identified as A. A. J., according to the information disclosed by the Department of the Interior of the Basque Government.
The individual arrested was accused of drug trafficking and carrying of false documents.
The incident took place when various officials of the Unit of the Traffic control of Alava were making vehicle checks on the N-1, on the border of the Community of Armiñón.
They were about to stop a van to inspect it when the driver broke orders, suddenly accelerated and the chase begun.
The police began their chase until the vehicle stopped two miles up the road, where the two occupants got down to flee into a forested area.
The Basque police have finally arrested one of the two occupants and seized the 2.178 kilograms of hashish that they were carrying which they found after inspecting the van, says an Iveco Daily.
The back of the vehicle was full of ballots of hashish. Then they transfered it to a police station for a thorough inspection and to weigh the drugs.
Moreover, officials have noted that the registration plate was "forged" because it did not correspond to the one written on the grey card of the van, this is also why they have blamed the detainee of falsification of documents.
The Ertzaintza continues its investigation to arrest the other suspect, who has managed to escape and to determine the origin of the drugs that were seized.
The detainee, A. A. J. aged 28 years, has been in custody for committing the various crimes and will be judged in the next few hours.
The actress Heather Locklear arrested for driving under the effect of a drug
The actress Heather Locklear, the famous Amanda of the series TV Melrose Place, was arrested this weekend in Santa Barbara (California) for having driven under the effect of a drug.
A witness saw her making strange manoeuvres in trying to back out of her garage in Montecito, according to what a spokesman for the police patrol of California unveiled to People magazine.
The witness said that at 4.30 p.m., Locklear "pushed hard on accelerator, doing a lot of noise, trying to back out of the garage, and going backwards several times; she was driving with her sunglasses".
Shortly after, the witness, who initially had not recognised the actress saw Locklear stop in the middle of the motorway and get out of her car.
This person, at that time, called the emergency services because "she was concerned about the life of Locklear".
When the Police patrol came it found the actress sitting inside her vehicle, which was partially blocking the road.
"She had a disoriented look about her," that is why the agents led her to the center for drugs and alcohol to conduct a test.
According to a spokesman for the police, the actress has been cooperative and alcohol abuse has been ruled out from the beginning, although "according to the observation of police officers, at first sight, we thought that Locklear was under the influence of a medicine".
Locklear has been arrested for suspected driving under the effect of a substance that has not been disclosed and was imprisoned at 19.00 hours and released a few hours later.
Two months ago, Locklear was released from the clinic in Arizona, where she was interned for care of a nervous breakdown.
Llamazares has asked the Andalusian federation of the United Left to assume its responsibilities in the Silva case
The general coordinator and Member of the United Left, Gaspar Llamazares, said today that it is up to the regional federation to take a decision on the case of the former advisor of Youth and Sport of the City of Seville, Francisco Manuel Silva, who resigned last week after being accused of nepotism.
"In these cases, I am very federalist, and this will be the Andalusian organisation which will have to assume its responsibilities," said Llamazares as regards the behaviour of the political party that he will adopt in the City Council in Seville.
However, the leader of the United Left has called for investigations to show "transparency" for the irregularities that Silva could have made: "The United Left has always defended cases of this kind to have a maximum degree of transparency".
He also stressed that the political party has "very strict ethical codes for all the officials'.
"Sangre de Mayo," the dared say of Garci
Based on the accounts of Benito Pérez Galdós, José Luis Garci recreates the famous battle of Spaniards against the French in "Sangre de Mayo," which is the the most ambitious film in his filmographie with a budget of nearly 15 million.
The film maker has tried to "introduce the many characters and illustrate the social analysis" he has always admired in the work of the famous novelist, he explained today during the presentation of the film, with Quim Gutiérrez and Paula Echevarría at the head of the long list of actors.
The film's duration is more than two and a half hours. "Sangre de Mayo" will debut in cinemas on Friday, which will then become a TV series for Telemadrid of more than four hours.
Great admirer of literature of Galdós, José Luis Garci assures having made this film to resemble "the dream of child" through Esperanza Aguirre, who was in charge, three years ago to make a commemorative film for the two hundred years of 2 May of Madrid, something he has always accepted when the narrative stuck to the historical facts.
The 15 million euros provided by the Madrid Commune are for Garci a "unique opportunity" to replicate with the appropriate settings and clothing the atmosphere  of "a Spain which was mistaken of its leader in the fight, since the fight for independence led people to rebellion under the rule of Ferdinand VII," he said.
But the film maker regrets not having secured funding for films such as "Captain Alatriste" or "The ghosts of Goya" - more than double that obtained for "Sangre de Mayo ’ –, because he was not been able to turn a few scenes written in a script signed by Horacio Valcárcel, with whom he has worked during most of his career.
The film maker of "Volver a empezar" has impressed with his usual way of working on the stage direction of actors, with who he practices before shooting and to whom he gives no casting, since it seems "humiliating" and considers that "the role of the filmmaker is to go to the cinema, or the theatre to remain informed".
Many actors in "Sangre de Mayo" practise in front of the camera, as Miguel Rellán, Carlos Larrañaga or Fernando Guillén Cuervo.
Four times candidate for the Oscar (he has won one), Garci believes that the three films candidates representing Spain this year at the Academy of Hollywood, "Sangre de Mayo," "Seven French billiard tables" and finally the winner, "The blind sunflowers," are not representative of the young Spanish film industry, "which should be better known," he said.
With this film Garci does not expect to win any prizes.
"At the beginning you think you work for posterity, then you realise you work for prosperity, and now you are happy to make a film in addition," explains Garci after more than 30 years of professional career.
Isabelle Bayón plays the part of the Sevillan dancer Tórtola Valencia
A Sevillan dancer will pay tribute to a dancer who is also Sevillan.
Carmen Tórtola Valencia, daughter of a Catalan father (Florenç Tórtola Ferrer) and Andalusian mother (Georgina Valencia Valenzuela), was born in the neighborhood of Triana and at the age of three years went to live in London with her family.
She was a freestyle dancer and specialist of oriental dances.
She had an exciting life, a pioneer of the rights for women, like Isadora Duncan, Virginia Woolf or Sarah Bernhardt.
She was Buddhist and vegetarian and pleaded for the abolition of corsets that prevented the free movement of women.
The life of this woman which has made an impression on the history of  dance in Europe in the period between wars, fascinated Isabelle Bayón.
"I wanted to work with Pepa Gamboa and she asked me to interpret the Sevillian dancer Tórtola Valencia and I thought it incredible".
According to the dancer, "we are not trying to recount her life but to transmit her way of thinking.
The titles of her dances are reminiscent of flamenco.
Thus the "dance of the butterfly" reminded me of a Cuban popular dance and "dance of the snake" of some tangos.
Her dancing was sensuelle and they told me that my way of dancing was identical to hers, "she says.
Staging was made thanks to two outstanding contributions: that of Miguel Poveda who will again sing Isabela in one of his performances, as he had done for "La Puerta Abierta"; and that of Professor Matilde Coral, who was exceptionally eager to work with one of his pupil.
"Matilde transforms Tórtola into a mature figure.
I am pleased because she has agreed to play a role in my work and I am honoured ".
Staging was also made thanks to the music composition and guitars of Jesús Torres and Paco Arriaga, to the popular song of Michel Ortega, el Pulga and Moi de Morón; the percussions of El Pájaro, and the viola of Rafa El Viola and the collaboration of an actor, Juanfra Juárez, "who plays the role of the eternal companion of the kind of artists who were considered divas".
This work also tells, in a way, the life of this woman who performed in places as distant, especially for the time, as India, the United States, or Russia, but also throughout Europe, since she was usually in London.
"I wanted to re-commemorate her because I think it is these women who have had an enormous influence in their time and now no one knows and highlights their work," says Bayón.
The show begins at 8.30 p.m. at the Lope de Vega theatre
The publication of "Journal of a poet recently married" concludes the Triennat
The presentation of the first illustrated edition the "Journal of a poet recently married" in the church of Saint Stephen' at New York, where Juan Ramón Jiménez married Zenobia in March 1916, is part of the activities by the Ministry of Culture of Andalusia to celebrate the "Triennat Zenobia and Juan Ramón" (2006-2008), organised to commemorate the 50th anniversary of the conferring of the Nobel Prize for Literature and their deaths.
In this way, "Triennat Zenobia and Juan Ramón" comes to an end with a repeat of this work with Congress International held in New York, with the restoration of the Nobel Museum and with the moving exhibition "Juan Ramón Jiménez: the citizen of light" which was inaugurated in May last year and which, having travelled in the various provinces of Andalusia, will go to New York at the International Congress.
In the same way, the Ministry of Culture of Andalusia has bought eight hundred copies of "Journal of a poet recently married," edited by Pedro Tabernero and illustrated by Jacobo Pérez-Enciso, to perpetuate the work of one of the most famous Andalusian poets.
America pleases less without Paul Newman
"Sometimes God creates perfect people.
Paul Newman was one of them. "
This sentence was spoken by the actress Sally Field, who has worked with him in 'Absence of Malice ", and illustrates the despair of American cinema, and America in general, faced with the striking idea that Newman is no longer in the world.
It was difficult to receive the Oscar
He was ill since 2007.
Everyone knew that it was ill.
It was a blow for everyone.
"Sometimes what one feels goes beyond any expression, and now I have lost a great friend," wept Robert Redford, "my life and my country were better thanks to its existence.
No one was afraid to be ridiculed or to exaggerate.
One of the fathers of cinema and the homeland died during a particularly obscure period, when terrorists and the stock markets threaten, the esteem of American has fallen, desperately searching for reasons of dignity.
When times are tough and without reason to live, human beings are left with nothing but admiration, and there is no need to be Luis Cernuda to love Paul Newman.
He embodied for everyone an ideal of beauty and truth.
He was the enemy of Richard Nixon and the defender lost and overcome causes, like the foundation for fighting drugs created in honour of his mother who died following an overdose, and the creation of his own brand of organic food.
It was a victory for a country that has had trouble to cope with a suicidal food culture.
This wave of admiration swept Hollywood without care for either nationalities or passports.
The latest James Bond, the English Daniel Craig, noted that no James Bond died before him.
Another English, Oscar winner Sam Mendes, said that working with Newman was the high point of his career.
The bad boy from Australia, Russell Crowe, called Newman his greatest inspiration.
"He has set the bar high," said George Clooney, who is perhaps the only person today who is trying to pierce the screen like Paul Newman: By being very honest and having a serious private life a long way from his objectives.
This is not always easy or possible in the jungle of media today.
But there are some who try, and Paul Newman is an example.
After a divorce with Joanne Woodward to whom he had been married 50 years, during which he always remained faithful even if the opportunities not to be were frequent.
"But why should I eat a hamburger outside home, when I have beef in my fridge?", he used to joke.
In the sky, he meets his daughters with pride; on earth, something which one does not habitually see in America.
"Among all the major roles he has interpreted, he has never been so proud as to play that of the dedicated husband, loving father, caring grandfather and philanthropist," he said.
Madrid in the race for the 2016 Olympic Games
And yes, the dream of many of us is that Madrid should host the Olympic Games, and after the failure of 2012, this could be achieved by 2016.
But I wonder if we are ready.
If we take the example of the race yesterday: We are not!
They call the race perfect, but I think it was the worst race that I have ever participated in.
If they had taken into account all the mistakes that occurred during the race, it would be an elimination note straightaway.
But look at everything in detail and from the start.
The mistakes began with the withdrawal of jerseys, which forced you to come forward.
This isn't necessarily bad, but if they do move you it would be better if they gave you everything (including the electronic chips for the race)
And no
They bring you down just to collect the jersey (first mistake, travel all the way only for that) and (after a long queue) surprise!, the only size was S  (second mistake, because I need a size XL)
What world do we live in?
Is it because of the crisis that they have decided to buy small shirts with less fabric and cheaper at the same time?
Well, this is nothing compared to what happened the day of racing.
Apart from the fact that one must go very early to withdraw the chip, the queue is 15 minutes, and one must leave one's bag at the entrance.
The wait lasted more than 35 minute;, it is incomprehensible given that 11 000 people are expected to these races.
Since there was a long queue, competitions began and we had not yet left our bags at the entry, although once there, the return was even worse.
Moreover, the rain accompanied the expectations of more than 40 minutes during which took place rebellion and assault of the stands.
I think about 500 people will have pneumonia tomorrow, and some people like myself, do not even figure in the classification with the exact time, because the chip that they gave me didn't record the start correctly.
Of course, if they asked me to name a perfect race, this one certainly woulnd't come to mind.
And so I believe that we can keep dreaming of becoming the host city for the 2016 Olympic Games..
Microsoft is seeking a receptionist (virtual)
At the conference on emerging technologies at MIT Microsoft has been presented a new system of recognition of image and human interaction, a kind of artificial Intelligence with little intelligence but able to do some basic tasks, such as call a taxi (or in the case of Microsoft, a shuttle for travel in the campus of the company) in response to what it was asked during a conversation.
With a camera and a system of recognizing forms and faces, this "receptionist" can know how many people are in the place, who they are - what posts they occupy - and listen and hear the keywords of their conversations.
But also pool them into groups of conversation
In the video presentation, the receptionist detects a third person, but it understands that the person is not part of the group that is speaking with her and that she is not part of the company.
It asked her if she was here to visit someone and told her that it would respond in a few moments.
All this without a blue screen.
Impressive.
But of course this is the future.
Now the company has other things on which to focus, for example, the next version of its operating system, Windows.
What's more, this week, a change of strategy was discussed at Microsoft.
Windows 7 will be lighter and it will no longer have as many programmes involved.
Steve Ballmer has found that if the computers were sold with only the essentials instead of many unnecessary applications, they would work five times faster.
This represents a discovery since Microsoft, version after version, has not ceased to add functions and "perks," to Windows.
The change of strategy is welcome.
Microsoft is right, its operational system is losing importance but also its software.
When Google chrome appeared on the network, I was one of those who believed that Google chrome was the first step on Google's part to compete with Windows.
Several people have rightly pointed out that an Internet browser is not an operational system.
The operational system will always be necessary because it is essential for the hardware and software to understand each other.
It occupies the same function as your wife or your husband when you have to say something to your mother-in-law.
It's true.
It will never disappear but we must see the "death" of the absolute operating system, which must give way to a relative operating system.
This week, Ballmer has confirmed this idea.
People pay less and less attention to the operating system but increasingly to their Internet browser.
We switch on the computer only to run Firefox, Explorer or Chrome and every day people spend more time surfing the Internet than to open windows.
Who uses even half of the applications provided with the system?
Not many.
And Windows 7 will contain less applications, much fewer than Vista.
Less cumbersome, less heavy, less complex.
For the moment, Microsoft is more interested in the launch of its own online services to become an alternative to Google.
They desperately need this, and I show you an example.
The photo in this article, was taken earlier this month in one of the rooms reserved for employees of Microsoft at Redmond.
On the drinks dispenser, a poster advertising their request to use their own research tool, "Your research. Our future".
In 2006, a study concluded that 66% employees of Microsoft used Google to seek information on the Internet.
Last week a delay happened in the release of the new version of Windows Mobile 7.
It will not be released at the beginning of 2009 but by late 2009 or even in 2010.
Microsoft will surely attempt to launch Windows 7 and Windows Mobile 7 at the same time.
The phone, after all, is increasingly becoming a computer.
But the launch of Android being delayed and the iPhone already on the market, will cost them dear.
The awesome Marcel
Pablo Picasso assumed his role on the Côte d'Azur, Leonardo Di Caprio wore one in Edward Zwick's 'Blood Diamond',  as did Al Pacino in "The godfather' of Francis Ford Coppola and is part of the holding of the Association of well-built gays.
And if we start to list all his appearances, we could also mention the strapping moustachu who lifted weights in a travelling circus.
This is not merely a male body in a cotton shirt, milling and without sleeves.
The English call him tank but the awesome Marcel of Brussels stands out among all the other.
Firstly, by his name flamboyant - although he is known as Marcel, – which has to do with the sport as it takes after the name, according to legend, of the boxer Marcel Cerdan, a lover of the singer Edith Piaf.
The Marcel differs from others by his excellent cotton, by his unisex look, with his distinctive logo and by the Belgian flag (barely recognisable) that the most well-known jerseys have on the neck.
But pay attention, the Belgian brand does not make only tank tops.
But it also make sweat-shirts, old fashioned boxers, cardigans made from cashmere, cotton trousers, babies, and mini-shorts...
Clothes designed for the comfort of underwear.
But it is a shame to be wearing them just as underwear.
They have too much charm.
'I want to become a young mother; the candidate does not worry me "
He huge resemblance to her sister has not prevented her from developing her own personality.
Monica Cruz is petite but full of vitality.
Currently the sisters Cruz are taking their new activity in the trend very seriously.
According to Monica, they are not just beautiful and famous girls who are lending their names.
They were present at the promotion that the brand Mango made  at its new headquarters in Paris but also at the presentation of the most important fashion prize from the sponsoring Spanish house.
Monica is warm and timid.
Tells us what you do in Paris.
I came to present the new collection that my sister Penelope and myself have created for Mango for the new autumn-winter season, but also to attend the presentation of the second edition of Mango Fashion Awards and also the Opera dinner in honour of Valentino.
A very intense but, at the same time, exciting, day we expect.
On what is based your new collection created for Mango for the fourth season?
The cinema of the 1950s and 1960s fascinates us and much of our work is inspired by it.
I very much like to make a trip into town and observe women to see how they are dressed, how they combine their clothes; I often do it.
Dancer, actress and painter, you are a very versatile woman: is it not?
I believe yes, but in the end they are joined and these activities have a lot in common.
Since I was very little I loved clothes; I love to go to my grandmother's house to look in my aunt's closet, and to see her clothes.
It was great, almost better than to go to the amusement park.
Then, when I became a dancer, I started to take care of my dressing.
Dancers love to dress for classes and tests, to look in the mirror and feel good.
And in the role of actress, when you wear the clothes that's the point at which you really step into the skin of the character.
Suddenly, everything is linked.
You turned 30 a little while ago: has this been hard for you?
Not at all.
I feel better than ever, I'm delighted with my 30 years.
I find that the woman is more mature, has more experience and relishes life with fewer problems.
The biological clock does not scare me.
I have done all the things that I wanted to since I was little and it has given me a lot of happiness.
Then, are you thinking of becoming a mother?
Of course, I want to become mother because my body demands it, and I want to become a young mother; I do not want to lose it.
With regard to the candidate, I don't worry.
What I will do that is to give happiness to my son and raise him with a lot of love.
Coming to cinema, you expect the various movies you shot last year to be released.
It is true, I look forward to their release.
I am a woman from the theatre, I am very anxious and concerned, I would like to have everything now but of course it is not possible.
I look forward to  the films 'La última hora' and 'En busca de tumba de Cristo'.
We need to wait to see what you think...
A few days you debuted on the ramp with Naomi Campbell, is it not?
Do not say that.
I didn't walk the ramp to be a mannequin.
It's just that, Naomi Campbell called me, – I have known her for some time, – to invite me to participate in London at a parade for charity in favour of support for women and the clothing that we exhibited - I exhibited two clothes of our collection created for Mango - were sold at an auction to collect money for  Naomi's NGO.
People say that Naomi is a person with a warm heart.
They say so much about he, I know, many things are not true.
Moreover, this beautiful side of Naomi fascinates me.
She asked me to go up for a noble cause, but if she had asked to act the pear tree, I would have done it anyway.
The importance is to make life better for women in the developing world.
Repeated drunk-driving offenders  will have to install an alcolock system
The interior minister wants the driver who has had more than three administrative penalties for alcoholism, to install in his vehicle a system which prevents the vehicle from starting in a state of drunkenness, or if he refuses to have his breath checked.
The initiative was already announced last June and it now appears in the report by the Minister of State in which this initiative is seen as a pilot project that will last a year.
Its aim is the reintegration of the driver through road re-education.
The Minister of State for road safety but also the General Directorate of Road Safety and the Technological Foundation Institute for Automobile Security will participate in this initiative.
According to the statistics, between 30% and 75% of drivers arrested for drunken driving more than once, go back to the wheel.
The alcolock would prevent this because it is a trendy system on the vehicle which measure the rate of alcohol in the breath and prevents the car from starting if the driver does not blow into it before; or when the rate of alcohol in the driver's breath is higher than the allowed threshold.
Its cost is higher than 1,000 euros and is the responsibility of the driver.
In this respect, a study in the US in 2007 showed that the vehicles equipped with this device cut up to 65% of offences during the first year of installation.
And in Spain it is estimated that it could save the lives of 115 people each year.
This measure is being introduced by administrative sanction for two reasons: face ones behavior before it becomes a criminal offence.
And to facilitate its implementation, as legal reform can be made by ordinary routes but reform made by punishment requires a reform of the organic law.
The system is not yet available on the Spanish market, although some industrial vehicles and office have already installed a few on an experimental basis.
Tomorrow, Congress of Deputies will vote an initiative of the Spanish Socialist Party, which proposes to install this system in school buses as has been done in France.
In Mexico without peep-toes
At 5.40 p.m., official time, the plane of the Spanish air force in which the Princes of Asturias traveled landed in the presidential hangar of the airport Benito Juárez in Mexico DF.
The sun was about to set but its rays forced one to shielf ones eyes to see the royal couple get off the plane.
At the foot of the stairs, the Spanish Ambassador and other authorities were present.
A few hours before I had asked the taxi driver in the street, if he was aware that the Spanish Princes were visiting the city to conclude their official trip.
- oh, well, we cannot go to the airport for customers at this time... Are you from hereabouts or …?
No, sir I am Spanish but I have lived here two years.
- Ah, well...
But the Mexican press knows who are the Princes of Asturias and knows the importance of the journey.
They are several waiting in the hangar at the airport near the red carpet and a military row of 27 marine soldiers.
The Prince is smiling and dressed in sea blue, while the Princess, her hair floating in the wind, is dressed quite soberly and is not in her usual peep-toes' '; perhaps they had warned her that a storm threatened.
They make a short stop for the photographers before moving into the room where all the officials await them.
At the door of the hotel where they will stay, one of the four major hotels of the city, a funny journalist fro  Mexican television awaits them.
The most prestigious prize in fashion
There is certainly no better place in the world to present a fashion prize than in Paris and there is certainly no living artist more extraordinary and bon-vivant than Valentino.
Mango has just presented the second edition of the Botón-Mango Fashion Awards, in order to strengthen international image of the new talents of the fashion industry.
The winner will be rewarded with a prize of 300,000 euros.
Yesterday Sandrina Fasoli, the Belgian winner of the first edition, watched her models in the window of Mango at 54 Boulevard Haussmann in Paris and she almost began crying with emotion.
Of course it is the second largest shop of the brand in Europe that has been opened with a surface area of 1.335 square metres.
The largest is in London.
The events, and the desire to thank the designer Valentino, chairman of the jury of the competition, conspired to make it so that we were in a luxurious dinner at the opera Garnier of Paris.
With the table of the extraordinary family Chagals as neighbour, the presidential table prepared by Mango, seemed even more spectacular.
With grief in his heart on the recent death of his brother, Nati wore a Mango dress and a couple of ornaments from ELAH, which was breathtaking, and arm in arm with her son Luis - a tall man, almost two metres in height – she accompanied Valentino to the dinner prepared in his honour.
Andik, the owner of Mango, a galant man, and the Baron of Rotchil finished the evening without their jackets because they had lent them to two women.
Monica Cruz, who presented herself at the event with a pair of trousers and a shirt — from her own collection, – and for the dinner metamorphosed by wearing a long sexy black dress, and was moved when during the night visit to the opera, accompanied by Goya Toledo, they showed us the practise room for ballet and remembering the good old days, she took a bar and did a full split.
Inés Sastre did not stay for the visit of the palace dependants, but showed us photos of her son on her mobile phone before she left.
The next morning, we have had the pleasure of seeing Olivier Martínez – another big man who drives a motorbike - and John Travolta, who arrived at the intercontinental Hotel in Paris, with his own sheets and towels and asked in advance, that there should be no smell in his bedroom.
Stars in the starry sky of Paris.
Oh, this is life.
1001, the antistress number
There are not only 1,000 but 1001 ways to forget the chaos and the frenzy of daily life.
And to top it all, they are all listed in a book which will bring relaxation to bookshops on 30 September.
The alarm makes one sad when it sounds almost every morning at 7 a.m., but it is even worse when one thinks of the agitated rythm that life presents us with.
The office is synonymous with tension and the computer with pain in the back.
Stress is the evil of the twenty-first century.
But there is no one or two methods to combat fatigue daily and the problems linked to the world of work.
But 1001, and not one more or less.
Apart from the positions of yoga, the classic massage or spa treatments, Susannah Marriott gathers in the pages of a book a whole menu of methods suited to the taste and the time of each.
The antistress book is entitled '1001 ways to relax' and will arrive at the booksellers directly from the publisher Pearson Alhambra and DK.
If someone believes that it is not possible to achieve peace in places such as work or through personal relations, this manual demands such a belief.
Moreover, the manual offers other methods such as contact with nature or 100% natural recipes which help to relax.
If adrenalin does not course through your veins to restore the balance of your body and if the stress has become a problem, it is time to sit in the sofa, to disconnect from your spirit and focus on reading.
Speak in sleeping
A few children speak during the night.
I do not refer to those who wake up fully awake and recount something that happened the day before, but children who speak during their sleep.
The first time this happens may surprise you, but in reality it does not matter.
It is a benign change of sleep called somniloquie.
It is quite common, especially among children and adolescents.
It is certain that more than one speaks during the night.
This phenomenon can be very sporadic (once in a lifetime, for example, associated with an episode of strong fever), or on a more regular basis (every day, once a week, once a month...); the day after the child does not remember anything.
There is no single cause which determines its occurrence
They are often linked to other changes in sleep such as nightmares, terrors of the night, bed-wetting or sleepwalking, but this is not always the case.
As we have said before, they can also be associated with very high fever, to situations of stress or agitation and excitement.
In any case it is a hardly studied phenomenon.
The intensity with which it happens is also very different.
It may be that the person speaks with a small, quiet voice, with isolated words, murmurs or on the contrary with cries, tears, long speeches...
In cases where the somniloquie is very frequent, it would be good to observe the child and consult a specialist, to see if there is a problem which causes a lot of anxiety and in order to obtain an explanation for this problem.
We have said that this is a benign alteration, that is why there is no treatment, unless it is linked to a alteration of sleep that can be treated (for example, if it is linked to a sleep disorder or stress).
What we can do is take into account a number of very simple precautions such as:
Try not to excite the child before it goes to sleep.
Therefore find games which are calming and avoid programs or television series that contain violence.
With very nervous children and those who have difficulty relaxing, relaxation techniques can be used to help calm them internally.
This will allow children to have a more peaceful sleep.
As soon as somniloquy appears try to stay calm.
Remind yourslef that they are harmless for the child and that the next day it will remember nothing of what happened.
Useful advice
Do not wake the child up.
It is unnecessary since it is unconscious and you are waking it up.
Even if he speaks, he is sleeping and is therefore at rest.
Remind yourself that if the child seems very anxious several times, it is advisable to consult a doctor to check what causes that much anxiety in children.
If you understand what he says (which is not usual), don't be tempted to question him to obtain information.
You will achieve nothing, because in sleeping, he is not sufficiently aware to organize his thoughts.
Moreover, you will hear what he says, but you will not know what he is dreaming, because of the way you interpret information and the conclusions you draw from it.
Don't ever tell the child that you can listen to him at night to know his secret.
Not even in joking.
This causes a lot of anxiety.
In conclusion, don't worry, it is nothing bad, it is an episode that lasts only a few minutes.
Illhaeusern finally...
Illhaeusern has finally found the road to victory on home territory after a long period of famine.
Without making a great match, the yellow and blacks created the most chances and managed to convert one to win the match.
The pace was not very sustained during an encounter where the attackers found it difficult to do anything.
After a first attempt by the visitor captain Kauffmann which grazed the woodwork on a shot from far, Illhaeusern took the upper hand slightly with another shot from far by Fonderflick, then with Hirn going above, Roman with the end of his foot or Diebold tickling the Dannemarie defence.
In front, they made a block in the centre of the ground leaving just Riahi at the forefront of the attack.
The start of the second half-time would be decisive with first two chances falling to Riahi and Temporale for Dannemarie, and immediately after the opening of the score for the Illhousiens by Marais, well positioned to use a ball rebounded on a first attempt by Diebold (53rd minute).
But the Illhousiens goal scorer was not able to enjoy his happiness long and was be forced to return to the changing rooms a dozen minutes later and leaving his team mates with one man less.
But Dannemarie could not benefit from the situation caused no major problems to an Illhousien team which fell back just a little to make a "compacter" defence, except in the last few seconds to play when, after a big scuffle, the ball was very close to crossing the goal line.
Sarkozy at the meeting of angry fishermen
Before leaving for the US, Nicolas Sarkozy will take a detour going by Bretagne.
With the show in strength of fishermen who have severely disrupted the access of several ports on Monday in Brittany and Normandy, the President of the Republic has decided to go on Tuesday morning to the port of Guilvinec, in Finisterre, to meet their representatives.
They have promised to welcome him "in a constructive spirit" and hope that he "will come with concrete proposals".
A presidential visit comes at the same time as a General Assembly of the "committe for crisis" created by fishermen of Breton to obtain measures in the face of soaring oil prices, which reached a record of 1.14 euro per litre on average.
According to the spokesman for lElysée David Martinon, the President "will discuss solutions that could possibly help their businesses to regain competitiveness and to secure jobs and pay for sailors with them'.
Nicolas Sarkozy is expected to be firm by fishermen.
Tuesday morning, they have created blockades in Morbihan and Calvados, causing traffic jams of nearly 10 km.
The recreational port of Quiberon was also blocked, but the connections to Belle-ile weren't.
A filtering dam has been put in place on the peninsula of Quiberon.
The sailors have already shown their determination on Monday by burning, from early in the morning, tyres and pallets in front of deposits of fuel at the ports of Brest and Lorient, while the demonstrations were under way at Concarneau or St Brieuc.
The movement has spread to other ports of the Atlantic coastline and the Channel, for example to Sables d'Olonne, in the Vendée, where fishing boats were idle, or at Le Havre, where twenty vessels have blocked ship movements of trade.
Fishermen in The Turballe and Croisic, in the Loire-Atlantic, have stopped the blockade of the important refinery Total of Donges in the evening .
Those of Boulogne-sur-Mer have decided to wait for the meeting on Wednesday at the Ministry to decide on eventual actions.
At Guilvinec, the 'crisis committee' should decide on Tuesday the follow-up to the movement and its participation in the stop-gap solution previewed at the Ministry of Agriculture and Fisheries in Paris.
But some fishermen in Brittany do not want to be represented by leaders of the National Committee of Fisheries, which has not supported their movement.
"The strike will continue," because "the fishermen will not give up" and "do not want to travel to Paris', has announced Liliane Cariou, the chairman of the Committee of Fisheries of Lorient.
Professional fishermen, who do not pay taxes on diesel, now pay about 50 cents per litre but they believe that the threshold of profitability of a boat is achieved with a diesel below 0.30 euro per litre.
Paul Newman the magnificent
The unforgettable interpreter of "Butch Cassidy and the Kid" died as a result of cancer at the age of 83 years, in his house in Connecticut.
Hillary and Bill Clinton, Nicolas Sarkozy, George Clooney, Julia Roberts, Robert Redford and Sam Mendes saluted the legend of cinema and the actor, Paul Newman, who died at the age of 83.
Embraer maintains its forecasts for delivery in 2008
The Brazilian aircraft manufacturer promises to deliver 215 planes this year despite the threat of recession that loom over the global economy.
The fourth largest world aircraft manufacturer, Embraer, maintains its forecast for 2008 with 215 aircraft deliveries, re-affirmed Fredrico Fleury Curado, its chairman.
In the first half, the aircraft manufacturer and delivered 97 aircrafts.
The Brazilian manufacturer is banking on the Chinese market especially for its aircrafts in the range of 30 to 120 seats.
So far, Embraer has delivered 41 aircrafts to its Chinese customers in eight years.
AIG will consider giving up more than 15% of its assets
The insurer American International Group, that the US monetary authorities have fixed, plans to give more than 15% of its assets to repay the $85 billion that they have borrowed, according to the Financial Times on Sundays.
AIG is willing to study the sale of most of its activities beyond life insurance to the international market and its retirement plans in the US, the newspaper says and cites sources close to the matter.
The board of AIG met Sunday evening to examine possible cessions, according to FT.
No confirmation came from AIG.
The assets which AIG plans to give up comprises of its subsidiary of air leasing International lease Financial Corp., its participation of 59% in the insurance company Transatlantic Holdings and its property portfolio and its investment in the private equity, it said.
No final decision has been taken on these cessions, said FT.
AIG must quickly achieve liquidity to repay the loan of 85 billion that the Federal Reserve loaned it at the risk of the American authorities taking 80% of its capital, diluting the share due to the current shareholders.
Historic Paris Analysis of the sitting Morning Meeting Historic Morning Meeting
The New York Stock Exchange has suffered a record drop on Monday after the rejection by the House of Representatives of the Paulson plan to bail out banks: The Dow Jones has lost 6,98%, a never before seen loss approaching the 800 points, and the Nasdaq 9,14%.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average (DJIA) plunged from 777,68 points to 1O.365,45 points.
In terms of points, the biggest drop in its history (684,81 points) had previously been recorded on 17 September 2001, the day of the resumption of trade after the terrorist attacks of 11 September.
The technology-dominated Nasdaq index, has yielded 199,61 points to 1.983,73 index and the broader Standard & Poor's 500 8,81% (106,85 points), 1.106,55 points, according to the final figures.
Already depressed at the beginning of the sitting, Wall Street slumped still further after the unexpected rejection by the House of Representatives of the rescue plan of banks that was supposed to lend a bit of stability to the markets.
By 228 votes against and 205 votes for, the representatives refused the Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson the means that he asked.
Almost two Republicans out of three rejected his plan.
"It is a bad sign for the market, which sees the Congress unable to adopt a plan," said Lindsey Piegza, FTN Financial.
"This shows how much the market depended on the plan", she added, fearing that a draft adopted in several days may be "too late".
"If the project is moribund (...) then the relay will be quickly passed on to the Fed (the US central bank, included) and other central banks to manage the crisis, which will further tighten the credit conditions, said Brian Bethune, chief economist at Global Insight.
And accentuating still further the sense of urgency, "every day that goes by ushers the fall of a financial institution" in the US, said Mrs Piegza.
After the bankruptcy of Washington Mutual on Friday, the authorities have held the purchase of banking activities of Wachovia by its rival Citigroup.
In Europe, the crisis has suddenly accelerated, pushing banks to emergency measures in the United Kingdom, the Benelux, Iceland and Germany, a sign that the markets are facing "not only a US crisis, but a global crisis," added the analyst at FTN Financial.
The bond market has risen sharply.
The 10-year interest of the Treasury fell to 3,632%, against 3,827% on Friday evening, and for 30 years to 4,161%, against 4,357% the previous day.
Obama wins the points in the first televised duel
The first debate on Friday between the two candidates for the White House was followed by another to know which of John McCain and Barack Obama prevailed.
Not surprisingly, the Republican and Democratic campaign headquarters have declared their own victory in the televised duel which would have been followed by a third of American families.
The political analyst David Gergen believe that the performance of John McCain, although honourable, was not sufficiently "brilliant" to allow him to halt the decline in the polls for the presidential elections that he had been seeing for five weeks.
The Gallup Institute, which published an opinion poll on Saturday to give an advance of five points to Obama (49% to 44% to McCain), believes that it is the Democrat who held his own.
Among the undecided voters, who really count the most, Obama won for 39% of respondents, while 25% of them handed the victory to McCain, according to a CBS poll.
Obama should be able to confirm his advance on Thursday with the performance expected from his colistier, Joseph Biden, in the first and only public debate with his rival, Sarah Palin.
"It would be a mistake to underestimate her.
She is has the right instincts," warned Bill Clinton this weekend.
The septuagenarian McCain has repeatedly put forward his indisputable experience in foreign policy, while emphasising the "naiveness" of his opponent in these matters that were at the heart of this first contest.
"Senator Obama does not seem to understand that..." he accused on several occasions.
"I do not believe that Senator Obama has the experience and knowledge needed to be president," he also assured.
A line of attack stressed since yesterday in Republican television commercials.
Obama has said that he is the future.
Without pomp, he was brief and precise.
He has put forward his ability to make the right decisions, and to restore America's image in the world.
"McCain has still not understood, while Obama has," said, this weekend, a Republican spot to a Democrat, accusing it of not having grasped the impact of the crisis on the "American in the street.
"During the 90-minute debate, John McCain had a lot to say about me, but nothing on you, denounced Obama, yesterday, to 20 000 people gathered for an election rally in North Carolina in pouring rain.
He didn't even use the words "middle class" or "workers". "The financial crisis clearly hands the advantage to Obama, who is regarded by the Americans as the most able to save the economy teetering on the brink.
"Next week could be a turning point," said the influential Democratic Senator Charles Schumer yesterday.
Democratic Representative Rahm Emanuel, a former member of the Clinton administration, has compared the "Obama's good economic instincts" to those of Bill Clinton during the 1998 financial crisis.
For the Democratic candidate, the current debacle "is the final verdict of eight years of bad economic policy implementation by George Bush and supported by Senator McCain."
Reaffirming that he would manage to cut taxes for 95% of Americans despite the unpredictability of Wall Street, the Senator from Illinois has also pointed out that the achievement of a possible energy independence of the country by the promotion of renewable energy was his first priority, along with the establishment of a system of health insurance.
McCain, on his part wanted to build a fleet of 45 nuclear power plants by 2030.
Cautious, the two candidates have ducked questions concerning the extremely unpopular financial rescue package of $700 billion (470 billion) adopted yesterday evening by Congress.
A Minsk, "have you noticed that there was an election?"
Demonstrations by the dissenting young on Sunday evening in the main square in the capital of Belarus to reject the legislative results in advance.
A few hundred Belarussians met Sunday evening immediately after the close of the polling stations on the central place in Minsk to protest against the fraudulent nature of legislation.
While no result had yet been announced, many young people came to demonstrate against the power of President Alexander Lukashenko: "The dictator, resign".
Some admit not having even voted: "What good would it do, because they will do what they want my voice," said a youth.
They do not believe that the regime, which has been good to foreign observers in the aim of resuming talks with the European Union, is prepared to carry out a democratic watershed.
Sanctions, including a ban on visas for 40 Belarusian leaders and the freezing of some assets, could be lifted if these elections are considered as fair by observers.
They have not been that according to the opposition.
"We have been excluded from the electoral commission and our observers have not been able to participate in the count," regretted Yuri Potemkin, the spokesman of the Union of the Democratic Forces, a heterogeneous reunification of twelve parties.
"This is a cosmetic change, highlights Alexander Milinkevich, a former opposition candidate for the presidency in 2006 and leader of the pro-European movement, because the important thing is the voice, and here, the executing power.
If Members of the opposition are in parliament it is because they have been appointed, not elected.
But their entry in parliament can mean space on television, meetings in the regions and the draft laws. "
The opposition has therefore entered the political game claiming that "we must begin a dialogue with the European Union.
Because if our economy, which is heavily indebted towards Russia, enters into crisis, and that we do not reform, we are in danger of becoming a protectorate of Russia.
But we want to be independent.
The opposition fears that the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe that followed the election process does not recognize the validity of the election.
It stresses that the figures of participation seem too high, and the generalisation of the vote in advance (26% of voters in Minsk) opened the possibilty for all manipulations.
"You have noticed that there was an election?" questions the Social Democrat leader Alexander Kazulin, one of the last two political prisoners released in August this year.
There was no one in the polling stations.
And there will be a maximum of five Members of the opposition in parliament, those who are best suited to power. "
The silence of the night falls on the place of October.
On television, President Lukashenko and the members of the central electoral commission welcome their success.
The interview - blood become sure again
Héma-Quebec celebrated yesterday the 10th anniversary of its founding, and its chairman, Dre Francine Décary, had reason to rejoice, because Héma-Quebec has become one of the largest providers of blood safety and effectiveness of the world.
And above all, it has regained the confidence of the public who had been badly shaken by the contaminated blood scandal in the 1980s and 1990s.
As we know, the national reserves of blood transfusion Service managed by the Canadian Red Cross were infected with the acquired immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and the hepatitis C virus during the 1980s.
In the wake of this tragedy and resentment of the public, the government of Canada has established in February 1994 a public inquiry, chaired by the judge Horace Krever, to shed light on the circumstances that led to such a tragedy and to make recommendations so that such a disaster never occurs again.
While the judge Krever delayed in submitting his report, some provinces set up a committee with the objective of planning a new system of management of blood in Canada.
In Quebec, the committee Gélineau has fulfilled this mandate.
Following the reports by Gélineau and Krever, two suppliers were created in Canada: Héma-Quebec to serve Quebec and the Canadian company of blood to supply all other provinces and the two territories.
"In 1998, when Héma-Quebec began its activities, only 38% of people still had confidence in the system of blood in Quebec, recalls Dre Décary.
The situation was discouraging.
After much effort to improve the safety of blood products and work on the ground during the years that followed, we have returned public confidence, "he said proudly that at the beginning of 2008, nearly 94% of the population of Quebec had now confidence in Héma-Quebec.
Dre Décary however, bears in mind that "trust is extremely fragile".
Since its creation, on 28 September 1998, Héma-Quebec has applied the precautionary principle.
At that time we witnessed the outbreak many cases of the human form of mad cow disease in Europe, a new variant of Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease, recounts the one that stood strong since its founding in 1998.
"And we did not know whether the disease could be transmitted by blood.
We based ourselves on a key recommendation of the reports by Krever and Gélineau, which stated that when we don't know it and a serious disease can follow, – Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease which is characterised by a brain degeneration leading inevitably to death, – we introduced measures of exclusion.
In April 1999, we refused to give people blood of persons who had been more than a month in the UK since 1980.
And a few years ago, it has been proven beyond any doubt that the disease is transmitted by the blood.
This episode has shown that the precautionary principle that has been applied, made sense. "
In 1999 a much more sensitive means of testing HIV appeared on the market: the nucleic acid test (TAN) that can detect directly the presence of the virus itself and not that of antibodies against the virus in the blood donors, on which tests had based themselves so far.
The TAN have allowed to shorten the dormant period, which stretches between the time when the person has been infected and when the first virus can be found in blood by our technique, explains the specialist.
We were able to reduce this period to less than a week.
We have thus substantially reuduced the risk that some donors are infected without their own knowledge and that we cannot detect it.
These improvements have significantly reduced the risk of contracting HIV by a blood transfusion.
Today, one in 12 million runs the risk of blood being infected with HIV.
"In other words, it means we will need to distribute 12 million blood products before someone is infected with HIV.
As Héma-Quebec distributes each year between 400 and 500 000 blood products, it will take more than 24 years before a case of transmission of HIV by a blood products strikes.
I believe that we can now feel comfortable to receive or to prescribe a blood transfusion to recover health, "says the head of the direction of Héma-Quebec.
"Our challenge for the next decade is to maintain the safety of our products.
You never know what pathogenic will emerge in the system.
No later than last year on the island of Réunion the chikungunya virus appeared which, like the West Nile virus, is transmitted by an insect in the blood.
We must be constantly vigilant ", continued Dre Décary before stressing that on top of security of supply, Héma-Quebec must also provide an adequate supply.
"The needs are increasing because the population is ageing.
Anti-cancer treatments being more aggressive, patients are often in need of recharge in red or white blood cells.
The ageing population also has implications for the network of blood donors which brings together on average only 3% of eligible Quebecian blood donors. "
Anyone in health, aged 18 years and responding to the eligibility criteria can still give blood every 56 days, or six times a year.
On average, 14% of those who offer their blood are not accepted, because they are suffering from AIDS or malaria, and if they have travelled in a country where there is malaria, they will be excluded for a period of one year.
"With these 3%, we manage to maintain an inventory that meets the needs of hospitals.
Shortages are very rare.
But we must renew the members of this network of donors as they get older and cannot give their blood.
But it is difficult to convince people to give their blood, but above all to retain and encourage them to become regular donors.
Life today being so hectic, there is rarely the time to spend an hour to give blood," laments Francine Décary.
With an annual budget of $297 million, Héma-Quebec not only provides blood products, but also tissues, including bone grafts, heart valves, eyeballs and skin that are almost exclusively used for the severely burned.
These tissues are analysed, processed and frozen before being stored in Héma-Quebec which manages also the only public bank of umbilical cord blood in Quebec.
The umbilical cord which was once considered a biomedical waste is full of a rich blood stem cells that can be used to treat serious diseases, such as leukaemia.
"We celebrated, a few weeks ago, the banking of our thousandth sample of umbilical cord blood and are expected to take more than a thousand per year.
We should start offering transplants early next year, "says Dre Décary who describes this programme of removal of umbilical cord blood as very popular.
"Several mothers are disappointed not to be able to have access to it," because Héma-Quebec does not have the resources to propose this complex and expensive programme in all hospitals in Quebec.
Soccer - The Impact in the semi-finals
Impact de Montreal has qualified for the semi-finals of the eliminatory rounds of the first division of the USL, thanks to a 3-1 victory (4-3 in total of goals) at the expense of Seattle Sounders yesterday, at the second and decisive game of the series quarterfinals in total of goals, at the Saputo stadium.
The midfielder Antonio Ribeiro scored the winning goal in the 90th minute of play.
After a first half without goals on both sides, the midfielder David Testo and Rocco Plancentino hit the Montréal net.
Roger Levesque was the only one to outplay Matt Jordan for the Sounders.
Remember that in the first match of the series on Friday, the Impact had suffered a defeat of 2-1 at Starfire Complex, in Tukwila, in a suburb of Seattle.
The Impact will mee the Vancouver Whitecaps in the semi-finals.
Saturday night in Minnesota, the Thunder filled a deficit of 3-1 in the match and returned to win 4-3, but the Whitecaps reached the semi-final round 5-4 on total goals.
The Impact should face the Whitecaps Friday and Sunday, but the details of the series will be confirmed today.
In short - victorious goal for Kovalev
The number one trio of the Canadien is prepared to take the season.
The unit of Alex Kovalev, Tomas Plekanec and Andrei Kostitsyn enlivened the attack in a gain of 3-2 of the Canadian over Florida Panthers in a barrage of shots, yesterday evening, at the Bell Centre.
Kostitsyn, the first star of the meeting, scored a goal, Plekanec amassed two more, and Kovalev reaped a pass in the win, the fourth of the Tricolore in six preparatory matches.
Kovalev handed the victory with the only goal
"I am not yet ready, warned the Russian.
I must play another match to feel comfortable. "
"He has tried to do too much in the first period, noted Guy Carbonneau.
But I think he appreciated the end of the match.
He received a nice ovation. "
Charest put North
The Prime Minister does not exclude the possibility of triggering the elections before the end of the year
Immediately after the General Council of the Liberal Party, Jean Charest went to Jean-Achilles, Quebec, where the new Minister of Health, Yves Bolduc (left), is trying to get elected in the election today.
'Push the limits of our last great northern border': This is the long-term ambition that Jean Charest presented with visual force while remaining within limits, at the end of the General Council of the Liberal Party of Quebec, Lévis, yesterday.
Behind him, during his speech, was projected a kind of windmill of images.
Projected in circles, on three large screens, were images of hyrdoelectric generators, of mining projects, of Quebec seen by "Google Maps", maps, etc.
Extreme means as at election time.
On the press, moreover, the Prime Minister has refused to rule out that he would call for the elections this autumn, although he noted that it was a very busy period.
The "North Plan" is the fourth part of a "vision" that Prime Minister claims to have for Quebec, that of a "new" economic area, which includes an agreement on the workforce with France, an agreement between Canada and Europe and agreements with Ontario.
Often mentioned in conversations with the Prime Minister recently, the opening of the north - the 49th parallel northern territory - had never been the subject of a presentation.
The Prime Minister, however, restricted himself to only explain that the North was "a jewel with huge potential", but gaven no date, investment figures, or priorities in the future projects.
At the most he hinted at possible avenues of progress, including hydro-electricity, the forest, but above all the mining sector, boosted by growth in emerging countries and the reconstruction of public infrastructure.
The North contains "nickel, zinc, copper, platinum, gold, silver, iron, titanium, and even diamonds", according Mr Charest's list.
This 'territory twice as big as France', ' is here, is in Quebec.'
Not only is it here, but it is in us" he insisted, to make it clear that he solicited a national myth.
Quebec has greatly built its relations with the North, he said: The gold rush in Abitibi, engineering of Quebec, the James Bay.
"It is up to us, it is our future," he added, having made a dramatic break to look at the immense map behind him.
The North, 70% of the territory of Quebec, includes a portion of Labrador that the Quebec has always claimed, said the prime minister at the press conference.
"It is a traditional position that all governments have reiterated.
There is a line on the border on which there has been no agreement for a very long time and, when the opportunity arises, I reiterate our position on behalf of the government," he said.
The rest, "with climate change, we need to rethink our vision of the North," he said, referring to the passage of the north-west, which will be open through the year because of the melting of the ice.
In this new geopolitical context, the prime minister believes that to occupy the territory is a duty.
And will the inhabitants of the territory be the First United and the Inuits?
The Prime Minister said that the Government of Quebec would be very sensitive to their concerns and that the project would benefit them, particularly young people.
Two former ministers from two different parties, Pierre Corbeil and Michel Létourneau (former Member of the Party of Quebec of Ungava), have already begun consultations with thirty communities.
A Committee chaired by Benedict Pelletier and Julie millstone (Transport and natural resources) has an important place getting the work started.
The Prime Minister does not preclude a large meeting, "not necessarily a summit", but a time when "there will be a common vision".
The development of the North would be in line with the principles of sustainable development.
Plan North will be "concerted, ordered and environmentally friendly, he promised.
Jean Charest has described this "vision" as being in keeping with the Liberal prime minister that preceded him.
"As liberals who preceded us, we thought of different ways to transform the challenges into new opportunities for growth and development."
This has been one of the recurring themes of the end of the week, which started on Friday with a big cocktail party to celebrate the 50th anniversary of the arrival of Jean Lesage at the head of the party.
One of the resolutions adopted, proposes to rename the Central Beauharnois into Barrage Adélard-Godbout.
"Frm Godbout, who created Hydro-Quebec at Lesage, to Lesage who started the quiet Revolution and the nationalisation of hydro-electricity, to Bourassa who made the James Bay, our party was able to forge its future," said Jean Charest.
In the press conference, he cited another reference, conservative this time: the program 'Roads to the North' by John Diefenbaker, Prime Minister between 1957 and 1963.
In addressing the draft of the hydro-electric dam Eastmain1a-Ruper, Mr Charest pointed out that its operation was scheduled for 2012.
"This remains between us, but I forsee it happening," he confided to his militants, eliciting a huge round of applause from them.
Indeed, the Prime Minister, who said in April that there would be no election in 2008 and probably not in 2009, has not ruled out the possibility of a ballot this autumn, which the law allows him.
He stresses that his schedule has been fulfilled, including a mission of the board of the federation in China and a Quebec-New York summit.
The General Council of the end of the week has provided the Liberal leader a platform with nationalists resolutions, including 'constitutional' aspirations which have appeared as a letter to the post: The PLQ calls in particular the recognition to the "specificity of Quebec" in the Constitution.
He also hopes that Quebec calls the members of the Council of radio and Canadian telecommunications and that they have a right of veto on the decisions taken in Quebec.
On the side of the opposition, the broad outlines of Plan North have been welcomed with scepticism.
The head of the Quebec Party, Pauline Marois, has brought up the issue of the development of the North-of-Quebec that the Landry government launched in 2001.
According to her, the liberal government, in coming to power in 2003, has refused to implement it.
If it had done that, "we would be more advanced today" commented Mrs Marois alongside her candidate Jean-Achilles (elections held today), Françoise mercury.
The ADQ has urged the support of the adoption of the North Plan by the government.
"But what we want is that it should not be just a spectacle," commented the leader Sebastián Proulx, replacing Mario Dumont, who returns from a holiday today.
Letters - A country dishonoured
It was Mr Vic Toews, former Minister of Justice (ironically) in the Harper cabinet, who allowed himself last summer to say of Louise Arbour that she was a "disgrace" for Canada.
And casting aspersions on this woman who has been in a constant struggle for justice and deserves our admiration, says as much about the entourage of the Prime Minister as of Stephen Harper on himself.
We have here a government that is the only one, of all the Western countries involved, not to have brought back its nationals trapped in the concentration camp at Guantánamo.
A government which takes no account of the fact that Omar Khadr was a young teenager at the time of the charges being levelled against.
The only government that, despite the fact that Canada signed the Geneva Convention, goes back on its word and leaves a child soldier in inhuman conditions.
The only one who relies on a travesty of justice to assess the guilt of the accused.
Recall, for the record, that UNICEF,  International Amnesty and the Canadian Association of the Bar ask for the return of Omar Khadr so that he can benefit from a fair trial in Canada.
It is the same government that condones torture: it considers it hardly important that a young adult is now psychologically destroyed, probably forever after so many years of violence.
We may not realize it yet, but at the moment we are witnessing an insidious erosion of our rights, freedom and 'democracy', that very word that Harper continues to brandish and which rings so hollow in his mouth.
Now is the time when morals no longer exists: one can now abuse, torture, arbitrarily detaining a Canadian citizen at the whim of a head of government who was a minority so far (what will happen after 14 October...).
Many voters believe that they will find salvation in a party which extols Virtue, Law and Order: they do not see that this government has given up on what was the reputation and the dignity of our country.
The shame, Mr Toews, is in this renouncing, and not elsewhere.
Free speech - the Orwellian discourse of Barrick Gold
In its edition of the 17 September, The Devoir published a letter from Mr Patrick J. Garver, vice-chairman of the Canadian mining firm Barrick Gold.
Pursuing an Orwellian logic, he says that the biggest gold mining company of the world has brought a defamation suit of six million against three authors and a small penniless publishing house in order to launch a "transparent public debate".
If it is true that the judges are independent and impartial, this is not the truth they will deem, especially in the case of prosecution in libel, but the law.
Not surprisingly, this fundamental difference is completely obscured by Mr Garver.
Because, for Barrick Gold, the best way to conduct a public debate would be to ruin anyone who dares to support a position contrary to his?
Regardless of the outcome of the trial, the authors and the editor of the book Black Canada will have to spend considerable sums to prepare their defence and weapons to fight, with very unequal arms, against an army of lawyers supported by the almost botomless pockets of the mining company.
The tactics, in these unequal fights, is often to ruin the defendants so as to impose an amicable solution which gags the opposition in addition to scaring anyone who dares to look again at the issue.
If Barrick Gold really wanted a public debate, it is to the public that she should have presented her vision of the facts.
Contrary to what is being done in several countries where Barrick Gold works, the debates in Canada are normally by the exchange of ideas and not with clubs.
It was sufficient for the mining company to open its books, its files and establish a real debate, through the newspapers, media publications and funding of independent research teams that could shed light on the issue.
But Barrick Gold seems not to trust the public opinion and rejected the petitions and letters of support for the authors of Black Canada.
Perhaps Mr Garverwill please explain how he can ask for a "public" debate when he disregards the views of the public?
In the world of the Vice-President, it seems that this word is only meant to designate highly paid lawyers and not all Canadians; this is a rather narrow view of the concept.
In a democracy, even critics have the right to speak.
What Barrick Gold does not understand - or does not want to understand - is that the public which supports the authors and publishers of Black Canada is primarily doing it because it rejects the brutal manner of the mining company.
The public is prepared to hear Barrick and to judge, but on the basis of civilised trade arguments, and not in the context of what many see as a prosecution-gag (pursuing the "public debate," Barrick Gold has also submit a formal notice to the place of the authors of Black Canada and told them to stop using the term...).
Beyond the surreal speech by Mr Garver, the prosecution of Barrick Gold is a direct attack on freedom of university research and the quest for truth, which are essential for a democratic society.
It altogether denies the right to the quotation of credible sources and the debate on facts and interpretations, which represent the basis of intellectual work.
If it is impossible to study and to discuss issues that displeases the rich companies of the world in a country such as Canada, on threat of repeated charges, where can one do so?
If Barrick Gold really wanted a transparent and public debate it could do so in accordance with the scientific standards used by the authors of Black Canada.
It has a right of reply.
The academic world, to which we belong, has long been known to manage debates and disagreements and resolve conflicts.
The disproportionate prosecution of Barrick Gold clearly shows that, contrary to what it claims, it has no desire for a transparent debate.
This is a loss for the academic world, as for the public debate in Canada, and it is time that governments put arrangements restricting this kind of abusive prosecution in place .
Rescue operation of Wall Street - Democrats and Republicans agree
The Bush administration and the leaders of Congress, both Republicans and Democrats, have finally reached an agreement yesterday on the greatest economic recovery plan since the Great Depression of the 1930s.
The new version of the $700 billion plan to curb the financial crisis affecting Wall Street for months was yet to be approved by both chambers of Congress.
It provides for: better control of its implementation by the elected representatives, new mechanisms to ensure the reimbursement of public money, new provisions to contain the number of houses seized for default in payment, and a right to scrutinise the salaries paid to executives of rescued companies.
Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, the chairman of the House of Representatives, Nancy Pelosi, and the Republican representative of the negotiating table, Senator Judd Gregg, have announced the good news a few minutes after midnight, yesterday, after marathon negotiations spanning two days.
"We have made great progress towards an agreement that will be effective in the markets," said the representative of the Bush administration, Henry Paulson.
"Everything has been done to shelter the real economy and the ordinary Americans suffering from the ongoing crisis on Wall Street," said the democrat.
"This is the fundamental point: if we do not do this, the trauma, chaos and the disruption on the daily lives of Americans will be immense," said the Republican Judd Gregg.
The talks had turned into a sprint in the last few hours for fear of the effects that another failure would have on investors' sentiments.
The time limit that we had given ourselves was the opening of markets this morning.
Also associated with the negotiations, the two candidates in the US presidential election were in favour of the understanding; however, they did not fail to express their dissatisfaction with things having had to get this far in the first place.
Democratic Senator Barack Obama awarded himself certain addition powers at the understanding, including the proposal to allow homeowners to keep their homes and the one connected with monitoring salaries of employees of companies rescued by the State.
"When you ask the taxpayers to take extraordinary measures as a result of the irresponsibility of some, it is not enough to congratulate yourself.
But these measures are necessary," he commented on American television.
Asked on another channel whether he would vote for the proposed plan, his Republican opponent, John McCain, said: "I would like to see the details, but I hope so."
"The guidelines that I have read [are] that this is something that we will all have to digest and with which we can move forward.
The option of doing nothing is simply not acceptable," he said.
The $700 billion plan to buy up with taxpayers' money the bad debts, puts to active risks the unsaleables of the US financial institutions.
It comes after 14 months of a crisis triggered by the bursting of the housing bubble, which has led to the collapse of sub-prime mortgages before spreading to other more widespread forms of credit securities (PCAA) and lead to a freezing of liquidity and to an exodus of banks and financial institutions.
It was a group of elected Republicans that wrecked the first draft agreement last week.
We believed ourselves out of this impasse since Democrats accepted that some "toxic" assets of companies in difficulty were only to be insured by the government, rather than bought.
To cut corners for everyone in Congress, a provision has also been added that if the government were to take losses for five years with this program, it could put in place new taxes to help recover its losses.
The new plan provides for the payment of a first installment of 250 billion to which will be added another 100 billion if the President thinks it necessary.
The payment of another 350 billion will have to be ratified by another vote in Congress.
In exchange for help, Washington will have shares in rescued companies which will be worth dividends in case of profit and that it will be able sell when the storm is passed.
The federal government will have the opportunity to delay the procedures of foreclosures on housing tied to mortgages affected by this plan, and to set limits on the starting pay and allowances paid to executives of affected companies.
The architects of the plan would like to see it put to the vote in the House of Representatives today, and in the Senate on Wednesday.
Despite all their efforts, it is still not sure that their plan will get the green light.
Voices have continued to rise yesterday against this project, both on the Republican side and the Democratic.
"Obviously, Washington is not listening to you," said the Republican Scott Garrett, a member of the Finance Committee of the House, to his constituents.
"Yes, we have a serious financial problem
Yes, there are solutions.
But not thoe that take advantage of the taxpayers'.
Promoter of a small group in Congress known as "the caucus of sceptics," the Democratic representative Brad Sherman presents things differently, but comes to the same conclusion.
'Four hundred prominent professors of economy, including three Nobel Prize winners, have written to tell us: we request Congress not to hurry but carefully examine the route to be taken," he said yesterday.
At the same time, in Europe, we had further proof of the global nature of the crisis.
After an emergency meeting, the three Benelux countries have announced the partial nationalisation of the banking group Fortis for 11.2 billion euros (16,3 billion USD).
The intervention of the governments of Belgium, the Netherlands and Luxembourg had been made necessary after the French bank BNP Paribas said that it had renounced acquisition of its competitor in trouble since it has lost 2 billion euros (2.9 billion US) in the mortgage crisis in the United States.
Fortis employs 85 000 people and is one of the 20 largest European banks and the 10 largest insurers.
"This is not wasted money, said yesterday, the Dutch Finance Minister Wouter Bos.
In exchange, we are recovering influence and a right to vote in the bank.
That is something that savers and householders will appreciate in these uncertain times. "
Meanwhile, on the other side of the Channel, the British government seems to have nationalized another bank rocked by the financial crisis.
In the English press, the government would take on board the whole loans of the bank Bradford and Bringley, with more than 41 billion euros (75,5 billion USD) of mortgages.
The Spanish bank Santander said yesterday that it would buy the branches and the customer accounts of the British bank.
Bradford and Bringley will be the second bank, after the Northern Rock, that the British Government is nationalizing since the beginning of the financial crisis.
Paul Newman (1925-2008) - Death of an icon
The beauty in his blue eyes was long considered his trump card, while some called it his weakness.
Has he been released from the narcissistic mirror, the American actor with the charming smile?
Yes and no.
His modesty, sensitivity and talent which flowed from sources unknown shouldhave equally distanced him from the power which gives birth to real sacred monsters.
But what a great long distance athlete.
Paul Newman, who died on Friday, aged 83, of lung cancer in his ranch in Connecticut, remains one of the last icons of the golden years of American cinema.
Less monumental than Brando, whom he resembled and who was for long a kind of rival on screen, more cautious in his game, certainly more fragile, but equally an apostle of freedom and the iconoclast of dramatic conventions.
Mixed blood often makes beautiful children.
He was born in Ohio in 1925, to a German Jew father and mother of Hungarian origin.
Of these European roots will grow one of the glorious faces of the American dream.
With little ego, the ultimate show of quality.
Because in him is projected a whole country enamored of the self-made man, the soldier of the Pacific War, wounded in battle, who in the early 1950s studied dramatic art at Yale then frequented the Actors' Studio in New York, before triumphing at the theatre, cinema, and television soon afterwards.
The same man who fought for civil rights was also the racer who finished second at the Mans 24 hours in 1979, doubled of a sex symbol, albeit part of a model couple formed in 1958 with the actress Joanne Woodward.
Also die with him the grey areas of this secret star, who was at once quiet, committed, allergic to the flashes of show business, the enigma which we will never quite fathom.
An honest man, in the widest sense of the term.
The disappearance of Paul Newman has been staggering for cinema goers this week end, while his major roles flash on the black screen of memories.
More than half a century of a seventh American art in flux flowed through him.
Memories of the charming cowboy from Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid (1969), the young man rejecting his sensual wife (Elizabeth Taylor) in The Cat on a Burning Roof adapted from Tennessee Williams in 1958 return to rock us.
Closer to our times (1990), to his sensitive depiction of Mr Bridge, troubled in his old age by a marriage that did not fulfil all its promises.
So many other Paul Newmans have gone down in history.
The boxeur Rocky Graziano, delinquant, tormented, violent, unforgettable in Somebody Up there Likes Me (marked by hatred), or Robert Wise, a role intended for James Dean, resumed after his death, which really launched Newman in 1956.
The genial thug in the brilliant The Sting, winner of an Oscar for best film in 1973.
A bitter and retaliatory billiards player in the magnificent The Hustler of Robert Rossen (1961), he played the character again in The Color of Money of Martin Scorsese, which won him in 1987 his only Oscar out of nine nominations.
This face through the ages, it was him.
Still him.
The times jostle through his path.
Young people know him mainly through the cult film Slap Shot by George Roy Hill (1977), and in Reggie Dunlop, as the coach of an unorthodox Hockey team.
His fans saw him again in 1994 in The Hudsucker Proxy of the Coen brothers.
With a final role as godfather of the Irish Mafia in Sam Mendes' Road to Perdition in 2003, the circle was completed.
Unlike several film legends, which left the job early enough, Newman remained a long time in the saddle, while denouncing Hollywood, its gold, its glamour, and its concessions.
The French film-maker Bertrand Tavernier considered him, not without humour, "as a living challenge to the" underplaying "judging by his supported benefits."
The profession has not always been kind to the handsome Paul Newman to whom roles fell badly for a long time.
But he less often acted as young people than as marginals: neurotics, alcoholics, swines or desperate men, including its perfect features which reflect the excessesive and the revolting.
As director, Newman revealed little known aspects of his real and modest sensitivity .
His Rachel, Rachel, in 1968 (based on the novel by the Canadian Margaret Laurence), with his wife Joanne Woodward in the leading role, depicts a female portrait of melancholy.
He dedicated his film Harry and Son – a work of modesty and sadness - to his son whom he lost to drug overdose.
Among the rain of tributes which fell yesterday on Newman, a great friend and former colleague Robert Redford (they had acted together in The Sting and Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid) said, very saddened: "His presence has made my life and this country better."
Generosity, love of life were vibrants features of the actor.
Beyond his career as a legend, he was also a major campaigner for civil rights, ecology, independent cinema, and against the excesses of Hollywood.
We have seen his face on vinaigrette pots, sauces, biscuits and other foods, which tasted rather awful, albeit a joke at the outset.
The profits of these sales were nonetheless paid to his Foundation for children with difficult childhoods.
Newman, rather than sitting on his myth, was committed to the end.
He left his five girls a letter containing these words: "Always and until the end, your father was incredibly grateful for his fate.
It was a privilege to be here. "
And a privilege for us to have followed the path of an American artist so lucid and generous.
Model citizen, and more.
What could  Zuschlag have been making &amp; united in their factory invoices?
Soon, on 8 October, will start the hearings relating to the ongoing criminal proceedings against János Zuschlag and his accomplices.
The politician and his accomplices are accused of fraud, in the form of criminal organisation, permanently and regular, having led particularly important losses. Other charges have been used against them, for example, fraud and use of fraud.
According to the public prosecutor, money from subsidies, was spent for personal use, while the benefits were justified by false invoices.
State money and municipalities, approximately 65 million HUF in total, went in part into the coffers of the Fiatal Baloldal movement and on the other, into the pockets of some people.
Their method, made public by the authorities in charge of the investigation, was to receive the money of subsidies obtained by issuing fresh bills, behind which no real provision was given, and thus the associations never had respect for their commitments.
According to the indictment, a large part of the bills were false.
For these they obtained invoice books from the market at Józsefváros, while the manufactured stamps at Kiskunhalas.
As regards the names of companies that would be on the bills, it was decided, during the touring of the province north of Lake Balaton, and was carried out by István Lados, at the request of János Zuschlag.
According to the testimony of the latter, it was to identify pensions and restaurants.
For his personal consumption, he called for a bill, on the model of which was made other bills that they would introduce, among other things, to the Ministry of Youth and Sport, the Ministry of Social Affairs and Labour, and the Municipality of the Capital, to access subsidies.
The majority of invoices was created by István Lados and his accomplice András O˝ri, who, according to our information, was involved in drafting the files needed to obtain subsidies.
During a 'scouting operation', one of Lados' choices was a bistro.
According to the two bills from the Zuschlag in 2003, this place has assured the restoration of a group of 90 people, members of the association Biztos Pont Egyesület.
However, according to what the manager said, it would have been impossible for so many people to occupy this place, at the same time.
Similarly, in the summer of 2002, the bill on behalf of the foundation Jobb Jövo˝ért, which later bore the name of Együtt a Harmadik Évezredért, swarmed with mistakes of form and substance.
A pension, based in Badacsonytomaj, did in fact have only three houses, and maximum of 10 people could spend the night there, but the bill was for one hundred and thirty customers.
Issuers of the outrageous bills have also fallen in excess, when they mentioned the company Pigal Kft, belonging to the hotel and catering sector. In their accounts, neither the name of Jobb Jövo˝ért, nor that of the Hoppá appear, according to the information given to the public prosecutor's office.
Gyo˝zo˝ Farkas the manager of the society, said to the site hvg.hu that when the public prosecutor had him convened and had shown him the bills, he had been able to immediately identify them as false documents.
"The name of our society and our tax number were placed on the wrong place on our stamp."
He added: "Beyond the form, the fact that according to the bill, a hundred people were lodged there, did not ring very true either, since the establishment only has eleven chambers, which do not have that much place.
Moreover, the bill also mentions meals, and our restaurant has been closed for a long time. "
Issuers of the fake bills did not inform themselves on travel agents of Budapest either, which was part of their choice, but only organising trips abroad. Thus, naively, they have indicated stays in Hungary on bills to be settled in cash, which also goes against the accounting practices of the agency.
Also, as it emerged during the investigation, they also added VAT on these documents, while the benefits on the activities of travel, which is outside the European Union, are paid for without VAT.
Similarly, the VAT rate of four bills established on behalf of the Hotel Révfülöp by order of Jobb Jövo˝ért were incorrect, since the benefits of the society do not pay a VAT of 25% as mentioned, but a VAT of 15%. In addition, the employees of the hotel only print bills, while the false ones were drafted by hand.
The investigation reveals that the 'issuers' have also made mistakes by mentioning the transport of goods by road as delivery, a right that the company which actually makes thr bills could not exercise, given that its profile was the council in investment.
Moreover, it is also because of errors in format, like wrong fonts on the bills and false stamps, that the bills issued by order of Együtt a Harmadik Évezredért Alapítvány, of 21 Századi Kulturális Egyesület and Biztos Bridge have been proved to be false.
As in the case of the society Ravenna Bt. or the sport training facility of Kunfehértó, which both deny being the authors of invoices in their names.
The forgers did not pay attention to the fact that the company HIB Kft., based in Nyíregyháza, was in liquidation when (2001) the group of Fiatal Városért Egyesület was supposed to take a meal at home. According to our information, it is for this reason that the liquidator of the company denies having made this bill.
Bills made deliberately
A group of other issuers of bills is composed of those who were well aware that they were asked to forge bills.
The foundation Esély Budapestért Alapítvány, at the request of the grouping of Fiatal Baloldal - Ifjú Szocialisták, made a bill on the order of the foundation Együtt a Harmadik Évezredért, for a total of four million HUF.
According to the indictment, the manager of the society Collab Kft. was forced to make false invoices by one of the defendants, Ludovic Györfi.
Similarly, the society Biogate Kft., which is now in liquidation and in 2003, made bills on order by the Foundation Jobb Jövo˝ért Alapítvány, the association Atlasz Egyesület and the association Vörösfenyo˝ Egyesület, for a total of about five million HUF, but behind which no provision has actually been provided, has cooperated with the Zuschlags,
No financial movement has taken place, either, since the invoices were cancelled later, but which the people have avoided mentioning in their accounts.
The following category of issuers of bills is that of companies  directly related to the accused.
The administrative officer of the Director-General of the society Delta Trió Kft., who is in charge of trade of fuel and cars, and whose headquarters were in Budapest, was nowhere to be found; instead Iván Kubatov was found.
In October, November and December 2005, the company issued several bills on the sale of computer equipment, for a total of about 18 million HUF.
According to the survey, the equipment would have been bought by the company Cash Investment Kft. of Kiskunhalas, which was in liquidation since 14 September 2005.
The director of the company was a man from Romania, who Iván Kubatov would also have sent documents in connection with the society, between 2002 and 2005.
As we know, Kubatov acknowledged during the investigation that he issued bills upon the order of companies such as Atlasz, Hoppá and Együtt a Harmadik Évezredért Alapítvány, and that he pocketed their counter-value.
It is precisely at the request of Iván Kubatov that the Romanian builders have created the companies Fa-Bani Jos Faipari Kft. and Jos-Investment Bt.
In fact, none of these companies worked, what the accused explained by the fact that they did not receive work.
He nevertheless used these companies, because at the request of Maître Zsolt Szente, co-accused and mastermind of the acts of founding the companies, he faked bills in their names, upon order of associations connected with Zuschlag, like the company Atlasz and Y-Generáció.
Kubatov gave people, 15 bills in total, issued by companies such as Cash Investment, Delta Trió, Fa-Bani Jos, Jos Investment and Linaxtrade, for a value of 14,2 million HUF.
The public prosecutor believed that 10% of the sum listed on the bills along with the VAT went into the pockets of Kubatov.
The man even used the company Szi-Beri Bt. to create fictitious bills that have been used in the context of the application for grants by Biztos Bridge.
In January 2006, the Association Y-Generáció and Szövetség a Modern Magyarországért have applied for a grant from the public utility of the Socialist Party, Táncsics Mihály Alapítvány (TMA).
They obtained a grant worth twice 500 000 HUF, but these have not been used for the objectives indicated in the demand.
To ensure that no one would know, five fictitious bills received from the society Works Team Kft. were presented to the TMA.
Moreover, it is these bills that were found in the raid on the office of Árpád Kemecsei, at the Ministry of Education.
During the hearing, one of the accused will relate the methods for manufacturing invoices, as he has already done before the public prosecutor earlier.
What could be really interesting is that the accused, János Zuschlag himself, decides to lift the veil from the whole story.
Until now, his admissions are not very detailed, and although he promised on several occasions to tell everything to the last detail, he has not yet done so.
The question is whether it is in his interest, or, possibly, the Socialists will reach an agreement according to which Zusi would plead guilty alone in exchange for the return of a large part of the 50 million HUF.
Today, the party is probably vexed, since its requests for him to be placed under house arrest, on the basis of a reduction of his detention conditions, continually fall on deaf ears.
While those who have caused much greater damage, and are the authors of irreparable economic crimes roam freely or at least go back to their own homes at the end of the procedure, he does not have that possibility.
The psychology of one-upmanship: Why are we spending more money?
At auctions, buyers tend to spend more, and to overestimate the commodity.
Researchers in neurology and economy of the University of New York have managed to update the neurological and economic basis of this known  and apparently irrational behaviour pattern.
According to the study published in the journal Science, humans do not want to be beaten at this type of competition, such as an auction on eBay, and that is why they are even willing to pay too high a price.
These research has tried to draw up a neural pattern of this kind of 'game' with the aid of an experimental auction.
A group of volunteers was playing lottery, while another group took part in a playful auction, while with the help of a process of functional magnetic resonance (FMRI), the researchers studied the active brain areas of the trial subjects.
In the two games, participants could earn money, but during the auction of which an essential element is outbidding others by a third, all the activity was in the brainstem, called the striatum, and reacted in an intense way at the loss of the game.
This part of the brain, along with several other functions, plays a role in the mechanism of "self-promotion" of the nervous system.
That is why, according to the researchers, the rise in prices is what triggers the brain to violent reactions in the striatum.
To support their theories, the economists in the group of researchers followed this with an analysis of financial surveys.
In their experiment, three groups bid against a partner, in different circumstances.
They simply informed the first group of the real value of the product in question, and they then made their bids.
To another group, they promised that if they were to win the game, then they would receive an additional $15 as a reward.
While the third group received these $15 before the auction, but the members of the group also lost money if they lost the auction.
The difference between these two groups was in fact that the emphasis was laid in one on victory, while in the other, on failure.
In demonstrating the assumption of neurologists, the members of the team 'against failure" were prepared to bid higher than those made by the first group and the group "for victory".
"These results cannot be demonstrated by any existing economic theory.
Indeed, each of them explained the phenomena found at auctions by the pleasure of winning and the show in front of the risk.
Only the neural imaging methods have helped to remove the contradiction between the two theories in leading now to a new third explanation." - said Andrew Schotter, Professor of the Faculty of economics at the University of New York.
Hepatitis: When do we need to consult a doctor?
In the world, around half a billion people suffer from chronic hepatitis B or C, while in Hungary, the chronic disease of the liver is mentioned among the main causes of death.
An estimated 100 thousand patients are infected with hepatitis in Hungary, but only seven thousand are taking treatment. This draws from the fact that often patients do not know that they are infected.
The name hepatitis is a generic name given to infections in the liver and caused by various types of virus.
There is a lot of similarities between their symptoms. The inflammation of the liver and jaundice are characteristic, but pathogens and diseases caused differ.
The hepatitis virus, according to the pathogenous genes, spreads mainly in two forms: the hepatitis A and E through the digestive tract (for example: contaminated food or water), the hepatitis B, C, D and other viruses by blood and organic liquids (sperm, vaginal secretion, salive).
For travellers, it is advisable to be vaccinated against the virus A and B. There is no vaccine against C.
The symptoms of hepatitis A appear two to three weeks after the consumption of contaminated food, in general, accompanied by general bad health, weakness, upset stomach and nausea.
Then a visible jaundice develops on the skin and the whites of the eyeballs, the cells becoming more transparent and urine takes a darker color. Cure can take two to three weeks.
Across the world, every year, a million people die of the most serious form of the disease, such as cancer or cirrhosis of liver caused by hepatitis B.
The main cause is that according to estimates, only one in ten patients receives medical treatment.
Hepatitis C may also have serious consequences: if it is not dealt with, it can lead to cirrhosis of the liver or cancer.
Most patients do not know of the virus, because the pathogenic gene destroys liver cells on the sly. In many cases, the first symptoms do not appear until after 20 to 30 years.
Therefore, an early prevention is very important, as well as regular screening tests.
The contamination is much higher on an average among the population of three groups: those who have suffered a blood transfusion before 1991, consumers of drugs and tattooed people.
Currently, we estimate that there are 200 million patients with chronic hepatitis C-type in the world.
Since the disease can be detected by a routine examination in the laboratory, it is advisable to consult your doctor as soon as you observe unknown symptoms.
The disease can be cured, if it is detected in time. The virus can be eradicated from the body; this way the risk of infection disappears and the development of cancer is stopped.
30 September is the World Day of hepatitis, organised for the first time in 2004 by the organisations representing patients around the world.
Its aim is to draw attention to the chronic cirrhosis of the liver, caused by the virus, on the causes of its development and on the importance of early diagnosis of the disease.
Do people who believe in God feel less pain?
According to the results of a recent research, religious belief works as a kind of painkiller, which would have helped to make death more bearable for Catholic martyrs.
The British newspaper Telegraph published an article that researchers at the University of Oxford have conducted an interesting experiment in analysing to what extent the belief in God could influence tolerance to pain by human beings.
In the context of this experiment 12 Catholic believers and as many atheists were subjected to shock, while each of them was presented with a painting of the Virgin Mary.
According to the results, the Catholic believers were able to exclude a large part of the suffering.
Thanks to a technique of palpation of the human brain, it could also find that the Catholics were able to activate the part of the brain responsible for the regulation of pain.
This analysis is the first of a series of experiments, in which academics, scientists, philosophers and theologians are taking part from various sectors of the university.
More specifically, the experience is as follows: an instrument issuing sparks and broadcasting the shock is set on the left hand of the subject.
Researchers asked the participants in the experiment to look at two paintings, one being that of the Virgin Mary painted by Sassoferrato in the 17th century, and the other, the Lady with the Ermine painted by Leonardo da Vinci in the 15th century.
Researchers hoped that the sight of the Virgin Mary would create a kind of state of faith among the believers, while the painting of Da Vinci, not very different from the first, would have a calming effect.
The subjects spent half an hour in an MRI scanner, during which they received 20 shocks in four part installments, while watching either the religious painting, or the more general one.
Catholics said that while viewing the painting of the Virgin Mary, they felt "safe", as though in the protection of someone who "takes care" and they felt themselves "quietened, and peace invaded them".
While viewing the religious painting, they felt 12% less pain than when they viewed the work of Leonard.
The psychologist Miguel Farias, who himself took part in the experiment, believes that we can achieve the same effects with any other strong image; for atheists one would have to find the appropriate photo.
"We need only find a picture to which they react very positively, such as a mother or father," said the psychologist.
Tom Wright, Anglican bishop, welcomed the results of this research.
"The practice of faith should change and in many cases, actually change our personality," said Wright.
After the excellent results, there is the question of what would be the impact on the regulation of pain in the subjects if the believers were shown a Madona painted by Leonard or by a painter of equal calibre?
Would viewing a better quality painting of the Virgin Mary induce better results?
You are what you divulge about yourself.
On the occasion of its tenth anniversary, Google says that we can find it in bottom of the pockets of people and in the sky above their heads. It knows where they spent their holiday, which specialists they consult and what are their interests.
But it is still not enough, according to Eric Schmidt, who is one of the influential people in society.
While sceptics draw a parallel with Orwell's vision of horror, they do not see the essence of the Web 2.0.
Eric Schmidt said, recently, to the Financial Times that the main ambition of Google was to gather more information about its users. This is necessary for the founders of Google to respect their original purpose which reads as follows: "Set out in a system all the information in the world!".
According to the head of Google, after ten years of work of global confusion, they are still at the beginning of their aim to deal with all the information.
To the question: what will we have in five years? Schmidt said he would like Google to be able to respond to questions such as, "What can I do tomorrow?" Or "What is the work that would suit me best?". However, software cannot only respond to these kinds of questions, simple at first sight, the day when it know enough about users.
It is not entirely clear to all Internet users that the words used in searches on the Internet, the IP address of the computer which calls the search and the pages consulted are all listed.
Through the Personalized Search program launched two years ago, users can, for example, store their own search history and can see what they have sought, what they have clicked on. Thanks to this, in the long term, recommendations, based on the same logic, will be able to give much more personalized answers, and will submit products and services on the basis of previous statements and registered preferences.
What happens if someone uses my data against me, if he looks at my work? ask users, who worry after seeing the information monopoly excercised Google.
In most cases, this is the potential power represented by the company that can generate fear, – not to be mistaken for compunction; fear of punishment, the desire for freedom or the possibly of revolt against the power that can generate a counter-reaction in Internet users.
It is, however, a fact that search terms are not only made, but in justified cases, they are sent to a third party, and in this type of case, by law, nothing protects the personal rights of Internet users.
The most resounding example of recent times is probably the coordinated action against paedophiles in Brazil, during which Google sent to the Brazilian Government the information that it had collected from the social network called Orkut, thus allowing an identification.
Internet users mindful of human rights have been able to breathe a sigh of relief in May, when Google, jointly with the organization of electronic legal protection EFF, has proved its right to court to the FBI. According to the ruling, in the future, Google will still not be bound by any of the points of the constitution to disclose information of any kind on the request of the FBI.
(At the same time, the federal government has successfully obtained some 50,000 web addresses and 1,000 search terms that it had gained in relation to the strengthening of the law on the protection of children, voted several years ago, but in the end, it fails to get the lists of private users searches, or the whole list of Internet sites and the key words from the last two months.)
The judgment of Google is therefore somewhat contradictory: it is severely criticised by those who fear the transmission of their personal data, because they believe that their inner world and their private lives suffer when they begin to use Google services. Therefore, they address them in the spirit of revolt against multinational companies who are proud maintaining their public images.
Meanwhile, geek culture and its American "savages" reunite the passionate, the activists and enthusiastic users of the computer from many countries and see in Google the next generation of big business, "trendy" corporation, as opposed to its rival, Microsoft, classified as invader of the world because of Windows, even though the two are fighting for the same cause.
This can be explained by the fact that Google, unlike Microsoft, does not ask its users for identification code, or asking for money for its applications. The documentary code and the package of program, continually updated, has a much more accessible, younger and cooler feel to it, in comparison with the practices of the official software giant.
The reason may be that geeks see exactly the problematic relationship between the rights of the individual and the Internet, and what the Web 2.0, the keyword of recent years, really entails.
Indeed, the Web 2.0 is nothing else but collaboration, derving from the fact that we intentionally leave traces behind us, and that we use communication channels available to us, and while their size changes one by one, the essential remains the same: we expose ourselves.
Youth, in general, often have profiles on several social networks, from Facebook to Xanga, and they can connect them to other sites, such as to Twinter, or last.fm, reading his musical habits, and then he can connect them to a further system, as FriendFeed or Blip.fm. These young people can also maintain blogs, in which are automatically uploaded their most recent photo galleries that they store on Flickr or Picasa.
While we can take many examples, such as the lover who looks at photos in the morning, taken by a circle of common friends, with who his infidel lover has spent the evening, or that of the company that has dismissed one of its employees, for the sincere opinions that he voiced on his blog about the top management, we can be sure of one thing: the end of privacy is to be reconsider these days.
One who lives a life online, consists of what he shows about himself, and that is how we can define the principle behind the behaviour of young people today.
The one who wants to hide something, or at least, to try to circumvent the monopoly of Google, can do it (by using, for example, Scroogle, which uses Google's search engine, while intentionally leaving no trace).
The number of people who deliberately do not sign up on social networks so as not to be found is not insignificant. The services of Google online, including text search, image search, and reading of information, can be replaced by alternative versions, which are not linked to enormous servers which record our profile in not it's prettiest form.
The public is waiting for the time, without really hiding it, when Google will reveal its true nature.
The company, with its present value of 156 billion dollars, is worth more than IBM (140 billion dollars), Intel (124 billion dollars) or Coca-Cola (110 billion dollars). The AdWords / AdSense advertising areas threaten the turnover of advertising agencies, while the benefits introduced at an increasing speed cause severe headaches not only to Microsoft, but to many other creators of computer programs.
However, critical observers find, in addition to all this, contradictions that are cause for concern: for example, the top management of the society has refused, in its entirety, the protests of employees, after it doubled the price of the enterprise and after that the company has found it too expensive to feed its employees multiple times a day. It pales next to the fact that already in 2006, Google agreed to the Chinese government and according to the terms of the agreement, the company detects all the results that injure good taste, and the interests of the Chinese regime.
According to internal rules of the society, new services are not announced until they can be used. What is certain is that in the coming months and years, they are going to move the world on new points. While some believe that the draft scanning and filing of books and magazines by Google is reaching a dimension so large that the company will soon face the Supreme Court of the United States; others tremble before its Health system, because in it, we can build a comprehensive medical benefit from our results of previous studies, our doctors and our problems.
The fact that Google is a base for genetic data can give a good raw material for the next generation of science-fiction. The famous novel by Cory Doctorow, writes with half orwellien tones , describing the future in which a man could be approached only through data from Google.
Two minors have helped to remove traces of the double homicide of Ózd
"The police convened two minors to interrogate them in the case of the double homicide of Ózd. According to suspicions, they have helped to remove traces of the crime," said the spokesman for the Police Station of Borsod.
The youth have recognised the fact that they are accused. For the moment, they are accused of complicity.
The two minors, who, according to the information from MTI (Hungarian Telegraphic Agency) are girls, are defending themselves.
The complicity of murder can entail up to five years imprisonment.
The suspect in the double homicide of Ózd, a young man about 23-year-old, was remanded in custody, on Sunday.
Charges brought against him are multiple murder, assault with intent and interest.
During the investigation, it was revealed that the 23-year-old man owed a lot of money to a man of 53 years.
The suspect was not willing to settle his debt and it is for this reason that he drew his creditor, last Wednesday, to a site of Ózd where he killed him, and his daughter aged 9 years.
According to the information of MTI, the young man had premeditated the crime. The weapon with which he was going to commit the crime was hidden on the scene of the crime.
The police is examining the weapon and the circumstances of its use with the help of experts.
The stock exchange of Warsaw made a proposal to buy the stock exchange of Prague
The stock market value of Warsaw has proposed two hundred million, about five billion Czech kronor, for the purchase of 100% of the package of shares of the stock market values of Prague.
Ludwik Sobolewski, the chairman of the stock market values of Warsaw, confirmed this proposal that the Polish have made despite that, before, the Czechs have ruled out the stock exchange of Warsaw the circle of potential new owners of the stock market in Prague.
The cause of this exclusion is that the stock exchange of Warsaw is owned by the state.
99% of the shares are in the hands of the Polish state which wants to secede from more than 60% of its shares in a few months of activity.
According to the Czech business daily E15, the Polish proposal represents the highest offer that has been made to date for the purchase of the stock market in Prague.
According to the Czech press, the stock exchange of Vienna, the transatlantic exchange, the Nasdaq Stock Exchange of New York, the stock exchange in London and Deutsche Börse have all made offers to date.
Petr Koblic, the director of the stock market in Prague, said last week that among those involved, the stock exchange of Warsaw would be the least desirable new owner, and has not ruled out the fact that this could lead to the disappearance of the stock market in Prague in the future.
The value of the stock exchange of Prague is estimated between 5 to 10 billion Czech kronor by specialists in the market.
On the basis of an agreement between shareholders, some 90% of the papers would be sold.
The largest owner on the stock exchange of Prague is the investment bank Patria Finance, with about 25% of holdings, followed by the 14.7 percent of the bank Ceská Sporitelna and the Tiger Holding Four S. a.r.l. with 13.5 percent.
The financial crisis from the point of view of the European press
In their comments on Tuesday on the international financial crisis, which is worsening day by day, newspaper leaders of the European press already forsee a "second 11 September".
"We owe the overall financial disaster to the US president," the daily of Rome, La Repubblica accused. "The president was not even been able to block with his own party behind a bill, improvised in a hurry, aimed at helping a desperate situation..."
Instead of a new Pearl Harbour, as the billionaire Warren Buffett, it is more appropriate to speak of a second 11 September.
Part of the Madrid press is also sees Washington as the scapegoat.
According to the vision of the newspaper El Mundo, it is the failings of the political direction there that has led the global economy to the brink of collapse.
The danger of the collapse of the US financial system is increasing every day, and subsequently, the world will pay a high price.
The Bush plan was far from perfect, but according to the vote in Congress, a real danger is the possibility that Washington is not proposing a political tool to deal with the crisis.
The global economy is in a vacuum, just when the history of capitalism is witnessing one of its biggest changes.
We cannot ignore the threat longer - highlights the Tages-Anzeiger in Geneva.
Some states can still be a lifeline to their staggering financial institutions, and thanks to their own taxpayers' money, they can save them from bankruptcy.
Of course, if even more banks collapse like dominoes, then neither financial resources, nor new improvisations will be enough.
In the long term, we need Members of the European Union to forget their national egoism, and centralise control over divided financial markets.
Only Monday, financial weakened institutions have received more than 100 billion - recalled the Viennese newspaper, Der Standard, which fears that European taxpayers also will have to delve into their pockets, very deep, in a similar way to the US in order to resolve the crisis.
So far, the EU has not really dealt with the crisis, which, like a tsunami, crosses the old continent from end to end.
The 'rescuers' must not immediately brandish 100 billion euros, though this would be good if they knew in which case it would be reasonable to ask for taxpayers' money, with the aim of preventing the biggest damages.
The intelligent car imitates the flight of a bumblebee
What method would be best to develop technologies which are able to avoid an obstacle, than to look at systems in nature that do exactly the same thing?
For example, bees.
In the surprising draft presented at the CEATEC, taking place in Japan, bumblebees have given the strategic idea to engineers from Nissan, for the inspiration on how they could devise the next generation of detectors of obstacles.
In cooperation with the University of Tokyo, Nissan has built a mini car robot, a bio-inspired self-robotized system, type BR23C, which it has equipped with properties of bees, the ultimate goal being to encourage the development of a system able to avoid obstacles.
In its flights, each bee constitutes its own area with an oval shape, which in fact, is very similar to the hull -  explained Kazuhhiro Doi, the director of the department for research and development and technological public relations of the brand, during the exposition.
The eye of the bee plays an important role, since it is able to see in all directions, in an angle of 300 degrees.
To imitate the functions of the eye, engineers have put forth the idea of a laser rangefinder.
It identifies obstacles within an angle of 180 degrees and a distance of 2 feet in front of the BR23C. It assesses the distances and sends a signal to the microchip on board, which turns to avoid the object immediately.
The perception of the obstacle takes place in a split second, and then the mini self robot, imitating the movement of bees, immediate changes the direction of its wheels sufficiently to avoid a collision.
Unlike any existing system, the avoidance maneuver works in an entirely instinctive manner.
"If this were not so, the mini self robot would not respond quickly enough to avoid the obstacle," explains Toshiyuki Andoh, the director of the mobility laboratory and of the project with robotized car.
It must react instinctively and instantaneously, since this technology is the most vulnerable and most internal of the protection envelope, a layer of protection for times when collision is considered inevitable.
This whole process must reflect what the bee does to avoid other bees.
The process must happen in the blink of an eye.
Unlike bees, though, it cannot move upwards, downwards or diagonall; it can only move in two dimensions, and only in the direction in which the wheels can turn.
In this way, instead of infinite combinations that bees have to avoid other bees, in our case, we could only use swerving movements, acceleration and slowdown as maneuvers for the mini auto-robot
The BR23C uses lithium polymer batteries which are lighter and whose focus of energy is higher, which makes their life longer than models that use lithium-ion instead.
According Andoh it is the intelligent instinct which is essential, not the treatment of data, and even less the capacity to store.
This mechanism must only deal with a few signals per second, and respond to them.
It is not necessary to store and react with intuitive logic based on data from previous maneuvers. In this way, it uses only a few dozen kilobytes of memory.
We don't need a capacity of gigabytes, or even of megabytes.
This is the first step towards the concept of a technology for instant avoidance. According to estimates by Nissan, this system will make its entry in manufactured cars in steps over the next ten years.
Another application could be its incorporation into the GPS satellite navigation system, so that it can guide the driver to its destination by avoiding obstacles on the way.
They have even named this unaffordable baby
The written version of the economic recovery plan of $700 billion to buy the questionable credit of banks, and to reuse this several times, is ready.
In the first round, half of this amount will be spent.
Reuters announced that after debates that extended till past midnight on Saturday, local time on the east coast, the leaders of Congress agreed on the controversy that has been raging for days on end, connected with the rescue plan for a total of $700 billion.
"We have taken a major step forward," said Nancy Pelosi, the Democratic chairman of the US House of Representatives, according to whom all that remains is to put the agreements on paper.
The compromise, born from the plan, is supported by both candidates for the presidency, Barack Obama and John McCain.
Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, said in commenting on the results of the compromise that the programme will work and will be effective, however other measures must be implemented. According to Pelosi, there is no question here of the rescue of Wall Street, but put in motion the wheels of the economy in the other direction.
The written version of the plan was made public before the opening of the Asian markets, on Sunday evening at 20h, local time in Washington (i.e. Monday at 2 a.m., according to the local time in Central Europe), but has not caused spectacular rise in the stock exchanges.
Monday, the House of Representatives will be the first to vote on the bill responding on behalf of Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008, and then its fate will be in the hands of the Senate.
Saturday night, President George W. Bush spoke to Pelosi, then, the White House also welcomed the news of the agreement.
"We are pleased with the progress achieved tonight, and we greatly appreciate the efforts of both parties to stabilize our financial markets and to protect our economy," said Tony Fratto, the spokesman for the White House.
Moreover, the program differs from the original proposal made by the Bush administration, which stated that the $700 billion should be spent at one go, to buy securities on questionable credit.
Now, at the most half of the $700 billion can be spent. The first 250 billion will be issued immediately after the adoption of the law by Congress, probably on Monday. This first amount will serve the Treasury Secretary to buy bad debts from banks, while the use of an additional $100 billion will be left to the discretion of the President.
The programme will be overseen by an independent body, in which the chairman of the Federal Reserve will take part.
The spending of the second half of the $700 billion depends on a new decree of Congress.
Under the law, the secretariat to the Treasury will put in place a combined strategy: it can, at the same time, buy bad debts, securities on mortgages and bad mortgages and other types of "toxic" debts.
The competent people of the Ministry said that bailouts can take place in the context of an auction, but also directly.
The rule allows companies concerned, to take part in an insurance program, where the secretariat to the Treasury ensures the tools at the root of the concerns, for which the companies have paid a premium equivalent to the predictable damage.
Henry Paulson said that the law provides the necessary tools to spend $700 billion for the urgent needs of the financial system, the vast takeover of dubious credit, their insurance, or to avoid the risk of the system triggering the collapse of one or more important financial institutions.
"We will take the necessary steps to be prepared for the application of the law, as soon as it is signed," he said.
However, the leaders of the banks find themselves in an uncomfortable position and waiting for help from the state can expect that their redundancy payments, called simply Atlantic golden parachute, will be capped by the government.
The cap wage is not mentioned in any specificity: the limitations depend on how the secretariat of the Treasury offers its aid to the company.
The principle of capping means that if the secretariat of the Treasury is buying bad credit in an auction, it will collect a surplus of tax on the golden parachute, unless the President of discredited bank retires.
Immediately after the takeover of bad debts, the government will intervene in aggressive way to ensure that the amount paid to the managers should not be exaggerated.
For the image to be complete, one must add that the existing golden parachutes are not changed. The cap is only concerned with new contracts, so as to motivate participation in the plan.
This is the first time in the history of the United States that legal capping will be in force on the allowances of general managers –  commented the chairman of the committee responsible for financial services of the Chamber of Deputies, the democrat Barney Frank.
Moreover, the state has a right to buy shares in banks taking part in the plan. In this way, the risk of taxpayers is lessened, since they can even benefit as soon as the economy and the saved banks will regain firm feet.
The draft law states that in the next five years, the President must introduce to Congress, a proposal that will rule on how the losses will be returned to the taxpayers, from the financial sector.
On both sides, there were, of course, those who have expressed their doubts about the plan.
This is not why the American people have voted for us, this does not protect the taxpayer dollars - said the Republican Deputy of California, Darrell Issa.
His fellow Democrat in Ohio, Mary Kaptur believe that these are the same people who are taking action, as those responsible for the collapse of Wall Street.
Industrial prices have continued to increase
In August 2008, domestic industrial prices rose by 0.1 percent compared with the previous month, and 12.9% with August 2007 - communicates the Central Office of Statistics of Hungary.
The industrial export sale price rose by 1.1 percent compared to July 2008, while if compared to those of a year ago, it fell by 3.9 percent.
As a result of domestic price fluctuations and for export, the prices of industrial production rose by 0.7% compared with the previous month, and 3.2 percent compared with the previous year.
Domestic sale prices have risen to a lesser extent, 0.1 percent, compared with the previous month.
The domestic sale price of the processing industry has only witnessed a small increase of 0.1 percent in comparison with July.
In August 2008, the the most significant rise of price has been observed in the manufacturing sector for leather articles and shoes (2.8 percent); the manufacture of bags and belts with a monthly rise of 4.6 percent, followed by the production of shoes with 2.5 percent of monthly rise.
The higher prices of plastic and chemical raw materials has led to a considerable monthly rise in the price of manufactured products and chemical materials (1.6 percent).
Deflation has resulted in the sectors of petrol transformation (1.4 percent), the manufacture of machines and electrical equipment (0.9 percent), and a minimum increase in the processing sector of wood (0.1 percent).
The price of the production of paper, print and publishing have not changed.
The other sectors of the processing industry have increased between 0.2 percent and 0.9 percent.
In the sectors of the supply of electricity, gas, steam and water, representing a significant weight in the industrial exploitation, prices have witnessed an increase of 0.3 percent in August, mainly because of the effect of rising gas prices set up by the authorities since 1 July.
In a comparison of 12 months, taking into account the domestic sales of processing sectors, the price of the oil processing sector has been rising the most significantly (32.4 percent).
In the manufacture of metallurgical products, we have seen an increase in the price by 13.2 percent, while in the important area of food production, drinks and tobacco, prices rose by 11 percent.
Price reductions have taken place in the sectors of production of textiles and textile products (2.5 percent), as well as in the manufacture of machinery and electrical appliances (0.3 percent).
In other sectors of the processing industry, rising prices have ranged between 0.6 percent and 9.1 percent.
In the whole of the processing industry, prices have risen by 10.2 percent during the past year.
The price in sectors of supply of electricity, gas, water and steam have increased by 18,7 percent since last year.
Among the groups of internal trade and according to the allocation of sectors, in August, the initiatoring sectors of profit on investment showed  the most significant rise of monthly price (0.7 percent).
In the sectors of production of consumer goods, prices rose by 0.3 percent, while those sectors which produce energy and materials aimed at a subsequent transformation did not change compared with the previous month.
In August 2008, compared to the same month last year, we have seen the biggest increase in production sectors of energy and materials aimed at a subsequent transformation (16.8 percent).
In the sectors of production of consumer goods, we measured inflation of 6.8 percent, while the sector of initiators of profit, saw a reduction of 1.4 percent.
The sale price for export of the industrial sector, HUF, rose by 1.1 percent in August compared with the previous month, while it suffered a fall of 3.9 percent over 12 months.
In one month, our national currency has weakened by 1.7 per cent against the euro, and 7.1 percent against the dollar. Compared to August 2007, it has strengthened by 7.5 percent against the euro and 15,9 percent against the dollar.
Next year, will we still need a visa to go to the United States?
Kinga Göncz thinks there is a good chance that on 12 January, the Hungarian-US visa waiver will be put into effect, which is what the foreign minister said in Chicago, in front of the leaders of the Hungarian community.
According to her, "now, everything is waiting for the moment when the systems of entry and electronic control of the Atlantic will be put into service".
Nevertheless, she drew attention to the fact that in the new system, there will be no entry visa, but tourists must be registered before their departure.
The leader of the Hungarian diplomacy is in negotiations today onwards in Washington.
He will meet the Foreign Minister, Condoleezza Rice, to whom he will confer the Commander's Cross with the Star of the Order of merit of the Hungarian Republic, and will have an interview with the foreign policies of the presidential candidates, Democrat Barack Obama and Republican John McCain.
Barack Obama and McCain both support the rescue plan of banks
Sunday, Barack Obama and John McCain, the candidates for the presidency of the two major parties in America, showed their support for the government's $700 billion rescue plan, but there are politicians who are demanding the resignation of the US Treasury Secretary.
After the marathon negotiations which have gone on for days on end, the representatives in Congress and the Administration have finally announced Sunday that they have concluded agreements in principle on the rescue plan for banks.
This financing plan which aims at thawing the crisis on Wall Street and the paralyzed credit market, has become the central issue in the presidential campaign.
Obama and McCain are each as capable as the other, to lead the country out of the economic crisis.
According to the most recent polls, highlighting the economic issues, Obama has once again managed to get a bit ahead. The advance of McCain, achieved with the appointment of Sarah Palin as running partner just after the Republican convention, has melted away.
During a campaign rally in Detroit, on Sunday, Obama has expressed his hope that Congress will vote soon on the 700 billion rescue package.
He stressed that the proposal includes consumer protection, which he also supports.
"Now is the time to act responsibly (...) a danger threatens your job, your savings, the entire industry and the stability of the whole economy," he said before a crowd of 35,000 people.
He did not failed to describe the economic ideas of McCain as outdated.
In an interview given to the ABC, McCain said: "We will all have difficulty swallowing it (...) but doing nothing is not an option."
The Republican senator said that in the proposal are mentioned the creation of a committee of control of the Treasury and the cap of redundancy payments to senior managers, and that he was personally very attached to these points.
Obama said to CBS that McCain has not had any role in the negotiations, while he was in daily contact with the Treasure Secretary.
Nancy Pelosi, chairperson of the House of Representatives, said on Sunday that there are serious hopes that the House will vote on the bill as early as Monday.
The press review of German speaking territories
The right-wing camp is intact, it is only at the heart of the party that voters have become more aware - as mentioned Der Spiegel, the low score of the Bavarian CSU in the country.
Haider is prepared to govern Austria, to prevent the coalition of red and black.
Der Spiegel (spiegel.de)
In the online edition of the information journal of the German left, Franz Walter analyses the causes of the dramatic defeat of the CSU in his article entitled "The revolution in Bavaria devours its founding fathers".
According to the renouned political scientist, the erosion of the CSU began well before the sad duo Beckstein-Huber took up office.
The Socialist Christians have transformed Bavaria for decades and now, these are the same modern people who are turning their backs to it.
This epochal change is also the problem of any Christian Democracy, and therefore also that of Angela Merker.
For the CSU, the failure was not quite a surprise, but on Sunday, a process came to end that was likely to have done so for ten years: the undisputed hegemony of the national party ended.
10 years ago, in 1998, the CSU measured at 47.7 percent, for the first time since the 1950s, with a score below 50 percent.
This was repeated during the three years in the elections of the Bundestag of 2005, i.e. at the time of the much-discussed Stoiber.
The cause can be attributed to modernisation "devouring its parents', put in place in a consistent way in the region by the CSU.
For 40 years, sociologists announced that they have been misled about the pace, but secularization, the results of education and the establishment of North German and in the region of Bavaria, could not remain without consequences on the loyalty of voters CSU.
Modernisation goes hand in hand with the increase in opportunities, and the consequences of such a policy are also visible.
The right-wing camp is intact, it is only inside the party that voters have become more aware, more critical and more stubborn.
It is astonishing that in recent weeks, this is precisely the classic groups of citizens who are rather far away from CSU, such as the self-employed artisans, holders of degrees and graduates of studies higher.
In these groups, support for the CSU has fallen below 40 percent.
The Press (diepresse.com)
In his article entitled "Who? With whom? The party chairman is reserved with regards to the issues of the coalition," the Austrian conservative newspaper says about the situation of confused internal policy which has followed the Austrian elections.
The Austrian Socialists of SPÖ want to discuss with the Conservatives of the ÖVP.
The ÖVP prohibits the SPÖ of meddling in its internal affairs.
The populist party BZÖ is open to negotiations. The Greens are not yet willing to agree on the coalition.
The elections were held; now everything revolves around the coalition; during the debates on public television, the party leaders have hidden their cards.
Werner Faymann, the chairman of the SPÖ, confirmed that he wanted to discuss with the ÖVP.
The SPÖ wants to show that the cooperation of both parties is indeed possible - that is what already exists in certain regions and in the Socialist partnership.
The question according to which he would envision a coalition with Wilhelm Molter, the current president of the ÖVP, as Vice-Chancellor, is open from Faymann.
As he said, the Schüssel-Molter orientation was, in any case, rejected.
A repeat of this combination is out of the question.
Molter reacted cautiously to the proposals of the red.
As he has already said, a collaboration will surely be unsuccessful if Faymann is trying to interfere in the internal affairs of the ÖVP.
In his party, the choice of the opposition or entry into the coalition is temporarily an open question. These points should be debated in the ÖVP.
Jörg Haider, the President of BZÖ, is again open to all proposals.
"To avoid the coalition of red and black, we are ready to take responsibility of the government," said Haider.
Járóka said: We need to break the vicious cycle of poverty and segregation
Today, the European summit for the Equal Opportunities began in Paris, in which France was host, as representative of the current presidency of the European Union.
In his speech before the full assembly, as one of the main spokesmen of the consultation of experts, Lívia Járóka, eurodeputy of Fidesz European People's Party, has drawn attention to the segregation in education, because it is a violation of the law affecting the children of Rome, and one of the main obstacles to their success in life.
On behalf of the French Presidency, this high-level conference was opened by Xavier Bertrand, Labor and Social Affairs French Minister, and by Vladimir Spidla, European Commissioner for Work, Social Affairs and Equal Opportunities.
Among those invited to take part in the consultation are the European social partners, as well as the most prominent representatives of the legal protection and civilian agencies of Europe, in the field of equal opportunities.
According to the press office of the Group of the deputy Fidesz People's Party, Járóka warned that alongside distinctions found in the recruitment, Romans disappears from the labour market, in the first place, following their low qualifications.
"An overwhelming majority of young Romans have no secondary qualifications, and as a result of a poor quality of elementary education, only a tiny fraction have the opportunity to obtain a diploma."
Moreover, Járóka has insisted that education, as a fundamental right of human beings, plays a key role in implementing the other fundamental rights.
Investment in early education of Roma children means a strengthening of the economy of the Member States of the European Union.
According to the MEP, it is necessary to raise awareness of these reports in the widest possible circle, equally among the Roma and non-Roma.
Indeed, earlier Roma children start school, it increases the chances of them becoming productive members of the labour market; by the taxes paid from their income and consumption, they become part of the state budget.
"By their nationality of the European Union, the Roma must be assured of their right to quality education, and be protected from a low-quality and sectarian education,"  said Lívia Járóka.
According to the deputy, a collaboration of the European Union geared towards a goal and an action is necessary for an acceleration of the process of desegregating schools. This respect for anti-discrimination directives and preparation is of paramount importance.
"We need to break the vicious circle of poverty, segregation and the unemployed to give the opportunities provided by democracy to the Roma children, so that they can participate as citizens of the future of Europe," demanded Járóka.
On behalf of the 'European Year of Equal Opportunities "guaranteed for all, the objective of the summit for equal opportunities in Europe held every year since the summit in Berlin last year, is to ensure a single platform to support the measures taken in favour of equal opportunities and the fight against discrimination, targeted at Europe and its Member States.
CSU: a grace period of transition
In October the decision will be taken on the fate of the toppled duo Huber-Beckstein
Despite this pitiful electoral defeat, heads have not yet fallen, and the debate on the personal questions of top memebers of the Bavarian CSU was postponed.
The chairman of the party, Erwin Hube and the head of the regional government, Günther Beckstein, can still retain their place. The question is how long will the grace period last?
The fate of the tandem, having suffered a catastrophic loss of voice ny 17 percent, will be on the agenda of the party congress , held the last weekend of October.
Members of this highly criticised pair have, in any case, felt that they were not particularly in their seats.
Thanks to this, they have sought to calm angry members of the group on the basis that one day after the Bavarian "tsunami" they have demanded personal consequences for the loss of an absolute majority.
Five years ago, it is true, even under the direction of Edmund Stoiber, at the peak of his career - the socio-Christian union had 60.7%, while today, a year after the coup against Stoiber, there have only 43.4 percent of their strength.
For 46 years, the CSU was the single "sovereign" party of Bavaria contributing 18% of the GDP.
But the Conservatives have always figured strongly in this southern region which is of key importance for the Hungarian economy. In the future, they will be forced to the coalition.
As one of the first signs of an internal review of the party, the Vice-President and the Federal Minister of Agriculture, presented Horst Seehofer as a possible successor to Huber. He also received a place in this small group of recognition, which initiated groping discussions with the liberal of the FDP, and with the free Electeurs, trained along the values of the right, about a possible coalition of the government in Munich.
A strange mockery of fate has been that it was using the list of Electeurs Universities, entered Gabriele Pauli into legislation, to measure against Stroiber was the possibility of a coup by the duo Huber-Beckstein, and then treat bluntly the very ambitious local politician.
Now, the leaders of the CSU are putting all their energy to stabilize Beckstein, one way or another.
In this transition, Stoiber, who until now called the shots behind the scenes, will also receive an active role. The former head of the regional government and former president of the CSU, has appointed the 28 September as the most bitter day of his political career.
On Monday, Huber launched a scathing remarks at the CDU. According to him, they should have received much more support from the sister party.
Other politicians CSU have interpreted the defeat as a warning to the CDU and also for Angela Merkel.
Following the Bundestag elections, which will take place in September 2009, Merkel will again be Chancellor only if they are able to regain their feet one way or another, with a joint force, the CSU, having played an important role in the success of 2005.
According to Merkel, concealing his disappointment caused by the fiasco with difficulty, the loss of ground of the CSU will not negatively influence the grand coalition of Berlin.
Which is relative because it will not be easier to handle an injured CSU, and the crisis of the social democrats still lasts.
Since 1946, the SPD has reached its worst results with 18.6 percent in Bavaria.
Lukasenko - his rivals: 110 - 0
No member of the opposition has seen the Belarusian parliament after the elections on Sunday.
According to the Russian observers, this is due to a country ruled by Alexander Lukashenko, who ensures prosperity and stability, while according to the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe (OSCE), this is because illegalities are made in the counting of votes.
The OSCE, having sent 450 observers from 43 countries, does not recognise the elections as fair.
Although the legislature composed of 110 people in this country of 10 million people is doing very well with the opposition for many decades before the elections yesterday, the opposition between its forces under the name of Forces Démocratiques Nations (ODSZ) was seriously hoping that Lukashenko would renew his term as President for the fourth time in dubious elections, in the footsteps of the amendments to the constitution in 2006, "would" this time the presence of a few Members of the opposition in parliament.
In this way, the ODSZ has abandoned its originally planned boycott.
The fact that Belarus, economically increasingly dependent on Russia, would improve relations with the EU, where because of the political order of Belarus it described as undemocratic, Lukashenko and several senior politicians do not receive entry visa, was one of the expectations of the opposition. Belarus has taken credit for the reduction of Russian natural gas imports which are increasingly more expensive, and helped the passage of the Beltransgaz society, owner of gas stations across the country, has passed into the hands of the Russian.
The fact that the OSCE, during the evaluation of the campaign, has highlighted the positive changes rather than the shortcomings, such as the ban to run for a third of the candidates for the opposition, referred to a prior appeasement.
However, the OSCE's report on Monday was already challenging the campaign, in which most of the candidates for the opposition could not appear in the media, and particularly the fact that the opposition could not be present at the counting of votes.
Despite all this, the opposition is still feeling a palpable improvement in the political system: the political detainees have found freedom, and Minsk is prepared to have a small confrontation with Moscow, still refusing to recognise the South Ossetia and the Abazzia separated from Georgia and Russia with which Belarus form a confederation on paper, consider the two territories Independents for a month.
"We have made two steps forward and one step back, but the most important thing is that the dialogue has been initiated between Belarus and the EU," said Alexander Milinkevich to our newspaper.
According to the candidate for the opposition in the presidential elections of 2006, it is desirable that it remains so, despite the fact that "the power has been afraid to bring even one opponent into this Parliament which has no weight".
The opposition does not provide for actions of protests in view of the results. It is trying rather to get its message on the need for economic reforms to the voters.
"Of course, we have a lot of concern for this: We have to give our newspapers opponents in Russia, local authorities are putting a spanner in the works for the dissemination, but I can see that they are increasingly willing to support the elections, even in the circle of elderly people," said Milinkevich, referring to the fact that in the current regime of Lukashenko, which considers social security as its main result, the most sustained layer of pensioners officially really no longer regard it as appropriate.
"Because of the debt of the country and the rise of the trade deficit, the collapse of social security, 'referring to the silence of a graveyard', is no longer just a matter of time "- believes Milinkevich.
Unlike the politicians of the opposition, the Russian observers have accepted the democratic elections.
Sergei Lebedev, leader of the Commonwealth of Independent States, told the Russian news agency Ria Novosti: "People do not believe in words, but in deeds." In this way, the absence of the opposition is proof of the maturity of the Belarussian voters.
Brunetta: "From today, breakfast before the work".
Never in the history of the Palais Chigi, have there been rotating doors for the entry and exit of employees.
But as of today, this new measure against hypocrites is in force, against those who tip and then go to drink coffee in the bar during working hours.
The new anti loafers was presented today by the Minister of the public administration, Renato Brunetta, and by the Secretary-General of the Council Presidency, Mauro Masi.
"The revolving doors - according to Brunetta- are an instrument for working better, with more productivity, attendance and services" says the minister.
Now begins a new season of accountability and transparency.
"This is reformism," emphasises Brunetta.
The installation in all the institutions of the Presidency of the Council is now complete with the Palais Chigi.
According Masi, "the choice of rotating doors is important even from a symbolic point of view."
No resistance on the part of employees has been recorded, ensures the Secretary-General: "It is a process shared by employees, and we had the cooperation of all".
In short, no more breakfast during working hours; no more coffee or croissant.
Brunetta promises and suggests by smiling, "a good cappuccino at 7h in the morning is an excellent and healthy resolution".
At a conference in the upper School of Public Administration
of Rome, the minister communicates that "in three months, the absence of sick public employees was reduced by 50%, or 60 thousand more workers in a year.
And he adds that it is essential to make  the public administration more efficient.
Italian, "whose dynamic salariales- explains the ministre- these last 8-10 years have doubled compared to the private sector, and well above the rate of inflation.
At the same time, thousands of public employees, are united to contest the standards of the Brunetta decree making use of the Codacons.
While today the Ministry of Public Administration spreads data on the reduction of absenteeism in the workplace because of illness - writes the association of the consumers - the number of active loafers continues to rise.
Indeed, in Italy, thousands of employees of the public administration correct and productive, met to declare war on illegitimate standards contained in the decree.
In particular, in Tar, they are contesting the exclusion of additional benefits in the event of injury as a cause of service hours; the extension of hours of home leave for ill workers, during which are carried out inspections and other items from the new provisions sought by the minister.
Accidents in the Napolitano workplace: "Crucial prevention"
Every day, in Italy, there are 2500 accidents at work, 3 killed and 27 people who are disabled permanently.
In 2007, the Inail data confirmed that the number of dead whites were approximately 1200.
Figures which show the gravity of the phenomenon which proves that it is one of the main causes of death, and causes almost twice as many deaths as homicides.
To gain the attention of the institutions, the social forces and means of information on this dramatic aspect, the Anmil is today celebrating, in all the Italian provinces, the 58th National Day of  victims of accidents at work, institutionalised the second Sunday in October.
"Worrying data provided by the Anmil, and the tragic events of recent days, confirm the importance of the issue of prevention in the workplace," says the President of the Republic, Giorgio Napolitano, in a message to the president of the National Association of Anmil for the mutilated and disabled at work, Pietro Mercandelli.
The head of state expresses his "sincere appreciation for the ongoing effort in favour of prevention in the workplace, the protection of accident to workers, assistance to the victims' families and awareness of public opinion"
"naturally outraged, everyone has resolved to put an end to such tragedies which, by their numbers, call for the clamour of media and the participation of the public, even if daily reality presents us with dramatic cases, even repetitive in their dynamics.
Napolitano does not hide the fact that "there is certainly a problem of resources: it is essential to invest in training and information"
The many initiatives promoted in the education sector, have a particular importance for a more direct awareness on young people who enter the world of work.
It is our duty to bring attention to this phenomenon, not in assessing the alarm on its social gravity, and improving legislation.
On his part, the Speaker Gianfranco Fini pointed out that "this phenomenon of the dead whites is an absolute social emergency, which insults the conscience within each of us, and requires all the institutions, to make a real effort to stop it quickly".
The data of victims at work seem to point out a small positive trend, but this does not stop the fact that the number of dead whites is considerable "said the President of the Anmil, Pietro Mercandelli, later.
"We do not want this watered-down trend will result in minor attention, because it is precisely when attention is relaxed that tragedy strikes.
"We believe that, in general, it is not enough to block the phenomenon of accidents and the contrast can be made through numerous actions."
"According to us - stressed Mercandelli - more tests and inspections are needed, as well as greater intervention on the training of workers from as early as school."
He added - "we must make a further effort on the communication and awareness of public opinion.
"But above all, a greater sense of responsibility of employers towards a phenomenon which represents a social emergency."
"Mercandelli then denounced" the gradual deterioration of the conditions of safety for compensating victims at work" and the "derived assistance to which the system has been moving in recent years ".
"The aim therefore, is to restore the assurance in safety to the worker – he added - so that the fate of those who have an accident, must not depend on the whims or large-heartedness of the legislator"
MP3 players put hearing at risk.
Listening to music at full volume for a prolonged period using mobile music devices like MP3 players, can cause permanent damage to the hearing.
This is what the European Commission said in a statement distributed in Brussels, quoting the opinion of the Scientific Committee, on the unexpected health risks and recently identified (Csrseri) of the EU, published today.
"According to this scientific report it appears that 5-10% of those who, listen to music at full volume using mobile music devices, for over an hour a day and per week, during a period of 5 years, risk a permanent hearing capacity loss."
"I am concerned that such a huge number of young people who frequently use portable music devices and mobile phones at full volume, can unconsciously damage their hearing irreparably" says Meglena Kuneva.
'"According to scientific data - she continues - it is a clear risk and we must react quickly.
What matters most is consumer awareness and making this information open to the public domain.
We need to review the existing control systems in the scientific opinion, so that they are fully effective and can follow the new technologies "
Brussels has asked the independent Scientific commity, to examine the problem, given the intensive use of mobile music devices and the increase in the number of young people exposed to noise that they generate.
"The scientists-concluded the executive UE- confirm that there are good reasons to worry, and that the European Commission will now decide, with the Member States and other interested parties, what steps could possibly be taken to better protect children and adolescents, against exposure to noise from mobiles and similar music devices.
There is already a European standard of safety which limits the noise level of portable music devices to 100Db, but the concern is growing about the hearing damage that may result of excessive exposure to such sources of noise.
It is possible to limit these data making use of solutions such as the reduction of the level and duration of exposure to noise.
The Scientific commity of the EU pointed out that users of mobile music devices, who are listening to music at full volume (more than 89 decibels) for five hours per week, are currently crossing the limits on the level of noise allowed at the workplace.
Those who listen to music in such conditions for prolonged periods, risk a permanent hearing loss after five years.
This numbers 5-10% of users of these devices, and can be quantified around 2.5 to 10 million people in the EU
In Rome, Alemanno gave the order to make the Commission for the future of the capital leave.
Today we are starting, in March we end, in June we will make the sums.
That is the timetable set by the Capitol for the work of the Commission for the future of Rome" which took place this morning at the new headquarters, behind the Thermes of Caracalla.
In six months, the president Antonio Marzano and 49 other members of the Commission will put up the directives for Rome.
In March when they have finished, the Committee and the City Council will evaluate the analyses and projects, in order to present in June, the strategic plan for Rome with the "official" stamp of the Capitol and its mayor Gianni Alemanno.
'"The Committee is absolutely independent; all the political, social and cultural ideas are represented - wishes to emphasise Alemanno - it will offer ideas of development for Rome which policymakers can use, which remain the Committee and the City Council.
No combination of roles, but only the desire for a corner where one can elaborate a great project for Rome.
In March, it will have completed its tasks and disappeared, because this experiment must have a specific time period.
In June - announced the mayor - we present the strategic plan based on the work done by the Commission for the future of Rome. "
For those who accuse the Commission of being useless, given that their views will not be binding, Alemanno replies: "Everything depends on the work that the Commission will be able to do, and the quality of its proposals.
If the quality is in Rome, as in France with the Attali Commission, I am sure its contribution will be crucial.
Too often the policy is frustrated by the management of the newspaper and emergencies that occur from time to time.
We, on the contrary, want to see progress, and more: to a broader prospective, working seriously for the development of Rome and its future. "
In addition, the mayor of Rome is keen to stress that "the Commission is not an unnecessary bureaucratic body: it is absolutely free, and will not cost a euro to the Roman city dwellers, and will serve to study and get the best minds that express the Capital.
According to Alemanno, indeed, "we need a sketch of strategic reference, neither firm nor immobile, to allow our city to improve, which is absolutely necessary, while thinking about its future in a spirit of unity,".
The future, says that the mayor of Rome, "will not be limited to the usual local border, but will go further" not only in the context of the future metropolitan city and its legal status as Capital, but also in relation to the role that Rome can and should be, as Capital of Europe and the Mediterranean '.
Obama? The first anti-American president. That's why.
A famous American politician who wants to be independent, wrote: "Barack Obama will be the second anti-American president.
The first was Jimmy Carter, who, with his decisions, destroyed the US economy and had contacts (as he continues to have today, as a private citizen) with the Islamic enemy. "
Attacks on Obama are rising while the date of the elections approach.
A lady of Miami wrote on a website: "This person is full of ambition".
Obama is really cheeky: he believes he will win the highest office of a nation that has two black governors and five black senators! "
In fact, these attacks that do not say much; they are obviously attacks of racial nature, and do not correspond to the views of all voters: will he be a good president? We have the polls, which say that Obama will win with a clear advantage.
In this case, it is someone who speaks with the heart and not with the brain.
A newspaper of Mississippi, in the southern regions of the US, wrote an article: once in the voting booth, we know that the American patriot will give his vote.
That is one aspect of the American mindset which is kept secret until the end.
"Say what you want, we will be the ones to put the cross on Obama or McCain.
There are even people who swear: if Obama wins, we leave the United States.
Things never revealed until now, so much so that the success of the black candidate seems almost certain.
Anyway, despite all these arguments, the winning card for the democrats is George Bush.
We asked 1500 people: What were the mistakes made by Bush during his mandate? 89% replied: Iraq.
America changes.
In Vietnam, the nation lost 50 thousand soldiers and were sent back with kicks to their rear.
In Iraq, 4500 soldiers have been killed, and the Americans have not been forced to pack up and leave.
Despite this, Iraq has been, for the most part, the weakness of Bush.
The one who will take the place of George W will have a great work to do.
In the US, the economic turmoil is even being felt among journalists: in the press, it is time for supression. And many blame the Internet, the murderer of the newspaper.
Five hundred American journalists have been arrested by the PEW Research Center about the status of their profession and mental control for the future.
Well, almost all journalists are pessimistic about their future.
However, they have not said anything openly about the veracity of the information so as to feel less worried about the credibility.
They do not feel isolated as in the past.
The problem of American journalists is money.
The crisis of 2008 for these journalists is a crisis of a destroyed economic model.
In addition, the deletions made in the newsroom, in the room where the authors are working for the assembly of newspapers, are a major problem.
This is a problem that must be resolved, according to reporters interviewed, if we want traditional journalism, as the general public knows it, not to be reduced substantially.
A clear but complex pessimism invades American journalism.
Six out of ten senior executives of printed newspapers and journalists are convinced that journalism at a national level is going the wrong way.
Locally, the executive group is at 65%.
Printed publication against broadcast.
Journalists can clearly see where the web is going.
The larger editorial houses are working their way to the Internet, seen by many as the "murderer" of the paper newspaper.
The "economic pressure" that journalists feel has increased by up to 79%.
The 500 reporters who were interviewed admitted to resorting to technology hoping that it would "do something good" for their journalism.
Today, the largest agreement in American journalism lies between who run the newsrooms- i.e. the directors - and reporters who work for them.
56% of directors at national level, are convinced that reporters share their values, while at the local level, this percentage drops to 23%.
For some, it is linked to a "safe job".
The directors who imagine they will lose their jobs in the space of three years, are 47% at national level.
With regard to journalists, this figure is 30%.
The 'safe job' at the level of staff (our editors, ndr) in America is still on the agenda.
Only 13% of journalists are working under contract.
In a nation as huge as the US, with 300 million inhabitants and thousands of journalists, reviews, radio, TV and the Internet, employers often provide what they want, and it is fast becoming a matter of take it or leave it.
The directors almost always receive huge salaries, while the Editor can earn 10 thousand dollars a month, in addition to retirement pension and the payment of insurance.
As regards holidays, the logic is complicated: x days after the first year, x days after the third, up to 15 days in all, past a certain number of years.
But, according to their revelations, the American journalists are often "sick" during the year.
It is the fault of the climate.
UNIPOL: Court ROME, DANILO COPPOLA remains in GROTTAFERRATA.
The President of the second section of the criminal court in Rome, Carmelo Rinaudo, decided to reject the proceedings of the estate agent, Danilo Coppola, who had asked to leave his city, Grottaferrata, for a house in Rome.
Coppola is being investigated for bankruptcy in the framework of the investigation on the Unipol-Bnl escalation.
At the trial against him, last week he had secured his release but with a compulsory house arrest in Grottaferrata.
His lawyers, Michele Gentiloni and Gaetano Pecorella, asked if the estate agent could move from the provincial city to a home in the capital.
According to the court, such movements (that the entry was not granted) would allow him to influence his society and to have access to evidence that was used to accuse him.
The elites in danger.
The phenomenon had already manifested itself a few days ago, with the vote in the House of Representatives, contrary to the rescue plan of $700 billion approved by the White House: a significant number of Americans were, and still are, more interested in punishing Wall Street than saving the US economy.
And New York Times from yesterday confirms that the current crisis divides the Republican Party, even more divided between its old East Coast soul, which is moderate, in favour of the federal institutions and the business community, and its new soul, which is on the contrary, conservative, hostile to "those in Washington" and the world of finance, powerful especially in the States of the Centre and the South.
The part, precisely, which made itself felt despotically at the vote which I mentioned earlier.
But what has just been mentioned is just one example of the big changes that the ongoing economic earthquake foreshadows or is already engendering: not only in the US, but throughout the West, and maybe not only here.
In the US as in Europe, the crisis appears to speed up the phenomena that has been incubated for some time, so much so that, in the new climate, they have solidified and are revealing themselves.
The first of these phenomena is the updating, the extraordinary revival of the double category State - sovereign, compared to a kind of renationalisation of the economy.
The crisis, indeed, is a crisis of financial institutions that have, of course, close relations with banks abroad, but, above all, are involved in a large scale in one state with the balance sheets of individuals and families who live in one country.
This creates an immediate political problem for whoever is in power: that is to say to respond to the difficulties and the protests of individuals and families who are also an electorate.
In short, the crisis appears global from the point of view of economics, but is exclusively, in addition, political here.
The internationalization policy seems really out of the game and has little to say: the evidence is provided by the European Union, which is divided as usual, between the various interests and between the various national strategies, to decide on a common policy.
And thus, it is the government of each state from whom everyone expects interventions, plans of rescue and recovery, new rules, and especially the affection of appropriations: when one is going through a difficult period, there is nobody but the State with the economic resources, the mass of financial resources able to try to put things in place.
They also have the necessary resources and the legitimacy to use resources: two invaluable things which no market or international organisation can ever have in a similar way.
This new emphasis of the nation-crisis is in perfect harmony with the importance that the increasingly large recent developments of the economy tend to place to a factor which is inherently linked with this element: territoriality.
Ironically, indeed, while we were convinced of henceforth entering a world of networks, technology which is increasingly more sophisticated, convinced that the global finance is now intended to dominate the world, that we became aware in a single stroke, that our future will have to settle scores with more things that are very material such as water, harvests, oil.
Things that can certainly be transported from one place to another in the land, but which are definitively linked to a limited area, a territory.
Thus, he who is sovereign, has certainly more power than he who is not, that is to say, whoever has the misfortune to live in a place without harvest, oil or water.
I now come to the second new feature, which provides a fracture.
Whoever speaks of territory, state government policy, inevitably speaks of Politics, and therefore Leadership.
In this respect, the economic crisis seems to produce two convergent phenomena.
One the one hand is the conscience of the objective need for authoritarian leadership, the search for a person who will take control of the situation.
On the other hand, a wave of reputation for the existing leaderships, economic types who have proven to be inadequate and full of grey areas.
And furthermore, something even more profound, in a sense, even worrying is a reputation, a suffering, an image of inadequacy, a sense of isolation which tends to involve the entire class of directors in a growing number in the West.
And so increases still more the conviction of the various classes, before the actions are the same ideas of social elites until now at their peak, their way to listen and to be, their culture in the complex acceptance of the term, to have the same time, and to be always more foreign to the views of the majorities.
In short, the need for leadership, feeds from below, a powerful and more ramified delegitimization movement of the ruling classes and traditional political orders, in the "electoral uprisings" improvised or, in the changes of collective mood of recent just days, from the conservative rise in Austrian Bavaria, in the fall of Labour in Britain, the US Congressmen's rebellion against Bush (and it may well be that the victory of the Right in Italy is not by chance).
One has the impression that the traditional elites, their parties, their programs, but also their observance, their newspapers, their accredited intellectuals, their format, one would say, which is not new, one would have more difficulty to understand and therefore to represent the deep layers of Western societies, and that the economic crisis strengthens, increases and agitates in way which is potentially too much.
In the view of all this talk of a "rebellion of the masses", seems quite frankly excessive.
But it is said, keep your eyes wide open: and it is not without reason.
Superglue to walk on the walls.
Defeat the laws of gravity thanks to a super glue and, in the future, walk on the walls like Spiderman.
That is the objective of various American research centres, and today, a team of four institutions have almost succeeded.
With an adhesive that barely measured 2.5 square centimetres, researchers have managed to stick a body of 100 kilograms on a vertical wall.
The study - The US journal of Science published the discoveries of some researchers from the University of Dayton, of Akron, the Georgia Institute of Technology and the Air Force Research Laboratory.
The material, invented by the team of researchers, is a development of a special structure of carbon, called nano tubes of carbon.
"The principle of the glue can be imagined as a series of tubes prepared as a pile of spaghetti." Explains Zhong Lin Wang of the Georgia Institute of Technology in Atlanta.
Scientists were inspired by the legs of geckos, which are covered with microscopic hair which assure the animal with a perfect adhesive.
The testing of various materials, such as glass, téflon, and paper made of glass, have shown that the new adhesive is ten times more powerful than the legs of these reptiles, and at the same time, "detaches easily from walls" explains Liming Dai, engineering researcher at the faculty of the University of Dayton.
Walk on walls? – "this material may be used as a temporary adhesive" adds Liming Dai.
Could one walk on walls like Spiderman? Maybe so, but researchers are thinking of a much less compelling use, such as the connection between electronic devices, given that the nano tubes of carbon drivers are conductors of heat and electricity.
Other applications could affect aerospace engineering.
For now, no super heroes.
The other research - The University of California, Berkeley, claims also to be researching in a new adhesive.
In a US magazine article of the American Chemical Society, the Californian researchers have presented an adhesive formed of microfibres like hair, which automatically clean themselves of dust in the movement on the area to ensure a constant and perfect grip.
Medicines: never with fruit juices.
Be careful of grapefruit, orange and apple juice.
These drinks, consumed especially the summer because they are refreshing and rich in vitamins, if taken with some vital medicines, can alter their effectiveness, absorbing or reducing according to cases, with serious consequences to the health.
David Nailey, a professor at the University of Western Ontario in London, warns about the risks of fruit juices. He said that they are dangerous, if taken with the ingestion of certain drugs during the 236th national meeting of the American Chemical Society underway in Philadelphia. He launched a new warning: a glass of orange juice, grapefruit or apples, reduces the absorbtion of some vital medicines, cancelling their benefits and putting at risk the health of patients.
Grapefruit juice has already been heavily criticised for increasing the effects of certain drugs, antibiotics, anti arythmiques tranquillizers, anti staminales and neurological, upto toxic levels.
Medicines at sirk- the Italian Agency of the medicine, which gave the news in a letter dated two years ago, alerting doctors and patients not to assess the danger of this mix and to pay attention to what we drink, taking medication for example, Diazépam or the methadone.
Not only PAMPLEMOUSSE - according to experts, even orange juice and apple contain substances that inhibit medicines.
Is a long list of active principles inhibited by grapefruit and other juices.
From there, the appeal of Michele Carruba, director of the Department of pharmaceuticals of the public University of Milan: "These findings are generally, immediately reported to the various national and international agencies of medicines which will as required change the informative notes of medicines.
It is always good to read the guideline papers of medicines that we take, and, if something is not clear, speak clearly to the doctor or pharmacist" stressed the expert at the agency called Ansa.
The Nobel Prize for economy goes to Paul Krugman.
The Nobel Prize for economy has been awarded to the American Paul Krugman for his research on trade models and localisation of business.
Krugman, 55, is a neo-Keynesian who teaches at the University of Princeton and is also a famous writer of the New York Times.
Krugman is one of the biggest critics of the economy and foreign policy of the Bush administration.
A few months after the attacks of September 2001, during the days of the collapse of Enron, Krugman wrote in an article published in the New York Times, that the second event would be more important than the first, in terms of impact on US history.
A forecast that unleashed a lot of controversy, and which brought the economist a lot of critisism for years, but now has proved correct.
"I am surprised and even a little shocked at the speed with which the memory of scandals such as the collapse of Enron and WorldCom, have disappeared from public attention" said Krugman at the end of 2002.
According Lorenzo Bini Smaghi, of the executive committee of the European Central Bank, Krugman is a "highly valued economist", but also a divulger with a style that is "very aggressive, and particularly critical of the excesses of liberalism during the Bush administration.
Open Office, this is the third edition of the "anti-Microsoft" package
It is the day of the release of OpenOffice.org.3.0, the open source suite of personal productivity applications which aims to reach more users, at home offices, professionals in the public administration, proposing a free alternative to the famous Microsoft Office.
Following a work of almost a year ago, carried out by volunteer developers, monitored by Sun Microsystem, the new package Open Office is now available to the public with various innovations: the welcome screen, and the interface have been reviewed and are less dry. There are also other more important innovations, such as the compatibility with Apple Mac os X operating system, and support for the new format ODF (Open document format) 1.2, the latest version of the ISO standard.
Open Office has paid particularly attention to the interaction with the suite Office 2007, and it is possible to open the documents with the new extension of Microsoft (.docx, .xlsx, .pptx.)
Also interesting, are some functions specific modules, such as anyone can compress PowerPoint presentations, useful for example, to send them by email or to import PDF files into the module responsible for graphic elaboration, while retaining the original aspect of the page.
Still on this front, it is possible to create "hybrid" PDF documents between the typical graphics of the format Adobe the elements of a worksheet or a text editor.
Cooperation between several people is something that has resulted in improvements in the various applications: in the worksheets, various users can intervene, avoiding conflicts on the changes in the drafting of texts, because every employee is attributed a colour for comments, so that there is greater recognition in the process of revision.
Some companies are working to bring some functions of OpenOffice on the Web (on the cloud), and in the next few weeks, they should make the final outcome.
The Italian version is downloadable at http: / / it.openoffice.org / download / 3.0.0 / download300.htmlet and is added to the English version that has already been available on the mirror since Friday.
Additionly to Windows and Mac os, the suite is as usual available for the Linux operating system.
On demand, the installation CD can be shipped to home or work address.
And if advertising itself as free can be a way of broadcast in homes, it is precisely in business, that Open Office hopes to make an impression, which it can already count on for various projects in the public administration and schools.
Not to mention the realities which provide a service training, consultation and assistance, ideal for small and medium-sized enterprises, which could also be open to the prospects of business.
Open Office is made up of five main modules: the Writer for video writing equivalent of Word; Calc, is the worksheet which aims to replace Excel; Impress, for the rival of PowerPoint presentations; Dbase, to do the same for Access, is the program which allows you to work on databases; and finally Drwa which is the graphic module.
The target for 2008: reach 5 million downloads, and given that today there are nearly 3 million and 600 thousand, it is likely that with the release of the new version, we can even exceed the figure planned
Kohl, too, is positive, that this is the fourth case of doping.
New cases of positive drug tests at the last Tour de France: this time it is the Austrian team Gerolsteiner's, Bernhard Kohl, who qualified third, and was the winner of the jersey for the best climber.
The site of the newspaper L'Equipe reported the news.
At 26 years of age, Kohl is the fourth cyclist to test positive for Cera, EPO of the third generation, after the Italians Riccardo Riccò and Leonardo Piepoli, and German Stefan Schumacher, also of Gerolsteiner.
Blood tests carried out on Kohl are part of those made in recent weeks by the laboratories in Lausanne and Chatenay-Malabry.
If the test turn out positive for Cera, the Austrian will lose his third place in the Tour and will compulsorily suffer a ban of two years.
The news of Kohl testing positive on the EPO of third generation, was confirmed by the head of the French anti-doping agency, Pierre Bordry, which communicated to the Associated Press that it had notified the Austrian authorities about this.
The 26 year old Austrian was placed 3rd on the podium behind the Spaniard Carlos Sastre and the American Cadel Evans, as well as winning the jersey for the best climber.
Immigrants: The New York Times asks itself whether Italy is racist?
Italy "as a nation of immigrants has recently become a destination for immigrants" met with resistance.
Would this make the beautiful country into a nation of racist? This is what the New York Times asked and dedicated a long article, discussing the issue of racism in Italy, working on the case of young Abdul William Guibre, a native of Burkina Faso, killed last month in Milan, for stealing a box of biscuits.
This case highlights what the New York Times defines as the "paradox of the North": The northern regions are both those where one sees "more integration and more work," but also "the strongest anti-immigrant feeling in the country and the most important support for the Northern League"
To confirm the rising tension between Italy and immigrants, the NYT also refers to episodes of intolerance in Milan, Parma, Rome, Ciampino and Castel Volturno.
Not only.
Even the new legislation sought by the Lega to curb immigration and facilitate the expulsion of illegal immigrants, is cited as evidence of climate change in Italy.
A trend which was underlined by the Pope and by the President of the Republic, "Giorgio Napolitano at his meeting with Benedict XVI at Quirinal, asked for the state and the church to work together to defeat racism. "
Students become victims of expensive rent; upto 900 euros for a room.
The market for student accomodation does not know of crisis
According to the latest survey of Sunia, the union of tenants, to rent a simple room can cost a student up to 900 euro in Milan, 700 in Florence, 650 in Naples, and 600 in Rome.
"The phenomenon has now reached very serious proportions, so much so as to exclude whole categories of young people from the right to study, because the overall costs become very high - explains the responsible for the office of studies of Sunia, Laura Mariani- in these cities, the strong demand from the students has distorted the market so that a process of widespread increase has initiated itself for residents.
In most cases, the rental offers also entail a number of violations: free contracts, unregistered, without limit of rent, sub-leased.
For the Sunia, exceptional measures through the revision of taxation, are necessary to lower prices.
Reading the investigation in detail, we see that in Milan, a bed in the Brianza area, is approximately EUR 450; a simple room, ranges between 650 EUR minimum (in Bande Nere), to an average of EUR 800 (in Udine, Lambiate, and Fiera) to a maximum of EUR 900 (in Vittoria)
In Florence, a bed costs on average, 350 / 400 euros, a room around EUR 700.
In Bologna, where students are concentrated in areas close to the University, it costs 250 / 280 euros for a bed in a double room, and 370 to 500 for a simple room.
In Rome, in areas close to the central universities (San Lorenzo, Piazza Bologna), it costs around 600 euros for a simple room, 450 for a bed in a double room.
The rates are slightly lower (550 euro for a simple room) for areas close to the other universities (Ostiense and Cinecittà).
One can only save if one lives in the peripheral areas: 300 euro for a bed, and 450 for a simple room in Predestina, Centocelle or similar areas.
In Naples, a bed costs 300-400 euros, a simple room, 400 to 600 euros, with prices higher in the Policlinico, Vomero, and Colli Aminei areas.
In Bari one must pay 250 / EUR 350 for a bed, and at least 350 for a simple room.
In smaller cities, prices are lower, but they have a major importance in the economy.
Finally, cities such as Perugia, in which the kind of locations are often taken up by students from outside the European Union, there is a further anomaly: the rent asked foreign students is more by 25-30% compared to that applied to Italians.
Goodbye old cinema Paradiso, cities are removing historic theatres.
Historical cinemas are closing in favour of Multiplexes.
"A city without cinemas is a blind city, it is as a face without eyes"
The image provided by the director, Giuseppe Tornatore illustrates what is happening in major Italian cities, but also in the cities of the province,
The process of marginalization of cinemas, with the birth on the outskirts of big multiplexes, and the death of single hall theatres in central areas of cities, is a major event which is inevitable; it has all the hallmarks of a genuine cultural crime.
These are often historic places, charged with memory, "it is as if a friend of mine has disappeared, someone that we knew, with which we have shared a path and emotions" observed the director of the movie Nuovo Paradiso, which one Tornatore the first Oscar and the Grand Prix of the Cannes film festival 20 years ago, and tells the poetry of a hall in the province, and the nostalgia of a way of living the cinema, perhaps lost forever.
The figures provided by Anec, the main association of traders, says: in the last five years, 316 traditional cinemas to have closed, and it is the halls of the main cities that have especially paid the price: 10 fewer in Florence, 9 in Milan, Naples, Bologna and Rome, 6 in Turin, 5 in Palermo.
Among the most affected by the closure, Emily Romaine is at the top with 82 cinemas single halls lost, followed by the Tuscany (44) and Lombardy (41).
Proof that confirms that the thing most responsible for their disappearance is the advent of the multiplex, because it is the three Italian regions that have made the most of new cinemas multisalles: 195 screens in Lombardy in the last five years, 81 in Tuscany as Emily-Romagne.
"The Italian exploitation has developed in an irrational way" observed Paolo Protti, chairman of the Anec, "it is useful to build new structures, but we need to ensure the survival of those that already exist, because when a hall closes in a city, its regular costumers are not necessarily all prepared to go to the multiplex.
Not to mention the missed deliberation of credit for traders: the debt of the state is around 10 million euros.
It is a shame that, from an ethical and moral point of view, the government does not respect the existing laws.
To support the sector, one would need between 16 and 18 million per year.
Note the case of Bologna, the first Italian city, which concerned about these closures, has decided to resolve the situation with the signing of a protocol between the Mutuelle and Anec, the first of its kind in Italy, to defend and promote single hall cinemas of historic centres and in the periphery.
Among the things planned, there are measures of tax facilities in favour of managers and benefits to the public in terms of mobility: viewers will be able to enter the area but only move about in a limited confine, and have special tariffs for the parking spaces.
"It is an initiative that I am very fond of" observed Giuseppe Tornatore, "and I hope that other cities will follow the example of Bologna by putting other measures in place.
However, it is clear that, to block the super power of the multiplex cinemas, the traditional hall must also improve the quality of its sound and image, because the public today is more demanding.
The defence of the traditional film hall is a subject that for me, has always been important: the closure of Supercinema in Bagheria, the place of my childhood and adolescence, was the spark that convinced me to make "New cinema Paradiso" which I have been thinking of already since 10 years.
I have lived in Rome for 25 years, and when I pass by the Rialto, or Quirinal of Via Nazionale, now closed, where I have shared so many emotions, I turn to the other side to avoid seeing the panels blackened by the dust.
Links between politics and 'ndrangheta, arrested mayor of Gioia Tauro.
"The mayor of Gioia Tauro was prepared to standardise the choice of the Town Hall in favour of the Piromalli clan."
Serious accusations have been launched by the judges of the Directorate of the anti-Mafia Calabria, against the mayor and Vice Mayor of Gioia Tauro, Giorgio Dal Torrione and Rosario Schiavione, and the mayor of Rosarno Carlo Martelli's Liberal Socialists, arrested this morning for external assistance of a mafia association.
Gioacchino Piromalli, the former mediator between the clan and public administrations, and his younger son and lawyer, namesake of the boss, already condemned for criminal association with the mafia, and to pay 10 million euros, were also arrested.
"An affront to the legal and moral normatives, and especially in the right direction" write prosecutors, that the two local authorities had expressed a willingness to pay consultations to Maître Piromalli.
"It would have been given to the clan - write the juges - to enter officially into the mairie, facilitating the possibilities, which are already considerable, to control the public administration"
The chairman of the regional Calabrese committee Agazio Loiero, cannot deny that "there are more than one collusions between local councils and organised crime" in his region: "there are places where the mafia is stronger than in others, where the collusion is almost inevitable.
But there are also many politicians who resist pressure from the ndrangheta, heroes who are honest "
The arrests of this morning follow those of July, following which the police announced having decapitated the Piromalli clan.
At the end of last April, the City Council of Gioia Tauro had been dissolved; already in 1991, and always because of alleged pacts between organised crime and the local government, local politicians had been released from their function to administer the City.
Giorgio Dal Torrione, mayor of the UDC at the time of the collapse, was appointed head of a center-right coalition, after a tie in May 2006.
He complained of scandal when the Prefecture ordered the dissolution of the City Council.
He accused Interior Vice Minister at the time, Marco Minniti, of having engineered everything to raise a political issue, but given the request of incarceration signed this morning, the judges explain that the Piromalli clan had even managed to ask for the variation of the A3 project.
Starting with the interceptions ordered against Dal Torrione, the pm writes, "the possibility of marrying the demans of a businessman, representative a well known group close to the Piromalli, unifying the choice of the public administration with the interests of the clan.
When energy gives birth to waves, big ones moves.
Here is an unmeasured source of energy which covers more than 70% of the surface area of the planet and now the major global energy companies are beginning to discover it.
Waves, tidal currents: here are the new renewable sources on which the behemoths like Chevron have set their eyes, and now trying to get their hands onto.
The possibility of obtaining energy from the movement of the sea is considered for hundreds of years, and in the 1970s, together with the first oil crisis, the research intensified.
When the price of oil declined in 1980, the idea of using marine energy was set aside, but now the ecological movement and the further increase in the price of oil has given a strong growth to the sector
The World Energy Council (WEC) of London estimated in 2007, only 15% of the world's electricity needs could be covered by systems exploiting sea currents.
This amount would be twice that produced by nuclear power plants.
And in addition, there are the currents and tides.
Colossus to the attack.
The first company to focus on marine energy has been Enersis, which in 2005, signed an agreement to build a plant in the north of Portugal.
When the agreement was announced, one would have thought a truly revolutionary step.
Two years thence and still no candidates among these enterprises, which have boasted replacing traditional energy with marine energy.
"Chevron is currently studying the technology on oceanic energy - said the spokesman of a company associated with the colossus American petroleum company, in the business daily Wall Street Journal- and assess the potential to cooperate with us."
The cooperation in question needs a permit, discussed by the Committee for energy, to begin marine energy in Alaska.
This is very interesting, especially if we consider that in Alaska, the US continues to extract oil, and recently President Bush has set up a project for new excavations
Additionally to Chevron, Verdant Power Inc. of New York and Ocean Power of New Jersey, which run the route of energy from the sea, and the sums invested until today, although their details are unknown, indicate the observers, that there is a growing interest.
Technology to perfect.
The experts say that it is a technology still in its infancy, from the fact that marine energy does not dispel fears about its environmental impact.
Today, the systems such as those in Portugal, or some in Scotland, are small in size, and do not seem to create major problem in the ecosystem.
To produce energy on a large scale, however, we must use technology with a higher environmental impact.
"And the choices are diverse: Ocean Power, for example, uses a system of buoys linked together.
The waves moves the buoys up and down, which is then converted into water pressure by the pistons and cylindres inside it.
The pressure spins a turbine which in turn, feeds a generator.
Energy is sent to the shore through the under-water cables.
For the moment, we have four systems of this kind in phases of the project, in preparation of a single federal approval and part of the energy could be used for a military installation.
Verdant Power, on the contrary, is already producing energy for a commercial center and a car park using six under-water turbines in the East River in New York.
The movement of water in the tides, turnes the blades in the turbines, creating a rotational movement that feeds a generator.
Verdant announced that it had a long list of clients in expectation of authorisations necessary to draw of energy.
After the waves, the tides.
Of particular interest, they say at the Institute for research of electricity, and which deserve special attention at the moment, are tides.
Although this is an intermittent phenomenon, the tide is more predictable than the wind, the  sun, or waves, and therefore more reliable as a source of energy.
And it is precisely on tidal energy that states such as New York, Maine and Alaska, among others in coastal areas, have invested $7 million in 2008 and foresee investments of upto 35 million in 2009.
